This is the story behind the most incredible series of murders to ever occur in the city of Seattle, Washington.
You never read about them in your local newspapers or heard about them on your local radio or television station.
Why? Because the facts were watered down, torn apart, and reassembled-- in a word, falsified.
Saturday, April 1st, approximately 2:35 A. M.
Merrisa, one of the three belly dancers at Omar's Tent, a well-known bar in the Pioneer Square area.
She was through for the night and on her way to St. James Street, where she could catch the 3 A. M. bus that would take her to her small apartment in the Shoreline Park area.
Anxious to get home, she planned to take a shower and go right to bed.
She never made it.
Is someone there?
PIease, can't you take me?
I only wanna go to Shoreline Park,
There's someone back there, please!
A few nights later in the barroom of the Seattle Press Club, one Tony Vincenzo by name,
City Editor by profession, bilious grouch by disposition, renewed acquaintance with a dear old comrade of the fourth estate.
- Hi, Charlie,
- Mr, Vincenzo, how are you?
- Okay,
- Good,
The usual, Mr, Vincenzo?
- Yeah, yeah,
- Okay,
Where you been Iiving, in a cave?
There's a world of facts outside,
Stumble out and take a peek at 'em,
- Get your brains out of hibernation,
- Oh, no,
You can't expect me to believe this,
This doesn't make any sense at all!
What's the difference, if it's true?
You're a newsman, not a critic,
- Well, I am!
- Take a Iook at this, then,
Take a Iook around that corner,
See if there isn't someone there who Iooks Iike he just came from a performance ofThe Front Page.
Don't Iecture me about press responsibility, cabbage head,
I knew more about the press the day I was born than you do now,
- Oh, yeah,
- Oh, yeah,
Can you read English, or do
I have to tell you what it says?
See, right there--
V-A-M-P-I-R-E, vampire,
That's what it says right there,
Can you read the official coroner's report?
"BIood drained from a victim's b--"
- Yeah,
- Real odd,
There's nothing wrong with me,
- Yeah,
- Real odd,
Vincenzo!
Hello, Carl,
- What are you doing in Seattle?
- What did I do in Las Vegas?
You fired me, that's what you did,
No, no,
I didn't fire you,
In that case, you can hire me,
Right, Vincenzo?
Get this straight, Mr, Kolchak-- no carnival or hoopla tactics on this paper,
This isn't Fun Town, USA,
This is Seattle,
We have standards here,
We mind our P's and Q's,
We hew precisely to the mark,
Yes, sir, Mr, Crossbinder,
You can count on me minding your P's and Q's, yes, sir,
That's what happened to Cotton Mather, huh?
Don't underestimate him,
He may be old, but his fangs are potent,
So, what's my first assignment?
What's the matter?
Okay, murder one, three days ago,
A belly dancer named Merrisa,
She was strangled in an alley,
Tuesday, April 4th.
First stop, police headquarters to introduce myself and see if any later information had come in about the Ethel Parker killing.
There was nothing new.
No useful leads given by the victim's friends, acquaintances, or family.
Standard medical examiner's report.
So far, the murder was a one-way street to nowhere.
Make an appointment with my secretary,
I said make an appointment,
- I don't make appointments,
- You're gonna have to,
- Captain, I'd Iike to make a--
- Morrison,
Captain, I--wait a minute!
What's the matter?
I just wanna talk to the captain,
Second stop,
Omar's Tent, no leads.
Ethel Parker never mixed with customers, had no known enemies, kept her problems to herself, unmarried, all her relatives in Massachusetts, she'd left the mainstream of life without making a ripple.
Third stop, the apartment of Charisma Beauty, given name, Gladys Wheems, one of the two other belly dancers at Omar's Tent.
- Charisma Beauty?
- Who are you?
Who's there, Wilma?
Miss Beauty?
Yes, I am,
Excuse me,
I beg your pardon,
My name is Kolchak,
I'm with theDaily Chronicle.
I'd Iike to ask you a few questions,
- Would you Iike a chocolate?
- No, thank you very much,
What I'd Iike to ask you is...
She was something less than helpful, and I soon departed, made a bit uneasy by the looks directed at me by her husband,
Wilma Krankheimer.
Fourth stop, the floating premises of Louise Harper,
Iast of the belly-dancing trio at the supper club.
Scherazade?
- Louise Harper?
- Oh, hi,
I can't talk to you now,
I'm Iate for class,
If you wanna sell me something, come back Iater,
I really don't have any money for extras, so you'd just be wasting your time,
- Yeah, but I--
- Listen, I'd Iike to talk, but I am so Iate for class,
Professor Brown will kill me,
My grades are not too good as it is,
How I'm gonna graduate,
I will never know,
There simply is not enough time to do all the things I've gotta do,
May I introduce myself?
My name is Kolchak of theDaily Chronicle.
When could I ask you some questions about Ethel Parker?
You'II have to come by the club, that's the only time
I have to talk to you,
I am so Iate, I know he's gonna flunk me,
Thanks for the information,
Don't mention it!
You know there's been a murder, don't you?
I also know that Seattle is the Northwest's Iargest sea port,
Men come and go Iike the tide, and the murderer is probably in Yokohama by now,
Bye!
She was wrong-- he was still in Seattle, working up his list of victims.
Cocktail waitress Gail Manning, disposed of some time after 2 A. M. on the morning of Thursday, April 6th, a block and a half from the first murder.
Right there on top, boys,
Captain, what do you intend to do about this?
- Who are you, anyway?
- My name?
Kolchak, with theDaily Chronicle.
I'd Iike to ask a couple questions on this,
- Get this guy off my back,
- Will you wait a minute?
Captain, I got a Iot of problems to take care of,
"Strangulation, neat and quick, no new elements, " was all they told us, until the Medical Examiner's report the next afternoon.
In attendance,
Captain Roscoe Shubert of the Seattle Police, and his staff.
Holding forth, Dr. Christopher Webb of the County Medical Examiner's Office.
Checking underneath the victim's hairline, we Iocated what appears to be a needle puncture near the base of the skull... from which a small amount of blood was removed,
Was there any puncture or Ioss of blood in Ethel Parker?
We haven't checked on the puncture yet, but there was apparently a slight decrease in normal blood content,
How slight?
That's hard to say, maybe six or seven cc's,
Why wasn't it reported?
The amount of Ioss seemed insignificant at the time,
- But not now,
- You have a point--
Just a minute, Doctor,
Who is this clown?
I've never seen him before,
- What?
- Kolchak,Daily Chronicle.
- Don't you remember?
- Oh, yeah, how could I forget?
AII right, Mr, Kolchak, may we continue?
- Certainly,
- Thank you very much,
Go ahead, Doctor,
As Iong as we get all the facts this time,
Dissatisfied by what I had heard at the Medical Examiner's report,
I paid a little visit to the morgue and found a chatty attendant with a taste for Scotch.
What he told me made chopped liver of the needle puncture and loss of blood, and explained why they hadn 't let me look too closely at Gail Manning the night before.
Well, uh, no, no,
No, thank you, thank you very much,
You go right on ahead, though,
We can't Iink these two killings unless we know whether Ethel Parker has a needle puncture, too,
She has...and that's not all,
You know something the Medical Examiner doesn't?
- Mm-hmm,
- What?
First... you owe me ten bucks for a bottle of Scotch,
- What?
- Yup,
Bought for one anecdotal morgue attendant,
Okay, keep talkin',
Hurry up,
Ethel Parker not only had a needle puncture in the back of her skull, and Ioss of blood, she also had a broken neck,
That's not so unusual in the case of a strangling,
Gail Manning also had a broken neck,
So what?
Maybe I oughta tell you what the morgue attendant told me,
He said that the killer had to be an incredibly strong man,
Not only were the necks broken, they were crushed,
Read on, read on,
- Wait a minute!
- That's what the man said,
On the throats of both victims was a residue of rotted flesh, as if they had been strangled by a dead man,
Friday, April 7th, 10: 21 P.M.
I wouldn't have believed it if
I hadn't seen it with my own eyes, but Louise Harper's hips could move as fast as her mouth.
- That's the stuff, baby!
- Take it off!
Take it off, baby,
Scherazade, Iadies and gentlemen, princess of the East,
And now, the world-famous
Charisma Beauty,
Knock 'em dead, Charisma,
Why should I do that?
I Iike them,
I just can't understand this,
Whoever wrote this is just dumb,
I'm never gonna graduate if I flunk this course,
- Princess of the East?
- No, Dimwit of the West,
I just can't talk to you right now,
- I've gotta know algebra,
- Well, I'm great at figures,
I bet you are,
Go away,
You know, if I could find a way not to eat,
I sure could save a Iot of time,
Yeah, well, Iet's, uh,
Iet's pick up talking where we Ieft off,
I mean, about the guys-- thank you, Charlie-- about the guys who come to see you dance, the regulars,
Do you find any strange ones in there, any odd ones, any weirdoes?
They're all weird, they sit there and stare at you with these big glassy eyes,
Any of 'em could be the strangler for all I know,
What's that?
Oh, that's the underground tour,
- The what?
- The underground tour,
It goes down underneath Seattle,
- You're kidding?
- Mm-mmm,
Yes, There's ruins underneath the streets here, what they call "OId Seattle,"
- Isn't that right, Wilma?
- Oh, I don't know, here,
Oh, thank you,
I just Iove these sandwiches,
I was talking about the underground, wasn't I?
Yeah, you were, honey,
There was this big fire back in 18-something-or-other, and for some reason
I don't know about, they built it all back up, twice as big as it was before,
- Isn't that right, Wilma?
- Come on, GIadys, it's almost showtime,
Although research was never one of my favorite pastimes,
I called on the services of one Titus Berry, guardian of the secrets of Seattle buried in the morgue of the Daily Chronicle,
Here we go,
- Thanks,
- Most welcome,
I envy you,
You do?
Research,
That's where the joy Iies,
- Joy?
- And the fascination,
Let the others scurry about, gathering their contemporary bits of gossip,
This is where the meat is found,
- Meat?
- Yes,
For instance, no one has yet mentioned the distinct resemblance between this current series of strangulations and another series in the year 1951,
Or was it '52?
- Yeah, how similar?
- Oh, extremely similar,
Really?
He wasn't exaggerating.
On March 27th, 1952, one Myra Johns was discovered strangled in an alley in the Pioneer Square area.
On March 30th, a second strangulation took place in the same area.
On April 2nd, a third,
April 5th, a fourth.
By April 1 4th, six women had been strangled, all of them in that area.
The stories intimated that certain "bizarre details" had been repressed by police officials.
I wondered what they were.
I hardly think we can say we have the same killer now as in 1 952,
Read on,
- Again?
- Again,
"Incredibly strong and had the rotted features of a corpse"?!
Those are exact quotes from a man who saw him
- in action in 1952,
- I can't print this,
- Why not?
- If you don't know the answer to that,
Kolchak, I don't know,
I came to Seattle for some peace and quiet, what do I get?
-You again and another crazy story,
- We'II soon see if it's crazy or not,
"How?" asked the red-eyed editor,
Because if it is the same killer, he hasn't stopped killing,
Sunday, April 9th, 1:42 A.M.
Joyce Gabriel, on her way home from a late date, didn't' know it was a bad idea to be in the Pioneer Square area
Iate at night.
- Let me get a shot of her,
- Move out of the way,
Another one,
Just settle down, Miss Gabriel,
I never saw anything Iike that in my Iife,
I don't know why he didn't chase me after he killed her,
I just, you know, I ran as fast as I could until I saw you,
- Miss Gabriel--
- I'm telling you for the Iast time,
I'm sick and tired of you butting into my business,
Will you please Iet me ask the questions, Mr, Kolchak?
- Certainly,
- AII right,
- What did he Iook Iike?
- Are you deaf?
Get rid of that tape recorder, too,
Now, what did he Iook Iike?
Oh, God, I hope I never see a face Iike that again,
He Iooked Iike a dead man,
- Like a what?
- Like a dead man,
I don't wanna hear it,
What about the broken necks and rotted flesh on the victims' throats?
I told ya I didn't wanna hear it!
Besides, it's not official,
Who cares whether it's official or not?!
You know it, and I know it,
I'II buy the possibility that it's the killer that strangled the six women in 1952, but a man, not some kind of super dead man!
That's how he has been described more than once!
I don't care if he's been described that way more than twice!
Let me finish my Iunch!
Where you goin'?
There!
An open invitation to the killer,
Listen to this,
"I intend to walk the streets of the Pioneer Square area every night from now on,"
Just Iet him try to kill me, if he dares,
He may be sick, but he's not crazy,
I'm giving you this, Mr, Kolchak, because you had the thoughtfulness to put my name in your story on the 1952 strangulations,
What, uh, what is it?
A burning curiosity impelled me to Iook further back into our files to see if there had been any other strangulations of that nature,
1931? You gotta be kidding,
Here it was again--
March 29th through April 16th.
Six strangulations, certain bizarre information repressed by the authorities.
Although a reporter named
Jimmy Stacks, God bless him, nosed around until he uncovered the unofficial information that some of the victims were missing some blood, and that the killer was supposed to be some kind of superman.
Women, You notice that?
AIways women,
- Fascinating,
- Yeah, that's the word, Mr, B,
Let's see, 1973 to 1952, that's 21 years,
1952 to 1931... that's 21 years,
That's right,
I hadn't noticed that,
That's very observant of you, Mr, Kolchak,
Can you be thinking what I'm thinking?
Let's have a Iook,
- Mr, Berry,
- Mr, Kolchak,
Shall we try for 1889?
I refuse to read it,
Wait, wait, wait,
Just... just read the first Iine,
Go on, go on,
Just the first Iine,
Give yourself a treat,
Come on, come on,
"Five identical sets of murders every 21 years since 1889"?
- Identical?
- Identical!
- Oh, come on, Kolchak,
- AImost identical,
There may be more than five,
The records stop in 1887 when theChronicle was founded,
I'm going to OIympia tomorrow and check out--
- Oh, don't rush into that,
- Wait, wait, Read the-- read the 1910 eyewitness description,
I'II read it to you, here,
Oh, it's great,
"The maniac had the strength of ten men
"and the face of a corpse, cheekbones protruding through the flesh,"
- isn't that great?
- Hold it, it, just hold it,
You really expect me to print that story, with a corpse that's been running around strangling people and crushing their necks for the past 84 years?
Because the police refused to release the sketch their own artist had made,
I talked Vincenzo into hiring an artist of our own.
His jaw was heavier, I think,
That's closer, but more bone was showing through,
Like this?
Yes,
Is that what he Iooked Iike?
That's what I saw,
Monday, April 10th, 2:07 P.M.
Fourth of July came to Seattle early that year, all the fireworks exploding at the police headquarters,
90% of them directed at me and Vincenzo.
You know what I call that?
Irresponsible yellow journalism,
Fast buck journalism,
The seamy journalism one might expect to find in a second-rate metropolis,
The sordid brand of journalism which is based not on the public weal, but on the private cash register,
Psychologists call it déja vu, the distinct impression of having had the same experience before.
That's what it was, all right, in spades.
Item--we had no right to throw the public into a panic.
Translation-- tourist season was coming up and Seattle couldn't survive without it.
Item--we had no evidence to support our statement that there might be a connection between the five sets of murders since 1 889.
Translation--we knew more than we were supposed to.
Item--the authorities were going to keep a watchful eye on us, particularly me, from now on.
Translation--after a brief hiatus,
I had once more taken up permanent residence inside a pressure cooker.
Permit me to read you a brief memorandum,
Quote, "Any repetition of this morning's front page assault
"on the mind and senses will result in the instant dismissal of all responsible persons,"
Unquote,
- Signed...
- "God,"
You're almost right,
How could I Iet this happen to me again?
How could I do it?
I don't understand!
Will you just wait a minute?!
We wasted an awful Iot of time fighting tooth and nail in Las Vegas about the obvious,
"There is no such thing as a vampire,"
That's what everyone kept saying, and the women kept dying,
Let's not play that stupid game again!
- Besides, it's a great story,
- It's a fabricated story,
- full of screwball speculations!
- Fabricated speculation?!
- Have you been sitting on your brain?
- Give me the facts, or stay away from me, just the facts!
Step number one in my fact-finding project took me to the Main Library, where I spent the rest of the evening checking their microfilm collection of Seattle's newspapers.
The murder trail apparently came to an end in 1 889, but I found out something very interesting.
As near as I could make it out, every set of murders had taken place over a period of 1 8 days, which meant that our killer, whoever or whatever he was, only had a week and a day to find his last three victims.
That night, about 1 1 :45, he reduced the number to two.
Hold it, mister,
Identification, please,
Yeah, identification, sure, right here,
Hey, you, Hold it!
- Where'd he go?
- We didn't see anyone,
Better get the ambulance for those other guys,
- I'II take the camera,
- Hey, give me my camera!
Well, that's--
People, I want this area thoroughly searched,
Do a knock on it,
- Give me my camera!
- I want you out of this area,
- That's private property!
- Beat it!
- I'II Iock you up for Ioitering,
- You can't take that!
Give me that-- come on, give me that!
Shoot!
Just Molly and me
And baby makes three
We're happy in my
BIue heaven
Mr, Joe Roberts,
Iadies and gentlemen,
How about a big hand for him, huh?
AII right!
AII right,
The man responsible for the underground tour of Seattle's forgotten city beneath the modern streets of Seattle,
That mall pole was devised by the man I'm about to introduce, author, journalist,
Mr, Bill Speidel,
Thank you, young man,
Welcome to Seattle's underground tours, folks,
Before I go on, I wanna tell you about Mother Damnable...
After completely striking out in my efforts to get Shubert to return my film of last night's wipeout of the Seattle police,
I decided to try another angle.
...to make room for the underground...,
I called my belly-dancing, undergraduate friend and asked her to attend an afternoon tour of the underground with me.
Confession of a Newsman,
Chapter One, her being with me had nothing to do with the story.
Those kids from
Seattle High School spent five successive Saturdays back in the spring of 1 965, cleaning up no Iess than ten tons of debris down here so that people Iike you wouldn't break your necks walking around,
Watch your step through here,
You gentlemen can help the Iadies, huh?
Twice a day when the tides came in, the sewer system backed up and came right in with it, flooding every water closet, turning it into a fountain,
Kids in those days weren't raised on Dr, Spock, they were raised on the tide table,
Watch your step,
Let's go this way,
It was like another world down there, a world of yesterday-- sidewalks and storefronts just as they'd been left after the fire in 1 889.
Windows built to admit the light admitting only darkness now.
Ground floors of office buildings now the unused cellars of those buildings.
The tomb of old Seattle just beneath the living streets of what Seattle is today.
Vintage year,
I'm too old for this shit,
You want...?
Gotta see a doctor,
Arthritis,
Bad stomach,
Why'd you have to come to this place?
Back,
Never woulda had to put my shoes on if I hadn't heard you comin',
My corns are killing me,
Got a charley horse,
Varicose veins,
I'm gettin' a migraine,
- Are you all right?
- Yeah,
Of course I'm all right,
Listen...
Have you seen anybody else around here
- who wasn't with the tours?
- Yeah,
- Yeah, who?
- You two,
Oh, funny,
Very funny,
Well, if you do see someone, or, uh... something around here, you get in touch with me at this number and I'II give you 20 bucks,
Here's a down payment,
I could Iive three months on that, five bucks,
Uh, no, thank you,
On me,
Sure was a Iovely afternoon,
I still don't think it's a good idea for you to be working nights,
- I've seen this nut in action,
- Oh, terrific,
You gonna pick up my tuition?
That's very funny, very funny,
I just don't get it,
Where does he go between killings?
We didn't find anything in the underground,
- No,
- I don't understand it,
How can he run Iike a track star, have superhuman strength, and Iook Iike a stiff?
And what does he do with all that blood?
It's Iike some kind of recurring nightmare,
- It's all happened to me before,
- What are you talking about?
Last year in Las Vegas when
I was working for Tony Vincenzo,
I uncovered a series of murders that turned out to have been committed by a vampire,
A real vampire,
A real, out of the coffin at night, go for the jugular vampire,
You don't believe me,
Neither did the cops up there, neither did the FBI, neither did Tony Vincenzo, until finally, they had to,
As it turned out, however, they put a cap on my story, prevented me from writing about what I had seen with my own eyes by hanging a murder rap over my head,
- Murder?
- Yeah,
Yeah, I finally drove a wooden stake into the vampire's heart,
- What do you think?
- What do I think?
I think those people will remember this elevator ride for the rest of their Iives,
Two, Iet's go,
I'm beginning to wonder whether maybe it isn't them, maybe it's me,
Listen, I think I know somebody you should see,
There's this Iady who's a teacher at the university,
- She teaches Anthropology,
- Yes?
She's a buff on every crazy subject there is,
- Yeah?
- Ghosts, demons, vampires,
And ghouls, you know, just name it,
You probably won't be too crazy about her, but she's gotta be the one you talk to,
Yeah? What's her name?
- Professor Crabwell,
- What?!
How can a man over a hundred years old retain his vitality?
Is it possible?
If it were possible,
I'd be sitting here an 80-year-old sexpot,
However, staying young was not their purpose,
AIchemy was conceived as an exalted notion-- man at one with the universe,
And will you please sit down?
Yes, yes, of course,
These men Ied spartan Iives,
Iiving in the most humble of quarters, eating the most humble of foods,
The Count Saint-Germain, for instance, existed on a diet which consisted solely of oatmeal, groats, white meat of chicken, and a Iittle wine,
Seems to me that a diet Iike that would make a man old before his time,
On the contrary,
He remained young for a number of years, in addition to which he was said to have possessed almost superhuman strength,
Tell me, what other, uh... what other ingredients are in this elixir of Iife?
Milk or meat, celandine or honey, red wine vinegar, hair, sweat, blood,
What kind of blood?
What do you mean, what kind of blood?
Human blood, of course,
What are you smiling at?
Hi, there,
- Got a moment?
- What are you doing here?
- Just wanted to talk a minute,
- What about?
The elixir of Iife,
"Go to journalism school," my father said,
"It's a good, sound, down-to-earth profession,"
Don't you wanna hear this?
I'd Iike to raise tulips for a Iiving, but there's not too much of a demand,
Suppose an elixir of Iife could actually be produced, how do you think it'd work?
Do you think that one treatment of it would cause everlasting youth?
Or do you think that periodic treatments
- might be required, say--
- Wait a minute, don't tell me,
Let me guess,
Every 21 years?
Good guess,
Suppose at the end of this 21-year period, the man who took the magic elixir began Iooking a Iittle... moldy, you know, kinda Iike what he really did Iook Iike-- a 100-year-old man,
Suppose he had to make a new batch of the elixir and had to make it within a period of 18 days,
Suppose that the one ingredient he didn't have was--
- BIood,
- Very good,
Suppose he had to go out Iate every night to get that blood,
Suppose he got it from the bases of his victims' skulls with a hypodermic needle,
Suppose he was so strong that when he strangled his victims, he crushed their necks,
Suppose his fingertips were starting to decompose and he Ieft fragments of them on the women's throats,
Suppose you flap your arms and fly right out that door,
Suppose you check the dictionary and discover what "fact" means,
- fact!
- Fact!
Facts!
As I rode home that night,
I wondered where the killer was and if my theory about him was true, partly true, or, as Vincenzo would have it, factless, hopeless, and useless.
I wondered when and how he'd get his fifth victim, since the entire area was being guarded so closely now.
I didn 't have to wonder long.
Thursday, April 13th, 1:25 A.M.
The dressing room in Omar's Tent.
Charisma Beauty was plain old Gladys Wheems again, dead, strangled with a broken neck, blood syringed from the base of her skull.
Wilma Krankheimer was still in shock.
So was Louise Harper.
She has found the body after her performance.
I've got a couple of questions for you,
And I wasn 't doing so well myself.
I've gotta talk to you about something,
Wait a minute, come on!
This is very important!
Captain Shubert is very busy,
- You can't go in there,
- I gotta see him,
- You cannot go in there!
- I'm goin' in there!
- What's going on here?
- I told him you were busy,
I've been tryin' to see you since 1 :30 this morning,
- I'm not Ieaving until I do,
- It's all right,
- I'm sorry, Sir,
- It's all right,
You gotta put policewomen on the waterfront streets at night,
- Do I?
- Yeah, you do,
You got five days to catch the killer, otherwise, he's gonna disappear,
- Is he, Mr, Kolchak?
- Yeah, he is, he is!
Every 21 years since 1889, he has killed six women in 18 days precisely,
- Precisely?
- Precisely,
No doubt we Iack your eagle-eyed perception, but we fail to see the exact, precise pattern you keep babbling about,
Now, in 1889, there was no evidence that the murders were committed over an 18-day period, or that they were even related,
- You checked?
- Yes, we do a Iittle research, too,
To continue--in 1910, there was blood Ioss reported
- in only three of the victims,
- What about--?
The description of the murderer was made by a mental defective
- in his cups and--
- What about the 1952 descriptions?
Were those made by a mental defective in his cups?
- He was a bank president!
- In 1952, there were eight murders committed during an 18-day period,
What does that do to your theory?
Two of them by stabbing, which invalidates--
And after the sixth strangulation, an eyewitness described the murderer as being, quote,
"rather handsome," unquote,
Oh, you mean you missed that?
Well, I...the witness obviously made a mistake, he had to,
Did he, huh?
Tell me, if it's the same killer, why no signs of rotted flesh on the throat of Iast night's victim?
And one Iast question,
Why am I wasting my time on you?
- Facts mean nothing to you at all,
- There is one Iast fact, Captain,
By next Tuesday, that killer's gonna disappear for 21 years, and the way your police have Pioneer Square bottled up, he isn't even gonna show his face,
Which face is that, huh?
The rotted one of your so-called super killer your newspaper saw fit to print?
So-called?!
I saw that so-called super killer wipe up the streets with your so-called police force!
I had pictures to prove it that you wouldn't Iet me print!
Tell me, how Iong have you been in Seattle?
- What does that mean?
- How Iong have you been
- with theChronicle?
- A Iittle Iess than two weeks,
- A Iittle Iess than two weeks,
- About that,
In that time, you have ascertained how we should conduct this case?
- I've been a reporter for 22 years!
- I've been a police officer for 30!
Then why don't you retire?
Listen, I don't Iike you,
Mr, Kolchak,
You might say
I dislike you monumentally,
You have barged around this building as though it were your own private club,
You've interfered with police officers trying to perform their duty,
You've strewn the streets of Seattle with journalistic garbage,
You've stepped on toes, muscled in, pushed, usurped, and generally conducted yourself with all the aplomb of a one-man Gestapo,
- Gestapo?
- Yes, Gestapo!
If I see or hear from you again, for quite some time,
I promise you, I'II personally have you thrown in jail, and get your arm off my clock!
You've only got five days Ieft,
And I'm telling you to get out!
And stay out!
Cease, mister,
Cease, desist and vanish, or else,
At Ieast search the underground, the killer is down there,
- That's where he isn't!
- That--
The underground was searched,
Nothing at all was found,
Sheila!
Yes, we did that without consulting you,
I hope that's all right,
Sheila, show
Mr, Kolchak the door,
Good day, sir,
- Kolchak!
- I'II get him yet,
Coming, Mother,
I warned you about bugging the police department,
- Yeah, so what?!
- Didn't I?!
So, Shubert's office just called Crossbinder,
Crossbinder called me, and once again, thanks to you,
I'm frying on the griddle,
- Why?
- Why?!
Are you for real?! You barge into Shubert's office, tell him how to run his case, tell him he's suppressing news,
- and you ask why?!
- He is suppressing news, he doesn't know how to run the case,
The killer is down there, Tony,
He is down in the underground,
Why don't they get him out of there?!
He is hidden away someplace nobody knows,
How the heck can they get at him, then?!
By breaking open the walls,
I don't know,
Crossbinder's got some influence in town, hasn't he?
- What about it?
- You have got to talk him into pressuring the police, forcing them to do what I want them to do!
You know what you just said?
Of course,
I just said it, didn't I?
No, you don't know,
It's finally happened, Kolchak,
You've gone schizoid,
You'II be wearing robes and a crown next,
I'II tell you what's finally happened,
You have Iost your guts, you have sold out,
- Sold out?
- Sold out!
Why, you miserable, egocentric--
- You are off the story,
- I am what?!
You heard me, you are off the story,
You know something, Tony?
You're getting old, you're getting very old,
- Out, Out!
- "Out! Get out!"
Just one small item, Mr, Kolchak,
Mark Twain,
- Fifth paragraph down,
- Fifth paragraph down...
Two, three, oh, yeah,
"Mr, Twain noted with typical dryness of tone
"that he had a most intriguing conversation with...
"with a Iocal physician who claimed that physical immortality--"
Oh, this is very good,
Mr, Berry, very good,
"...that physical immortality was not only possible,
"but probable, indeed, practical,
"Mr, Twain remarked that... that the physician's name was Dr, Richard Malcolm,"
You wouldn't have anything on this Richard Malcolm,
- would you?
- Just one small item,
Dr, Richard Malcolm was a member of the original staff of the Westside Mercy Hospital when it opened in 1882,
There's the original story and photograph,
The Civil War?
He was a surgeon in the Union Army,
Is this hospital still standing?
Oh, I don't believe so,
Mr, Kolchak,
I think there's a clinic there now,
I took a fast trip to the clinic, hoping they might have the record files from Westside Mercy Hospital stashed away in their cellar.
I asked Mr. Berry to keep checking his own records and find out what else he could about Dr. Richard Malcolm.
I never had to search the cellar for those records.
I found my answer just inside the lobby door.
Sir...if you don't get down from there this instant,
- I'II call the police,
- Mm-hmm,
- Did you hear me, sir?
- Uh-huh,
AII right, then,
AII right, then! Call the police, tell them we have a vandal here,
Tell them to get here right away,
Get down from there this instant!
Malcolm Richards, M.D., the doctor-saint of the waterfront, founder of the Richards Free Clinic, also known as Richard Malcolm, M.D.,
Iate of the Union Army, our killer from the time.
This is dreadful, Mr, Kolchak!
On the contrary, Mr, Berry,
There he is, officer,
Tony?
It is to be regretted,
Mr, Kolchak, that Ieg irons and mouth blocks were outlawed some years back,
Will you wait a minute, will you take these things off?
I warned you, Kolchak,
Congratulations, Kolchak,
You have plumbed a new depth-- the desecration of a saint,
For heaven's sake, I did not invent the resemblance between
Dr, Malcolm Richards and Dr, Richard Malcolm,
I did not invent the fact that Westside Mercy Hospital, of which Dr, Richard Malcolm was a staff member, is on the same spot as the Malcolm Richards CIinic,
Why not an exposé on Dr, Schweitzer, Mr, Kolchak?
Or the Iowdown on Mahatma Gandhi?
As for this eternal youth garbage, I hate it,
Well, I can see why,
- What did you say?
- Hold on, we're not here for any personal vituperation,
- You know that word?
- What?
Vi-tu-per-ation,
That's what I said,
I pronounced it right,
Listen, you've been arrested,
You're 1/100th of an inch of being thrown in jail, and--
- There he is!
- Now, who's this?
Mr, Berry, come in, come in!
I've been waiting for you, come on!
Yes, yes,
Do you, uh--?
Did you get it?
- Yes, I thought perhaps--
- You thought right, Mr, Berry,
Who is this man?
Don't you know him?
He works for you,
Down in Research, sir,
- for 35 years,
- Good God,
And research, of course, being the meat of it,
Yes, here we are,
"Mr, Richard Malcolm
Iived in New York City until 1868, when he moved to Seattle,"
Very good,
Mr, Berry, very good,
"Several months before he Ieft--"
New York City, that is--
"six women were strangled over a period of 18 days precisely,
"Their Iarynxes were crushed and their necks were broken,
Two had small wounds on the base of their skull,"
1868, I might add, is exactly 21 years before the first group of Seattle killings, Mr, Vincenzo,
Item, "Following the fire of 1889, in which the wife,
"stepson and daughter died of smoke inhalation,
Dr, Richard Malcolm disappeared,"
1889, as we know, just happens to be the year in which the first group of six killings occurred,
Mr, Vincenzo,
Yes, "In 1910,
Dr, Malcolm Richards appeared in the by now defunct
Westside Mercy Hospital," of which, as noted, Dr, Richard Malcolm was formerly a member of the staff--
"and built his clinic over the original site,"
1910, by coincidence, just happens to be the year in which the second group of six killings occurred,
- Kolchak?
- Again, more broken necks
- and more missing blood,
- Now, Iisten, Kolchak--
Wait a minute-- wait a minute!
"In 1931, following reports that he had developed some kind of
" 'strange, degenerative skin disease,'
Dr, Malcolm Richards disappeared,"
Oh, 1931 just by coincidence happens to be the year in which the third group of similar killings occurred,
Mr, Vincenzo,
Photos, do you have any photographs?
- Ah, yeah,
- Did you get some?
Oh, marvelous, marvelous, Iet's see...
You'II, excuse the, uh... clumsiness of the hands, but my wrists are slightly encumbered by your...bracelets,
Now, this photograph of Dr, Richard Malcolm and the slightly doctored photograph of Dr, Malcolm Richards are identical, down to the white scar above the right eyebrow,
Now, this photograph was taken during the Civil War when Dr, Richard Malcolm was a surgeon with the Union Army,
The photograph of Dr, Malcolm Richards was taken in 1926,
It showed a man in his 40s,
Now, how can a man almost 90
Iook Iike a man in his 40s?
Facts, gentlemen, facts,
Well?!
Yes, well?
- You shut up!
- I mean, uh, well...
What are we supposed to do now, congratulate you?
Find him, mister!
Go down underground and search for him,
You haven't searched enough,
Put some policewomen in the area,
Iure him out of his Iair,
And, Mr, Publisher, you might consider printing the stories,
They are news, sir, not hearsay,
They are news!
That will be enough,
Mr, Kolchak,
Perhaps, Mr, Kolchak, it would be a good idea if you stepped outside for a moment,
Delighted, sir, delighted,
If I could get my jewelry removed,
AII right, Judd?
Get him outta here, take the handcuffs off him,
Thank you,
I just await your decision, gentlemen,
Yes, sir, LIewellyn--
I mean, Mr, Crossbinder,
It'II be done, you can depend on it,
Come on, Judd,
Oh, boy,
Okay, Carl,
I don't know how I did it, but I got you off the hook,
- You did?
- Yeah,
You're a genius, Tony!
You're a genius!
- What about the story?
- There is no story,
- What?
- That's it, there is no story,
They're gonna handle it their own way,
They're gonna--huh?
- I'II kill 'em!
- Kolchak!
Didn't they hear what I said?!
Don't they know what's gonna happen?!
If they don't get Malcolm out of there, he's going to get his sixth kill somewhere else, and he's gonna disappear for 21 years!
Don't they know what's gonna happen?!
They do not intend to panic an entire city just for your sake,
Kolchak, period!
- Your next assignment--
- You haven't changed,
You're the same as you were in Las Vegas,
- Your next assignment--
- You're on their side,
You're covering the
Daffodil Festival in Puyallup,
And you're Iucky to get that,
Puyallup?
It was with deep regret that I chose to forego the joys of daffodils in Puyallup, but I had other plans.
Saturday, April 1 5th, 2 A.M.
We started out-- one belly-dancing undergraduate, and one reporter who, despite his air of spit-in-their-eye confidence, hoped to heavens he wasn 't hastening said undergraduate to her doom.
It didn 't help my conscience that Louise Harper had agreed immediately to help me, angered as she was by the death of both her co-performers.
PIease stop Iooking around Iike you're suspicious of something!
- Walk natural,
- I'm scared!
- I'm right behind you,
- That's easy for you to say,
Just act casual,
The first three nights passed without incident.
Most of the time was spent trying to duck the police.
On the fourth night, things began to happen.
Denver- 1 4, Denver- 1 4, family disturbance.
278 New Northridge.
No...
I'II not Iook back,
Car 19, Car 19,
21 1 in progress,
813 Kelso Street, handle Code 3.
AII right,
Car number eight, undetermined disturbance,
8390 Olympus Walk.
See the man.
-Duncan car one, 0- 1...
- Get her in the car, fast,
Okay, the party's over,
Get in the car,
- What are you doing down here?
- You're under arrest,
- Get in the car,
- Get your hands off me,
- Don't push!
- Shut up!
All units in the vicinity of Main Branch, be on the lookout for a '36 Shearing coupe, blue, blue hood.
Who is there?
We're closed,
PIease go away, we're closed for the evening,
No! No!
April 19th, 3 A.M.
The police station was a circus of activity, a three-ring madhouse of reaction to the sixth kill.
Even Captain Shubert seemed to know they'd had it now, that, saving a miracle, their prey had gone to earth again and wasn't going to show his corpse-like face for another 21 years.
A certain reporter being bailed out knew, too-- knew it, and was fit to be tied by it.
Hey, Shubert, okay?
- Kolchak,
- Okay, Shubert?
- I told him, the idiot!
- Kolchak!
I told him, but would he Iisten?
No, he didn't Iisten,
"I've been a policeman for 37 years,"
And an idiot for twice that Iong!
You were supposed to be in Puyallup with the daffodils!
- Where?
- I'd Iike to Ieave you here forever,
I'd Iike to see them Iock you up in a jail cell for a million years!
- If you don't shut your mouth--
- What's the matter with you?
You oughta see a doctor,
I'm serious,
You sound terrible,
It's awful,
What have you done to that poor man?
I have never seen anyone so close to total insanity before,
...he just disappears,
We cornered him in the alleys behind the Richards CIinic, and he disappears, just Iike that,
Vincenzo was so upset, it took me an hour to get rid of him, and then only because I promised to go straight home to bed.
Maybe no one else knew what was going on, but I was sure that I did.
Our man had to have a way in and out of some secret part of the underground, and the basement of his old clinic had to be it.
Right here,
Get in the shadows,
- You're not going down there?
- You stay here,
What is it?
Looks Iike a big air shaft down here,
Where does it go?
AII over,
I'm gonna check it out,
- Carl! Are you all right?
- Yeah, sure, of course,
You, uh...you stay here,
I'II be right back,
Just when I thought
I'd struck out, I found it.
It's in there, Give me
30 minutes, then call the police
- and tell 'em where I am,
- What are you gonna do?
Get my exclusive, what do you think?
I think you're crazy, that's what I think,
Just do what I tell ya,
I gotta get going,
Here it was--the hidden city beneath Seattle's underground.
I was descending to the world of yesterday, the world of the 1 9th century, of bustle pads and high-crown hats and Queen Victoria.
The private world of Dr. Richard Malcolm.
Who are you?
- Are you...?
- Who are you?
Carl Kolchak,Daily Chronicle.
How did you get here?
Through the, uh... the cellar of your clinic,
CIinic? I have no clinic,
Why do you say that?
But you are... you are
Dr, Richard Malcolm,
I've seen you somewhere before,
Nah,
Oh, Well, you almost killed me the other day
- in the alley,
- What are you doing here?
What am I doing here?
I thought I'd drop in and find out about you so I could tell my readers,
Your what?
My readers,
His readers,
Did you hear that?
Nobody is ever going to hear from you again,
- I think I'II go now,
- You've profaned my world, sir,
I will not permit you to Iive here, to stay here... to exist here,
I'm just a dumb reporter doing his job,
You grovel nicely,
Mister, uh...
Kolchak, sir,
Daily Chronicle, Sir,
So, you want a story,
He wants a story, darling,
What do you think?
We'II see if there's time,
Yes, we have time,
Why not, why not?
It seems only fitting that one other person in the world ought to know the facts... before he dies,
Yes, Mr, Kolchak,
Okay, come on,
I'II not bore you with the details of how I evolved my formula,
Suffice it to say that the additive which ultimately made it work for me was the blood of women, removed from their brains in the seven seconds following their death,
I found that six were required to supply the quantity of blood that was needed for the 18-day period in which the elixir was prepared and consumed,
In 1868, I first took the elixir,
Then, believing that my immortality was assured,
I decided to perfect and refine the formula... in the hopes of bestowing its benefits on mankind,
No Ionger circumscribed by time and death, what wonders on this earth could men not then achieve?
And then... in 1889... my world collapsed,
Yes, 1889,
Your family died, and you began to age,
Are you going to Iisten?
- Or are you going to interrupt?
- No, no!
Listen, Iisten,
I discovered that the effects of the elixir were not permanent,
I began to age,
I had to kill again,
Restore myself,
That's why you Iook the way you do now, isn't it?
Yes,
Stage by stage... in 18 days,
That's the way the elixir works,
Yes, And then I shall have
21 more years to make its effects permanent,
Twenty-one more years?
That's all you're ever going to have, isn't it?
That's not true, I'II find the answer eventually,
Eventually?
How many more women are going to have to die?
What's a few Iives compared to immortality, Mr, Kolchak?
This is the sixth and final dosage,
I shall take it shortly, and the revitalization shall be complete,
If I don't take this final dosage now, the process will reverse itself,
But I will take it,
Why?
Hey, buddy boy,
Yeah!
What about me?
Vincenzo! What kind of dirty, rotten deal is this?!
- Hold it, Carl, hold it,
- Don't "Carl" me!
I've heard of yellow-Iivered sellouts before,
- but this I don't believe!
- Wait a minute--
What is this
"identity unknown" garbage?
Where is my story?
- You want your story?
- Yeah,
AII right,
I'II give you your story,
AII 20 copies,
- Twenty copies?!
- That's all we got printed before Crossbinder stopped 'em,
What are you so surprised about?
I'm the dummy!
I thought they'd print all that!
Why didn't you print it?
You're the managing editor!
What's wrong with you?
You think there's any difference between this town and Vegas?
But they saw it, Tony!
They all saw it!
Even Shubert saw it!
No one in Seattle is going to admit that a dead man's roaming around their city killing people since 1889, but I was stupid enough to think that they would!
So, this is it, huh?
And I'm out of a job,
That right, Vincenzo?
That I feel bad about, Carl,
Why should you feel bad, Tony?
- You're still working,
- I don't deserve that, Carl,
If you had any guts Ieft, any at all,
- you'd go upstairs and--
- AII right! I've had enough!
So have I! Don't ever do me any more favors!
Do you any favors?
- You miserable, ungrateful--
- Ungrateful?!
What do you want me to do, thank you?!
No! Just get outta here, Get out!
And next time, you do me a favor, hear?
You see me again, just keep walkin'!
With pleasure!
And thanks, Vincenzo,
Thanks for nothin'!
Hello?
Oh, yes, sir,
Yes, Mr, Crossbinder,
Right, I'II be right up,
There it is, another tale of defeat snatched from the jaws of triumph, another case of virtue unrewarded, of dishonesty being the best policy,
- injustice rampant--
- Will you shut up and put that recorder away and Iet me get some sleep?
You're never gonna get that story published,
Don't tell me what
I'm gonna get published,
- Nobody's gonna kill this story,
- It's already been killed,
- Bury it,
- Not this one, no, sir,
I'd Iike to see somebody shut me up on this one,
- Can anybody shut you up?
- You are a passenger in this car,
This is my automobile,
You remember what you said?
"I never wanna see you again,
I never wanna talk to you again,"
- remember?
- Yeah, I remember,
- That was before I was fired,
- Yeah, that's right,
Don't worry about it, you're gonna Iove it in New York,
- New York?!
- New York,
Yup, that's where we're going,
And you're Iucky to be going with me,
I suppose I should consider myself Iucky, too,
- That's right,
- Oh, Kolchak,
Do you know that I have heard just about all
I wanna take from you or even hear ever again?
You think you've got problems?
There I was, one semester shy of getting my degree in Psychology, and what happens?
You show up outside my houseboat one day,
Mouth, all mouth, Kolchak!
Compared to you,
I am tongue-tied,
And before I know what's going on, there I am being yelled at by that-- that captain of police,
Yada, yada, yada,
Peace!
Can I have some peace?
PIease, some peace!
This is a story about two men.
One named Gale Sayers, the other, Brian Piccolo.
They came from different parts of the country.
They competed for the same job.
One was white, the other black.
One liked to talk a lot, the other was shy as a 3-year-old.
Our story's about how they came to know each other...
...fight each other and help each other.
Ernest Hemingway said that every true story ends in death.
This is a true story.
Yo! Heads up!
Here you go.
Thanks.
Gale Sayers?
Brian Piccolo. We met up in Buffalo in that All-American game last June.
Sorry, I didn't remember.
I'm not good at that stuff.
Oh, golly, that's all right.
I can see how you might forget, but I sure couldn't.
That was a heck of a talk we had.
I said, "I'm Brian Piccolo. I hear we'll both be playing for the Bears."
And you said...
I'll never forget it.
You said, "Uh-huh."
Just like that. "Uh-huh."
Whenever I'm feeling kind of low and depressed...
...well, I think about that advice.
A lot of guys wouldn't have talked to me, but not you.
You just said, "Uh-huh."
Just like that. Right out.
Uh-huh.
Where do I check in?
That building over there.
That's where Halas is.
Did you ever meet him before?
Talked to him on the phone a few times.
Yeah, well...
Look, let me give you a little hint, all right?
See, he's...
He's a good guy and all that...
...but he's a little deaf in his left ear...
...and a little too vain to admit it.
So you gotta stand on his right side if you want him to hear you.
Okay, thanks.
You bet.
Rookies gotta stick together.
Pardon me. Can you tell me where
I can find Coach Halas' office?
Thank you.
Come in.
Well, Sayers.
I'm George Halas.
Yeah, I know. I mean, everyone knows who you are.
You're in time to give me a hand with this thing.
My good-luck picture.
That's the first professional team
I ever played on.
The Decatur Staleys in 1920.
How's your leg?
I understand where you...
- I understand you hurt it.
- It's fine. 100%.
And your head?
My head? There's nothing wrong with my head.
Good.
Being in that All-Star game put you three weeks behind.
- Ain't gonna be easy.
- NFL ain't supposed to be easy.
That's right.
Well, all I can promise you is a fair shot.
But you're gonna have a lot of company.
Jon Arnett, Ralph Kurek,
Brian Piccolo.
There's gonna be plenty...
Gonna be plenty crowded out there.
A fair shot is all I want.
Can't ask for more than that.
We plan using our backs as receivers this year.
Did you do much...?
Did you do much pass catching when you were in college?
Yes, sir, I did.
Usually, safety-valve stuff.
Well, I like to keep my backs in a pattern.
Unless the other team's blitzing.
You'll have to watch for that.
Those linebackers. You gotta make sure they're not coming in.
- I know, especially with teams...
- What the hell are you doing?
I don't know what you mean.
I know you got moves, but you don't have to show them to me now.
You're bouncing around here like a pauper in a pay toilet.
Well, I was just trying to get on the side of your good ear.
What are you talking about,
"good ear"?
Brian Piccolo said that...
He said...
Hey, Sayers.
We'll have to stop meeting like this.
My wife's getting suspicious.
Hold it down!
Some of you cats that pulled in today...
...haven't heard what will be expected.
So hold it down and let me talk.
You new guys will get a playbook tomorrow.
It's like the Bible.
You lose your playbook, it's gonna cost you $1000.
I heard this thing twice already today.
Lose your playbook, it'd cost a $1000.
Lose it twice, they feed your foot to the defense.
Would you cool it, please?
I'm just trying to be helpful.
- Well, I don't need your...
- Mr. Sayers!
I mentioned the fine for talking at a meeting. You hear what I said?
No, I did not.
The fine for talking at a team meeting, Mr. Sayers, is $25.
And it's just been laid on you.
Can you dig that?
Yeah.
Sorry, man.
Hold up.
It was brought to my attention that unless Sayers was saying his beads...
...it might be fair if Mr. Piccolo would sing a song.
Say, like, maybe a fight song.
Wake Forest, right, Mr. Piccolo?
That's right.
You can't let it get to you.
It's just a question of style.
Style, I say.
Excuse me.
Oh, here's to Wake Forest
A glass of the finest Red Ruddy
Rhenish filled up to the brim
Her sons, they are many
Unrivaled by any
With hearts o'erflowing
They will sing a hymn
Rah! Rah! Rah!
Wake Forest, rah!
Old alma mater's sons we are
We'll herald the story
And die for her glory
Old Black and Gold is ever waving high
All right.
Let's go to 10 nice and loud.
Start off slowly.
Ready. Exercise.
One, two, three.
One, two, three.
Dig! Dig! What's wrong with you? You're not trying!
You're not trying.
You make me sick!
We're loaning you those uniforms.
Don't you know that?
We'll let you keep them as long as you play like Chicago Bears.
But the minute you start tiptoeing around, we're gonna want them back.
42-trap, Sayers up.
Way to go! Way to go, Gale!
That's more like it.
Good execution, Charley.
That's it.
Two-ninety-two!
Set, hut!
Ready, set...
...go!
Ready, set, go!
I think it's working.
What's working?
I'm getting you overconfident.
Plant. You gotta plant your right foot, boy. That's dumb.
Just practicing the halfback option.
I haven't got the lock that you have on making the team...
...and Halas said that they're gonna use that option a lot this year.
And it's not one of my strong points, understand?
Try going to your left.
They don't look for a right-handed guy to throw, going to his left.
I will, thanks.
Hey, Sayers.
I did say, "Thank you."
I know.
Well, that usually calls for a response like:
"You're welcome," or "How's your mother?"
"How's your mother?"
She's fine. Thank you for asking.
You're welcome.
Hut! Hut!
Okay, first cut.
Where do we start?
Backfield.
- Fenne4?
- Cut.
- Daniels?
- Cut.
Sayers?
Are you kidding?
Charles?
Shoot him. Justifiable homicide.
What about Piccolo?
He's too slow and he's too light, but he hangs in like a terrier.
Let's keep him till the final cut.
Hut! Hut! Hut!
Piccolo, you bonehead, that was fake draw, screen right!
What the hell do you do on fake draw, screen right?
On a fake draw, screen right,
I pick up a linebacker if he's coming.
Unless it's Butkus, then I notify the quarterback to send for a priest.
All right, knock it off.
Don't encourage him.
Let's run that again.
Let's go. Come on.
We're not holding this man up.
I know we're not, that's why we're here.
Don't tell me about the fool, because I was there!
You talk like I'm blind!
Come in.
I saw him.
But he's not giving him pressure.
He didn't at the time.
Hello, Gale.
Come on in, sit down.
You know Ed McCaskey. J.C.
I'll call you back, all right?
You want some iced tea?
Yeah, please.
There you go.
I'll tell you what we wanted to talk to you about.
Well, I'm an old-timer in a lot of ways.
At least that's what some people keep telling me.
But I don't think it's all that common for a man of my age to...
...be used to the way things are.
To be comfortable with things.
What it comes down to is that J.C. Had a notion here...
...and Ed seems to think it's a good idea.
And I guess we are due for some changes around here.
You want me to play flanker, not running back.
No, no, no.
It's not that simple, Gale.
J.C.'s idea, and yes,
I did agree with him...
...'cause that this is 1965.
We'd like the Bears to room together according to position...
...without any regard to race.
So we'd like you and Brian Piccolo to room together.
That's all?
That's what this is about?
Is that all?
Yeah! You had me worried.
I thought it was something really...
This is something "really"
A white man and a black man rooming together hasn't been done before.
You're gonna be called a "Tom" by some blacks...
...and "uppity nigger" by some whites.
When we go on the road,
I'm talking about Atlanta...
...Houston, Miami, New Orleans...
...it ain't gonna be no better in
Detroit, Minnesota or San Francisco...
...or any other town.
You're gonna rock the boat, and people out there are already seasick.
What J.C. Is saying is that there may be some pressures.
Severe ones.
What do you say?
You and me are rooming together.
- Says who?
- Who else?
That's terrific.
It's a shame he couldn't ask me how I feel, isn't it?
You want me out?
I don't want you out, stay.
I guess I'm just...
...steamed at the old man for not putting me in the scrimmage today.
Is that your wife?
She's pretty.
So is yours, and the little girl.
Thanks.
Supposed to call her tonight...
...tell her how I'm going.
That might be the shortest phone call in history.
Maybe not.
Pic...
...they wouldn't room us together unless we both made the team.
That's right.
- Let's go call our wives.
- Wait a minute, I just called!
- Come on, man!
- Out you go.
Congratulations on making the team, gentlemen.
Well done.
Coach Halas kind of frowns on the hazing of new men.
But now that you've made the team, it's like you're one of us.
Welcome to the Chicago Bears!
Pass from Concannon to Sayers, complete for a touchdown for the Bears.
Is playing in the NFL any easier than you thought it'd be?
My first game.
Not exactly an expert.
J.C. Says he hasn't seen anyone carry the ball...
...for the Bears like that since Willie Galimore.
The blocks were there.
That's not what you said last night.
You called the offensive line the "seven blocks of Silly Putty."
You're Brian Piccolo.
Yes, sir, that's right.
Piccolo. P-l-C-C-O-L-O.
You two are the only black and white player rooming together on the team.
Any problems so far?
Not as long as he doesn't use the bathroom.
Pic!
Hey, Gale, when you run...
...do you think about what you're doing, or you just do it?
I just do it.
Start thinking about it, will you?
I want to play some too.
I save it.
Anyway, so...
Concannon calls this trap play.
You know what a trap play is?
I think so.
A trap play is when all the linemen go one way...
...and hopefully, the defense goes the same way. If they do...
...it's a big hole.
If they don't, it's bad news.
Anyway, Concannon calls this trap play...
...and it's beautiful.
43 yards, wasn't it?
And Halas sees he's tired...
...and sends me in.
I go in and he comes out.
Concannon then figures he's gonna get foxy.
You know, Concannon is...
Well, he says, "Same play."
Very same play.
Trap play is also called a "sucker play"...
...because it makes the defense look bad when it works.
And defenses do not like to look real bad. Makes them kind of surly.
All the linemen go this way...
...and it's like I'm looking at a team portrait of the Los Angeles Rams.
Hey, Deacon? Merlin?
How's the family, Rosey?
I was afraid to get up, that not everything would come with me.
You've never seen anyone so black-and-blue in your life!
It's like I'm rooming with a colored player again.
Gale told a joke.
The stone-face from Kansas speaks.
All right!
Hey, Chicago! Chicago!
Sayers speaks! He speaks!
Hey, Black Magic?
Listen to this letter I got.
"You must have been raised with pigs to room with one of those darkies.
You must not have been taught anything when you were a boy.
You must have crawled out from under some slimy rock."
Is that all?
Except the usual: "Love, Mother."
Magic.
- I'm gonna write you a speech.
- What kind of speech?
An acceptance speech for
Rookie of the Year. You can't miss.
I gotta give a speech?
No way.
The man we're honoring tonight was a two-time All-American.
He was the top draft choice of the Chicago Bears of 1965...
...and three times, during the season, he gained 100 or more yards.
Perhaps his best individual performance...
All right, go ahead.
From the top.
I want to thank you all for this honor...
...but I really think it's not right to give it to one man.
Football is a team sport and...
Start from the top. Look up.
Gale Sayers.
I'd like to thank you all for this honor...
...though it's not really right...
Thank you.
Who'd believe it?
I mean, who would ever believe it?
Dumb.
All right, let's go.
On the line: Davis, Turner.
Ready...
...set, go!
Spinny, Lyle!
Ready...
...set, go!
O'Bradovich, Caroline!
Hey, Abe. Since when does a lineman have to race a halfback?
- Race against the clock, not me.
- I still ought to have a handicap.
You said the defensive backfield was your handicap all last year, O.B.
Shut up, Pic.
You're still a rookie to me.
Cut it out.
Pic, get back in line.
Ready, set...
- Did you just get in?
- Yeah.
I would have been in earlier, but my plane got fogged in in Detroit.
You're in good shape.
Worked hard all winter.
Did you talk to Linda?
No, why?
I thought you heard.
Joy's expecting again.
That's great.
If it's a boy, we'd like to name it after you.
- No kidding.
- Got a real nice ring to it.
Spade Piccolo.
Last season is history.
You're gonna run and hit and hurt and run some more.
All right, let's go.
42-trap, Piccolo up.
Brian, that's the way to go!
See, Sayers, that's why you'll never make it.
Pizza has magical properties...
...that give Italians a lot of strength and speed.
A lot of great Italian running backs...
That's right, there are. There's
Leroy Kellian, Lenny Moorinelli.
- Hey, J.C.
- Hey, babe.
Is that Sunday's lineup?
- What's the backfield?
- Concannon, Ralph Kurek...
...and you.
Well, come on, Magic.
Pizza's gonna get cold.
Play pass, be alive!
Be alive!
Everybody, get it in.
Come on, let's go there.
You got him. You got him now!
Bears' ball. First and 10 on the San Francisco 42-yard line.
Come on, Bobby, let's go!
All right, let's go, Bobby!
Let's go!
Yours, Gale. 28-toss.
On three.
That's good. Come on.
- Let me help you.
- No.
- It's just so good to have you home.
- Yeah, it's good to be home.
Can I get you anything?
Nope. I'm fine.
It's almost lunchtime.
Would you like a sandwich?
I'm not hungry. You go ahead.
I left the kids at Joy's, so I'd better go pick them up.
- Will you be all right?
- Yeah.
You sure?
Yes, I'm sure.
Her sons, they are many
Unrivaled by any
With hearts o'erflowing
They will sing a hymn
Rah! Rah! Wake Forest, rah!
Old alma mater's sons we are...
Is that you, Magic?
Yes, it is.
Thought you'd never get here.
- What are you doing here?
- That is not a bad act.
But "Peg Leg" Bates does it better.
What is that thing supposed to be?
That's not supposed to be anything than what it is...
...which is a leg-lift machine.
- Well, what for?
- What for?
Getting that knee back in shape won't be a take-it-easy proposition.
If you're afraid, I mean, that's understandable.
I'm not afraid.
You ought to be afraid.
I'm not afraid. I'm just tired of being bugged by reporters, Linda, you!
You know, you are a real charmer.
An absolute saint.
Maybe you think it's friendly...
You can stick that in your ditty bag too, you dumb jackass.
You know, Gale...
...when I was in high school...
...I was one of the best backs in the state.
Unfortunately for me...
...the best back in the state,
Tucker Frederickson...
...went to the same school.
The colleges used to come down and watch us play.
Old Tuck, he wound up at Auburn...
...and I wound up at Wake Forest.
Good school. Nice place...
...but not exactly center ring, you understand?
I worked my tail off at Forest.
In my senior year...
...I led the nation in rushing and scoring.
I mean, I led the entire nation.
So I go look for a pro team, and I pick the Bears.
Now who else comes to the Bears?
Mr. Sayers.
Big gun from a big school.
I'm number two all over again.
Well, old buddy...
...l'm number one guy now...
...but for all the wrong reasons.
Unless you come back 100 percent...
...people are gonna say:
"Piccolo got in on a pass.
Lucky break."
I don't want it like that.
I'm gonna whip you, Sayers.
But you gotta be at your best, or it won't mean a thing.
You're not gonna be one second slower or one degree weaker.
I am gonna work your tail off to get that leg back in shape...
...for my sake. You got that?
Now for sports. In Los Angeles, the Chicago Bears trimmed the Rams...
...by a score of 17-16.
Quarterback Jack Concannon was 8 for 14 passing...
...and the running game was ably manned by Brian Piccolo...
...who gained 105 yards in 14 carries.
Piccolo was awarded the game ball.
Also on the West Coast, the San Francisco 49ers...
- Hello?
- Dr. Fox? This is Brian Piccolo.
- How's he doing?
- Pretty well, Brian, I think.
Though it's boring going through those exercises by yourself.
It's drudgery and it's painful.
A lot of people give up when they're alone in that situation.
Four. That's good, babe.
Five.
No way.
Now don't bone me, man, come on.
Hang tough. Five more and that's it for the night.
Five more. Come on, get tough.
That's six.
Seven.
Get it up. Eight.
No way. No way.
- I can't.
- Can't make it?
Nigger. Chicken nigger.
Pic, don't make me laugh, please!
"I know what I'll do.
I'll call Gale a nigger...
...and he'll do all them reps.
He'll be so mad."
It's too much!
Nigger, nigger!
Lay off. What am I supposed to do, call you a wop?
Now that would make me mad.
What are you guys doing?
You wouldn't believe it, baby...
...but Brian tried to call me a nigger!
First man to the stand for a beer?
- All right?
- You're on.
I think I owe you a beer.
I think...
...I owe you a lot more than that.
Two beers, please.
You're healthy.
You think training camp is some kind of a country club?
Is that what you think?
Because no man's assured of a job around here.
And if you think you are, you've got another thing coming.
Get them up!
Get them up! Get them up!
Come on, Pic. Come on, Pic.
Get them up.
Come on, Billy, lift them up.
Come in.
- Hey, Brian.
- Oh, hello, coach.
- Mind if I come in?
- Oh, no, not at all.
Gale, how's the knee?
Fine. Real strong.
Excuse me, coach, if you want to talk to Gale here, I'll just...
No, actually I want to talk to the both of you.
Well, how things look this year, coach?
Good. Real good.
Matter of fact, there's one boy
I'm very impressed with.
I wouldn't be surprised to see him replace you as number two halfback.
Because I'm gonna make you number one fullback.
Hey, Pic! You and me, starting backfield. What do you say?
Coach, I didn't think it was possible...
...but you finally found a way to shut him up.
Touchdown, Piccolo.
Sixty yards and a touchdown for Gale Sayers.
- Hey, Pic?
- Yo.
You know you got a 4.3 rushing average?
No, but hum a few bars, and I'll see if I can fake it.
Oh, Pic!
Touchdown, Piccolo.
Two hundred and forty-one.
Holloway.
Holloway: 251.
- Piccolo.
- Big Abe.
Scrimmage gonna teach us new trick plays?
Only trick I'd give you is how to keep meat on. You're down another pound.
What's there is all choice.
2061/4. Skinniest fullback in the league.
What's the matter with you?
You sweat all the fat off of us...
...then complain we're too thin.
You're hard to please.
Get out of here.
Sayers.
Tell your Italian buddy to load up on the pasta.
Maybe he wants to be quicker.
Ten pounds lighter. A half a second slower in a 40-yard sprint.
It ain't working.
Come on, Brian, hit that hole!
Hit it!
What's wrong with you, Piccolo?
Listen, Gale, is he really hurting?
He's gotta move.
He's not hitting!
Come on, baby, we gotta get it!
Come on, baby, come on!
- Nice block.
- Thanks.
There must be 90 million pounds of pollen in the air.
You ought to get Dr. Fox to give you something for that hay fever.
He did. The only thing
I'm allergic to is Nitschke.
Come on, stick it in their ear!
Good game.
Looking at you...
...l'd never know we won the game.
I don't feel very much like a winner about now.
Why not?
Gale, I'm sending Brian Piccolo back to Chicago.
He's not gonna finish the road trip with us.
Ralph Kurek's gonna start next week.
But why?
Because I've always had a policy on this team from the start.
Best players play. No exceptions.
Right now, Kurek's the best player.
A lot of guys take a while to get started.
And Piccolo's never been one of those guys.
He's always been in shape.
Willing to give 100%.
He's not doing that anymore, and that's what worries me.
I don't know what it is.
Could be something physical...
...or it might be an emotional disturbance.
Something with his wife, children...?
Pic? Come on!
Something's taken the edge off him.
And I gotta find out what that something is.
For his sake, as well as the team's.
- When's he gonna find out?
- Abe's telling him now.
That's why I didn't want you to go back to the hotel right away.
I wouldn't wanna be in Abe's shoes right now.
I wouldn't wanna be in your shoes in 10 minutes.
Who'd believe it?
I mean, really, who'd believe it?
- Halas wants you to see the doctor.
- Halas don't know what he wants.
Gibron's his boy.
You should have heard that lecture.
Wants me to patch things up with Joy.
I say, "Things are fine with me and Joy."
He just smiles that
Father Flanagan smile of his...
...and says I shouldn't be afraid to level with him.
Dear Abby in a jockstrap.
Pic, be fair.
Dr. Fox says that...
Don't give me no crud about our great doctor.
Wants me to get a physical for the cough. No allergy.
"What is it?" I say.
He says:
"Well, it could be a virus.
Could be a staph infection or any one of a thousand things."
Like being treated in a damn Chinese restaurant.
Two from Column A, three from Column B.
He's just trying to help.
I guess you're right.
It's all so pointless, Gale.
I mean, I know perfectly well what's wrong with me.
I think I'm pregnant.
Coach, which end of the field you want me to take if we lose the toss?
Come in, Gale. Close the door.
We just got a call from the hospital.
Brian Piccolo has cancer.
Oh, God.
They've scheduled an operation for tomorrow morning.
An operation to do what?
They're gonna have to remove part of Brian's right lung.
The doctors have no explanation.
It's something that Brian carried around inside him all his life.
What kicked it off?
They don't know.
Whether or not they got it in time...
...l'm afraid they don't know that either.
Who's gonna tell them?
I'll tell them.
No.
I'll tell them.
You, Gale?
That's right, me.
I'll tell them.
Let's go.
May I have your attention a minute, fellas?
Come on over here.
Gale has something he wants to say to you.
You all know that...
...we hand out a game ball to...
...the outstanding player.
Well, I'd like to change that.
We just got word...
...that Brian Piccolo is...
...sick, very sick.
And it looks like...
...he might never play football...
...again.
Or for a long time.
I think we should dedicate ourselves...
...to give our maximum effort to win this game...
...and give the game ball...
...to Pic.
We can all sign it...
...and take it up...
...to the hos...
Oh, my God.
Fantastic! Could you believe it?
Sayers, I mean, you've got some moves on the field, but in a locker room...
...you are one big klutz.
Now listen to me.
Listen now.
When you dedicate a game to someone...
...you are then supposed to go out and win it, idiot.
Pat O'Brien never said,
"Let's blow one for the Gipper."
Man, you are so bad.
We would have won if Concannon called that trap play...
...but he hates to call it without you in there for the repeat.
- Here, Gale.
- Thank you.
Beats ham hocks, don't it?
Anybody wanna see my scar?
- Out!
- What's matter?
Out, now! No discussion, out.
We just got here!
See you later, guys.
Thanks for coming.
- You just gonna lay there?
- J.C., hang on to this, will you?
Later, Pic.
Take Gale down and have him give that little girl his autograph.
A little girl I met the day I came in...
...had her operation the same day I did.
Told her I'd give her your autograph.
You don't mind, do you?
No problem. I'll be glad to.
All right. Take off.
- It's time now, Mrs. Piccolo.
- Thank you.
I'll be right back.
Won't you?
May I help you?
My name is Mrs. Piccolo.
My husband's a patient on the third floor...
...and he told me about a little girl, Patti Lucas...
...who wanted this gentleman's autograph.
Mrs. Piccolo, Patti isn't with us anymore.
- Do you have a home address?
- Mrs. Piccolo, Patti...
My husband wanted her to have the autograph very much.
Come on.
Mrs. Piccolo, Patti's dead.
She passed away early this morning.
Nothing wrong with that knee, I tell you.
Congratulations, Dr. Piccolo.
Do you know what, Joy?
I've been thinking.
What with Gale healthy, and Ralph Kurek healthy...
...l'm gonna have a tough time getting back in that lineup next year.
So I was thinking...
...what's so difficult about being a kicker?
I just wonder if it's something you can teach yourself.
Because you don't need a great amount of wind...
...or stamina or size.
What do you think of my brainstorm, old Gloomy Gus?
Well, I don't know, Brian.
I'm no expert on kickers and things.
You just run an end run
Red Grange would be proud of.
Don't make fun of me, Brian.
I'm scared.
What of?
You can't be serious.
You know perfectly well what of.
No, I don't.
I swear to God, I don't, honey.
Now, look, I'm...
...no idiot.
This thing I got is bad, I know that.
It's just a detour, Joy.
I'm not gonna let it stop me.
I'm just not. There's no way.
I got too much to do yet, Joy.
Pick it up.
Pick it up, you dummy!
Mr. Piccolo, calm down.
Calm down?
How do I calm down?
You'd think the ball was wearing a white sheet.
I was gonna catch it, but when it started coming down, I said to myself:
"I wonder what Pic would do in a situation like this."
And dropping it seemed to be the answer.
- At least you won a game.
- That's right.
You didn't dedicate this one to me?
Nope. Dedicated it to Butkus.
Why?
Because he threatened us.
How are you? Seriously.
I'm hanging in there, Magic.
Just doing what they tell me to do.
Listen...
...will you do me a favor?
You got it. Name it.
Call Joy, will you?
When she left here tonight...
...she was really down.
I never saw her that down.
I'll call her as soon as I get back.
Thanks, I appreciate it.
Phone call for Mr. Sayers.
Lady says it's an emergency.
She seemed very upset.
- I'll take it.
- I hope I did the right thing.
I'm sure you did.
Thank you very much.
From Joy Piccolo.
I know it's awful to ask you to come here in the middle of the night, but...
It doesn't bother us, so don't let it bother you.
Why don't you just say it?
They found more of the tumor.
They told me this morning that they want to operate again.
I was going to tell Brian...
...but I just couldn't, Gale.
I mean, I don't know whether or not he can take the disappointment.
And if he can't...
...I know I can't.
The doctor is going to tell him in the morning.
And if you could be there, Gale...
...it might help.
I'll be there, Joy.
What'd you try?
End run.
I had my linebackers in a blitz.
All right.
Well, did you gain or what?
Come in.
I'm sorry if I'm disturbing anything.
Come on in. Not at all.
I can beat him later.
What can I help you with?
I know this is a bother at a time like this, Mr. Piccolo...
...but hospitals have rules and regulations, you see.
I need your signature on this.
What is it?
The doctor has been here, hasn't he?
He's talked to you?
No. Why?
- I'll step back a little later.
- No, wait.
What would the doctor have to say to me?
Mr. P...
Talk to me, Magic.
The tests show...
...there's more of the tumor than they thought, Pic.
They have to operate again.
So if you'll just sign this consent, Mr...
Putting this off...
I said, "No!" Are you deaf?
Mr. Sayers, can't you talk to your friend?
Mr. Eberle...
...I think I'd rather talk to you.
Brian is a professional athlete,
Mr. Eberle.
A professional gets into a habit after a while.
He gets himself ready for a game...
...mentally as well as physically.
Because he knows those two things are all tied up together.
And there's a clock inside...
...and when the game starts...
...he's 100% mentally and physically.
And what Brian is saying...
...is that you're scheduling the game before he can get ready.
Couldn't it wait until over the weekend?
Yes, it could...
Then let it.
First thing Monday morning,
Mr. Piccolo.
I'll see you then.
Thanks, Magic.
No sweat.
Looks like I scored a touchdown.
Mr. Piccolo, we're gonna put you to sleep now.
That could be...
...the worst choice of words
I've ever heard in my life.
The winner of this year's George S.
Halas Most Courageous Player award:
Gale Sayers.
I'd like to say a few words about a guy I know, a friend of mine.
His name is Brian Piccolo...
...and he has the heart of a giant...
...and that rare form of courage which allows him to kid himself...
...and his opponent.
Cancer.
He has the mental attitude...
...which makes me proud to have a friend who spells out courage...
...24 hours a day, every day of his life.
Now you flatter me...
...by giving me this award.
But I say to you, here and now...
...Brian Piccolo is the man of courage who should receive...
...the George S. Halas award.
It's mine tonight...
...and Brian Piccolo's tomorrow.
I love Brian Piccolo.
And I'd like all of you to love him too.
And tonight, when you hit your knees...
...please ask God to love him.
Hi, Magic.
How you doing, Pic?
I'm hanging in there.
I heard what you did at...
...that banquet last night.
If you were here I'd kiss you.
I'm glad I'm not there, then.
Hey, Gale, they...
...tell me you gave me a pint of blood. Is that true?
Yep.
That explains it then.
Explains what?
I've had this craving for chitlins all day.
I'll be there tomorrow.
See you then.
All right.
I ain't going anywhere.
How is he, Linda, really?
Hurry, Gale. Please hurry.
Brian, Gale's here.
Hello, Black Magic.
You're so bad.
A racist, that's all you are.
Just a bigot from head to toe.
You better believe it, man.
How you doing, Pic?
It's fourth and eight...
...and they won't let me punt.
Go for it, then.
I'm trying, Gale.
Jesus, God, I'm trying.
Remember you got me with those mashed potatoes?
You deserved it.
The way you sang that dumb fight song.
And that 32-trap play.
Remember?
I'm gonna...
...get you next training camp.
I'm gonna get you.
I'll be waiting.
I'm feeling a little...
...punk.
So I think I'll...
...try to get some sack. Okay?
I'll see you tomorrow.
If you say so.
I love you, Brian.
I love you.
Who'd believe it, Joy?
Who'd ever believe it?
Brian Piccolo died of cancer at the age of 26.
He left a wife and three daughters.
He also left a great many loving friends...
...who miss him and think of him often.
But when they think of him, it's not how he died that they remember...
...but rather how he lived.
How he did live.
It's my favorite, mother.
I baked it myself.
I want today to be..
...very special.
Fine young man.
I'm very proud of you.
One day you'll be a famous doctor.
But that's ten years away.
You keep delaying any treatment.
Mother, you should...
There are so many incompetents...
Of course when you are away at college..
...I'll be very lonely.
You know, dinner was delicious and you know how much
I love chocolate cake.
It's hard to believe that..
...this will be your last year of high school.
Hm. Well, we both must enjoy it.
Well, I'm, I'm lucky to have you to worry about me.
We're both very fortunate..
...to have each other.
Eh, you know besides this being your birthday today..
...well, um..
...tomorrow is another anniversary of sorts.
Ten years ago tomorrow your father and I were divorced.
Never could understand why he hasn't come to see me.
Oh, uh..
Well, I-I was entitled to alimony..
...for all the trouble
I was subjected to.
But I waived it..
...on the condition your father give up custody
and visiting rights.
Armand was very excited saving all that money.
I don't think he ever cared about me at all.
It's incredible.
It has everything.
Oh, but the salesman assured me it was the finest.
But you shouldn't have spent so much money.
Wow! Now I can illustrate my story.
I don't want you occupying all your time with those extraordinary visions of fantasy.
Atranta is not fantasy, it's real.
You'll see.
- Where are you off to?
- Oh, I won't be long.
I'm going over to Laurie Matthews.
You shouldn't waste your time with someone who doesn't care.
Laurie, uh, there's someone here to see you.
It's only water.
Some people even wash with it,
Ronald.
- Hi.
- Ronald, what do you want?
Well, I was just wandering around and I thought
I'd come by and see what you were doing?
Swimming.
Come on in, Ronald.
If you can swim, I mean.
Or if you can't.
Would you like to go to the movies?
There's a good double feature playing.
I can't.
I'm doing something else.
- Good joke.
- We'll see you later, Ronald.
Yeah, bye, Ronald. Too bad that you can't stay so long.
Take care. Stay dry.
Don't forget to shut the, uh, gate.
From the outside, Ronald.
Oh.
- Don't touch me.
- I was only gonna help you up.
Now look what you did, it's brand new, I'm a mess.
Why didn't you get out of my way?
Well, I didn't see you.
You should watch where you're going, Carol.
You sure are dressed up.
Still trying to impress Laurie?
Well, you should know she only likes football players and besides you're weird, Ronald.
I am not weird.
Yes, you are, and so is your mother.
I want you to say you're sorry.
I want you to say you're sorry.
Let go of me.
Say you're sorry.
Let go of me, Frank's gonna get you for this.
Say you're sorry.
Wake up.
Why aren't you fooling?
I'm sorry.
I'm sorry.
I'm sorry.
Ronald?
Ronald?
Where have you been all this time?
Matthews, I told you
I was going there.
What happened to your jacket?
- I tore it on a fence.
- What has happened? Ronald?
Tell me.
Now, it can't be that bad.
It's worse.
Much worse.
I don't even know how to tell you.
Tell me, try.
I killed Carol Matthews.
She said terrible things about me.
I couldn't believe she was dead.
It was an accident.
I found a shovel..
...and I buried her.
If it was an accident why did you bury her?
That's what the police will ask.
Ronald, you've made a terrible mistake.
I was scared.
I don't wanna go to jail.
If only you hadn't buried her we probably could've proven your innocence.
But now we, we can't afford the chance.
Well, if only you listened to me.
None of this would have happened.
So many times
I have warned you about those girls.
And now..
What are they gonna do to me?
If you are convicted there'd be no mercy for you.
You could spend the rest of your life with de-degenerates in jail.
And even if you're acquitted the publicity would ruin your chances for a medical career.
O-okay, i-if you run away..
...alone.
They'd catch you.
I-it's a terrible mess.
I wish it never happened.
I don't wanna go away alone.
Oh, I know, dear.
Well, I don't want you to leave.
We'll have to hide you..
...until things quiet down.
By then, I should have enough money saved.
Uh, it would be a matter of moving.
Of starting life again.
Maybe I should turn myself in.
No!
Just listen to me.
You should know I'm only concerned for your safety.
Well, what if it doesn't work?
What if they catch me?
Now listen and get a hold of yourself.
The police eventually will come around to you.
A-a-and we don't have any time.
Now if we don't have confidence in each other..
...you won't have a chance.
What about the shed?
That's the first place they'll look.
I used to hide in the attic.
No, you're not thinking, Ronald.
The bath.
It's perfect!
Get your toolkit.
Look..
...you'll be able to live in decency and cleanliness.
You'll have plenty of room and no one will know.
We've got some old plaster board and some extra wallpaper upstairs.
Now take off the door.
We'll have to work through the night.
We must be careful not to leave any track.
I think it's undetectable.
Absolutely.
It's the perfect illusion.
How long will it be before it's safe to leave?
I don't know. Probably a couple of months at least.
We have no choice but to be patient.
Well, I hope it won't be that long.
As soon as it's possible, we'll leave.
Until that time, your daily activities will be quite normal.
Have you got everything inside?
You must learn to be quiet.
I must be the only one who knows you're here.
Now, get back inside.
I hinged the door from inside.
The latch is in place.
Well, it's a fine job, Ronald.
Um, two knocks will mean danger and uh, four, safe.
Close the door.
Mrs. Wilby?
Yes. What do you want?
Oh, uh, we're from the police, Mrs. Wilby.
I'm Sergeant Lynch, this is Sergeant Tyler.
Can we come in?
Thank you.
Is Ronald Wilby your son?
Of course he's my son.
He's a wonderful boy.
Can we sit down?
What is it about Ronald?
Well it's official business,
Mrs. Wilby and not very pleasant.
I should advise you it'll be wise to have a lawyer present while we'll be questioning Ronald.
Ronald isn't here.
Uh, he, he left, night before last.
Uh, quite upset I guess
He really wasn't himself.
I've been waiting for him to return.
- Where is he?
- I don't know where he is.
Has anything happened to him?
Um, ma'am, uh, yesterday evening a young girl,
Carol Matthews was found dead behind the Hastings place.
and she was buried in a shallow grave and we estimate she died between 5:00 and 7 p.m. the night before that.
Now we know Ronald left the Matthews house
around 5 p.m. that night.
Did he come home anytime around 7:00?
That's absurd.
What nerve you have..
...making such accusations.
Well, we're not accusing
Ronald of anything.
Ronald would never do such a thing.
He's a gentle person.
Well, do you mind if we could look around?
Of course I do.
But you're wrong.
Uh, look around as much as you like.
But please don't mess up the place.
My son is not a killer.
But he is missing, ma'am.
Teenagers are always running away.
Do you recognize this coat, ma'am?
Obviously, you got it from Ronald's room.
It does belong to him.
Yes, it belongs to him.
Well, we found a smutch of clothing caught on a fence in the Hastings house.
And it looks like it'll match this tear.
That doesn't prove a thing.
This coat fits the description of what he was wearing when he left.
There's also some trace of blood.
Some soil in the pad of his tennis shoe.
It looks pretty much like the stuff where we found the girl.
- And there was a note.
- Note?
"Dear mother,
I've done something awful.
"I'm very sorry to cause you unhappiness.
Ronald."
We found it in his room.
Well, he ha-hasn't confessed anything.
The young girl was always teasing the boy.
Now, if Ronald killed the Matthews girl..
...he should be caught.
My son is a decent human being.
Ma'am, you're divorced from his father?
Yes, and how would you know that?
Your neighbor,
Mrs. Schumacher, ma'am.
She was trying to be helpful.
Always got her nose into everyone's business.
Is Ronald likely to contact him?
Hardly. He has no affection for his father.
Do you have any idea where he might go?
None.
You didn't have to knock.
I knew there wasn't anyone here.
Practice is important.
It's now a matter of survival.
Ronald, that note was a brilliant idea.
They'll be sure you've run away.
I'm sorry
I made all this trouble.
Everything will work out as long as we're careful.
Look, you must stay in the lair until we leave.
Mrs. Schumacher is watching our house like a hawk.
Alright. Now close the door.
- Good morning, dear.
- Good morning.
Did you sleep well?
Yeah.
- Mother?
- Get back inside!
I'm alright.
Don't forget your exercises after breakfast.
If you don't keep fit, your health will deteriorate.
All will be for nothing if we don't heed the rules.
Today I begin drawing
Princess Fen Seta.
She's the ruler of the Atranta.
She's very beautiful.
Your studies are far more important than fairy tales.
I know, mother.
I'm starved.
Be sure to comb your hair before dinner.
You'll have to store these canned goods inside.
I heard some noises today.
There was someone snooping around outside, I'm sure.
Mrs. Schumacher. She doesn't take her eyes off the place.
I did two sets of exercises.
- It's a lot easier now.
- And your studies?
One chapter of chem and two chapters of trigonometry.
Good.
Hi, may I come in?
- Have you heard from him?
- No.
It's like he vanished into thin air.
Not even a trace.
Well, wherever he is, I..
I hope he lives a good life to make up for what's happened.
Now, that's a noble sentiment, ma'am.
But you know the, uh legal involvement for trying to help him.
Yes, that would be an accessory.
Uh, have you been in touch with his father?
Yes, we have.
He claims to have heard nothing.
Then we take the assertions of a parent with a grain of salt.
Well, what, what was his reaction?
Oh, shocked. Same as you.
I saw Carol Matthews' mother at the market today.
She was very kind.
Her son was with her.
Duane was not at all sympathetic.
He said some very cruel things about you.
He's always said those things about me.
I also saw Dr. Harris today.
He said I had to have an operation on my gall bladder.
Immediately.
So, I'm going into the hospital tomorrow.
I'll be gone just a week.
A week?
Here.
Your meals won't be exciting but you'll be able to feed yourself while I'm gone.
I'll be sure and study.
And exercise.
I know it'll be easy for you to become careless without my attention but you must not break the routine.
Now, close the door.
Mother, I'm afraid.
There is nothing to be afraid of as long as you listen to me.
Now, close the door.
And don't open it until I return.
Mother!
I hardly remember the house.
It's been such a long time.
Mr. Wilby wants to sell the home as soon as possible.
Whatever you don't want goes to charity.
I can't believe she's dead.
It was to have been such a simple operation.
Well, why don't you take a look around?
Make a note of what you want.
And it is very hard for me to think of her as the mother of that terrible boy.
Oh, my!
They didn't stint on space in those days.
Just look at those ceilings.
Oh, it's wonderful.
I've never seen a house with such character before.
Oh..
It's magnificent.
I-I'd like to see the rest of it.
Fine.
Right up the stairs.
- The kitchen's this way.
- Hm.
We need a new kitchen.
And the whole place is filthy.
Well, I admit it's a far cry from being immaculate but it is a bargain.
Yes, except for one thing and I don't understand why would a four-bedroom house just have one bathroom?
Doesn't make sense.
I mean, I grant you it's, it's a large bathroom but, Mr. Roscoe, with three doors.
Bathrooms just weren't that important when the house was built.
N-now, look at those moldings.
Yes, I suppose you're right.
I mean, it's the most wonderful
Victorian house I've ever seen.
But all the work..
Mrs. Wood, with a little sprucing you'll have it restored to perfection.
We're gonna need a new kitchen and certainly a new bathroom.
What about the plumbing in an old house like this?
Mrs. Wood, you'll have it restored to perfection.
It does have great possibilities.
Yeah, it does.
Oh, we need a new bathroom too
but I want the bedroom right upstairs..
- No, I get the one..
- No!
Daddy has something to say.
I don't know.
What do you think?
Well, I don't know either..
I'll stay if you can get rid of the dusty odor.
Musty, ha-ha.
We can, darling, we can.
I-it's interesting.
I guess I just don't like sterile things.
Don't you think it has a lot of character?
Has anybody seen our new neighbor?
She wasn't very friendly when I said hello.
Well, your shyness probably startled her.
Oh, look who's talkin'.
Althea, Ellen, now, come on, ladies.
- It's awfully dreary.
- Mm-hm.
But it does have great possibilities.
Alright... wait a minute.
Wait a minute.
Wait a minute, girls.
Wait a minute, hold it now, h-hold, w-w-wait..
Wait a minute! Hold it!
What is it, darling?
Look, I would, I would like to make a decision today.
Yes, so would I.
So, uh, what do you say?
Well, I'm for it.
- I love it!
- Me too!
- I think it's a crazy house.
- Ugh!
What does that mean?
Like the houses you see in movies.
You watch too much television.
You watch too much television.
Look, most of those old Victorian houses had strange reputations, but they weren't deserved.
Babs! Maybe there's even a ghost or two.
Ooh!
Alright, that's enough, that's enough of that now.
Cut that out.
Now, look, are we for it or not?
I say yes.
- Yeah!
- Yeah.
Babs?
Okay.
Leave me alone.
You're as beautiful as a princess.
You must be the one.
Wait here on the porch for one second..
- Don't throw it hard.
- B-behind the back.
- Can you get it?
- Alright. Yeah.
- Great!
- Hey!
And that was even far off..
- Well, that's good.
- Pretty good.
Daddy!
Hi, baby.
- How are you? Good.
- How's work?
Good, thank you.
Daddy, this is Duane Matthews.
It's a pleasure, Mr. Wood.
So, you are the mystery man, huh?
Sir?
Oh, everyday I come home from work
I find half the garbage has been towed away.
That's a big help, Duane.
Thank you.
- See you, dad.
- Thank you.
Well, it's, it's you daughters, sir.
They're merciless slave drivers.
Are they?
Are you a slave driver?
- No!
- You bet.
It's looking a lot better inside now, huh?
Beautiful!
You know, I'd never know it's the same place.
Yeah, I'll see you later.
Hey, wait till the outside's painted.
Come on!
You know, I think this house is gonna bring us good luck.
Yeah.
Old house like this, you feel like..
- It has its own memories.
- Yeah.
Sort of grows on you.
I must say, at the beginning
I..
...I had my reservations.
So did I.
Especially when they accepted our first offer.
My only complaint is that long line at the bathroom.
Yeah.
Well..
I'll get an estimate first of next week.
But I don't, uh,
I don't know where we'll put it, there's no room upstairs.
Ready.
Everybody at the table, honey.
I'll cut the lamb.
- Ellen, pass these on.
- Okay.
- Duane.
- Who wants what to drink now?
- What do you want to drink?
- I'd like some milk.
- I'll have milk.
- Uh..
Mom,
Duane would like a milk and I'd like
a milk too, please.
- I'm having a milk tonight.
- Pass these on, will you?
Let me, honey, let me have a beer.
I put one in the freezer, see if it's cold.
- Will you, please?
- Yep.
Thank you.
Well, what do you think of our house, Wayne?
Duane, daddy.
Duane, that's what I said.
What do you think of the house,
Duane?
I never thought
I'd be eating here.
Well, why'd you say that?
Oh, I like, I like the house.
It's really nice.
- Why did you say that?
- It's nothing.
You must've had a reason for saying that.
Ronald Wilby..
...he lived here before you moved in.
- So?
- And?
He murdered my sister.
That's right, Ben,
I-I remember reading about that.
This house is evil.
Just like Babs said.
Honey, please. Don't start on that again, alright?
I'm sorry.
It's okay.
Oh, my.
What happened to him?
I don't know.
The police never found him.
Okay. Do we have everything?
Mm-hm.
Everything but the food.
They'll blame this on me too.
Mrs. Schumacher?
Althea, did you hear something break a few moments ago?
Scared me to death.
I didn't hear anything.
Why am I the only one who ever hears anything?
Because you're the only one crazy enough to believe in such things.
Evil spirits.. Babs, come on!
You don't believe in anything supernatural?
I-I didn't say that.
I only think you're getting worked up over nothing.
I hope you make reservations for our trip.
You're always forgetting.
Yeah, I'll take care of it today.
I'll, um,
I'll get those sprinklers too.
Did anybody hear anything break last night?
Like glass?
- No.
- No.
Dad... we've have been preoccupied
with ghosts and spirits ever since we moved in here.
Honey, look, all old houses make noises.
Settling, plumbing, wind going through the shingles and all kinds of noises, you understand?
I heard glass breaking.
I know something broke.
But I didn't see any glass on the floor this morning.
Mm, glad our ghost keeps a tidy house.
Babs, are you possessed?
Hey, look, will you two please stop teasing her?
Dad, she's becoming very funny.
I mean, she keeps hearing noises that nobody else hears.
I don't care about that.
Just take it easy with her, do you understand?
Two eggs?
Ben, you must stop making these nightly raids on the ice-box.
- What?
- Well..
Yesterday, I hard boiled half a dozen eggs for the girl's lunches and now there are only two left, you ate four.
Honey.
I haven't touched the eggs.
Oh, uh, Duane must've been here last night, huh?
Mother, he didn't eat those eggs.
You're always blaming the missing food on Duane.
It's not that, I mean..
I mean...
I just don't think daddy will..
U-uh, i-it's a matter of planning.
I just don't think daddy will admit it.
Look, what is with the boil..
I haven't seen a boiled egg in this house.
What're you talking about?
We've all seen Duane eat.
Look, I must have miscounted.
You know, Duane's in and out of here so often sometimes I wonder, if it's love or hunger that brings him around.
Well, it's certainly not you.
Duane's a very nice young man.
I like him very much.
He's not so nice when he talks about that Wilby boy.
Gives me the shakes.
- Mother!
- Mm-hm.
- Mother?
- I'm here.
Somebody tried to open my diary.
What?
Somebody tried to open my diary.
Don't get me involved.
You think I tried to get into your diary?
I didn't say that.
I said "Somebody."
- That's all I said. Well..
- But you mean me.
Well, Ellen, I'm not interested in your damn diary!
That's enough!
A little less tantrum and a little more fact.
There has to be an explanation.
Well, I wouldn't touch it.
Well, if you didn't touch it, who did? Mom...
I said no more screaming!
Maybe we do have a ghost.
What was that?
- What?
- Did you hear something?
No.
Maybe this house is getting to me too.
Do you suppose all children
Bab's age are that emotional?
Well, Babs is famous for her pranks.
Mm, maybe this wasn't a prank it was much too sly for that.
I mean, if Babs wanted to know something all she would've had done was ask Ellen.
That's what I don't understand, it's all so...
Honey, look, we've had more than our share of these sibling calamities, uh..
They always seem to work themselves out.
I'm sure by the time we get back from the trip we'll have nothing but everlasting peace.
Well, I hope so.
Well, don't worry about a thing, we'll take care of everything.
I'll call you when I know where we're staying.
I hate not having a reservation.
Have a great weekend.
We'll be back late Sunday night.
Oh! Your restless father.
See you later, Babs,
I'll be at Judy's till 6:00.
Okay, bye!
Anyone home? Hello!
Hello?
- Hi, darling, it's me.
- Oh, hi, mom.
Just checking in before dark we got another 100 miles to go.
Just enjoy yourself and quit worrying about us.
We're gonna be staying at the Sea Side Inn and I won't call again.
We'll be back tomorrow night, late.
Okay, have a good trip, and don't worry.
- Bye darling. Love you.
- Goodbye, mom.
No, don't yell!
Promise me you won't yell.
- Not one more sound or I'll...
- You'll kill me?
No, I never killed anyone.
I'm not that kind of person.
If my father catches you, he'll...
He won't be home till Sunday night.
How did you know?
I'm Prince Norbert, ruler of Atranta.
I know everything.
You..
You did that?
Why?
To please the princess.
Atranta's a beautiful place.
You see, Princess Fenseta..
...falls in love with Prince Norbert.
Norbert's a fugitive from the land of tyrants.
Y-you..
You're Ronald Wilby.
Aren't you?
I said my name is Norbert.
Now, your family has been spending too much time with the evil duke.
I want you to come with me.
Where?
To Atranta.
Oh, please..
Mrs. Schumacher!
Mrs. Schumacher!
Operator!
Princess.
Mama. Mama. Mama.
Mama. Mama. Mama.
Let me out!
Babs?
Babs?
Excuse me a second.
Babs, I'm home!
Duane?
Yes?
Duane, she's gone.
What?
Babs, she ran away.
I found this note in her type-writer.
"Dear, everybody, nobody trusts me
"and I can't stand it anymore.
"I'm going away for a while.
Don't worry. Babs."
Well, I guess she did break into your diary.
Why would she run away?
Duane, she didn't run away.
She was probably just too embarrassed to admit it.
She's never that embarrassed.
She's always the first one to talk about anything.
Even if she's wrong.
Well, then I think we should call the police.
The evil duke is spoiling everything.
Let me out. Someone.
Please, let me out.
Well, the place sure looks nice.
Heh.
Real dreary it was when
Mrs. Wilby lived here.
I get the feeling you're gonna tell us there's nothing to worry about.
Look, she stood up a date with Jimmy Carter.
Not even a call.
Well, you all agree she was upset about the diary.
I think someone forced her to write that note.
And then they took her away.
I have chased, maybe 200 girls who left home on their own free will.
Well, then, why didn't she take any clothes or money?
There's no rhyme or reason.
Usually you'll find out when they return.
Or it's something as ridiculous as the diary.
When are your parents returning?
Tomorrow night.
They went up to the coast.
They said they'd call and let us know
when they're coming home.
Okay, just have them give me a call, will you?
- Aren't you gonna...
- I think..
That a good night's rest will settle everyone's mind.
And she'll probably be back before morning...
What if she has been kidnapped?
We're talkin' about a capital offence.
We can't search every house on County without something to go on.
That letter is not gonna do it.
- Who's hungry?
- I am.
Do you wanna go get some hamburgers?
- I'll go get 'em.
- Uh, no, that's okay.
Um, you stay here.
- I'll go.
- No, Duane.
You wanna watch the game.
Althea and I'll go.
Are you sure?
May I please have the car keys?
I like mine rare with onion rings.
- We'll be back in a while.
- Thanks.
Brock.
Brock at the right side of the key.
Brock looking for a shot..
...and a 20-foot jumper and he hit..
And here is the shot..
And it is good! It's a free..
Oh, it's a foul on the play..
Here comes Tex.
Hopkins to Kelly.
Feeding it into McBride.
McBride on the right side.
The big guy Mark right at the center on top of the key.
Passed over to Ray,
Ray sending a pick now
as he gives off on the give and go to Kelly.
Kelly shoots and hits the 15-footer!
Ray to Helms, Helms to Gros
And they're looking for a shot now.
They wanna get the good percentage shot.
That's what they're looking for, the coaches are set to see
Tex Tags have a very tough defense
so don't take any cheap shots
making sure he's got a good one.
Duane, we're back.
Forty. Very close ball game..
Brock to McBride,
McBride passing it
into the middle to Ray, Ray trying to work in for a shot
and he slam dunks it!
And so, the margin is five points..
He's disappeared, just like Babs.
Now, tell us what you're gonna do.
No calls?
Not unless someone called while we were out.
Well, we have a few prints.
We'll have a confirmation by morning.
What if it is Ronald Wilby?
There's no reason for him to come back here with his mother dead.
Maybe he never left.
Ronald Wilby?
He'd be picked up in an hour if anyone saw him.
Wouldn't you be more comfortable if you spent the night at a hotel?
No.
Althea, he'll get in like the last time.
Not if you don't open the door.
- We'll stay.
- Look..
We'll lock every door and window in the house.
You'll be absolutely safe as long as you stay inside.
We won't take our eyes off the place.
Girls, you don't have to stay.
If anyone is watching,
I want him to think that he can get right back into the house.
Like he did before.
You're an intruder in Atranta.
Soon, I will banish you.
What was that?
I don't know.
Althea, wait.
Mother!
Mother!
- Oh! Oh, my God!
- Babs!
Oh, God!
- I was so worried about you.
- Are you okay?
I know.
Hello?
You weren't at work today, were you, Elizabeth?
Waiting for my call?
Look, you've won
I'm leaving
Don't go
Come to the window
All those windows out there,
I'm behind one of them
What do you want?
I've had it I'm getting out
Don't leave me, Elizabeth
Where are you going?
Somewhere you'll never find me
I'll find you I don't give up
Sweet dreams, Elizabeth
How many?
Two thousand tenants.
Fascinating.
In addition, we can handle up to 5,000 visitors a day.
That's a lot of people to have over for drinks.
You have 80 miles of wiring, piping, cables...
- In this apartment?
- No, over the whole building.
That's a relief.
There's a restaurant in the foyer which serves what we consider the finest seafood.
We also have a gift shop and a wedding chapel.
- Mother will like that.
- Oh, Mother wants you married, huh?
Mother wants herself married.
It's looking pretty good now that she's got this aluminum siding salesman from Toronto.
I think they're going to move here.
She wants to be close to me.
Maybe we can show her one of our two-bedroom apartments.
Well, I'm afraid not.
I was lying.
No aluminum siding salesman. No mother.
I've developed this strange sense of humor and it sometimes gets me into trouble.
- Trouble?
- You don't have to worry.
I'm actually just a normal person.
I work hard, I take showers,
I turn the radio down after 10:00.
I won't tell jokes to the neighbors.
The building is equipped for change.
For instance, if you're in a westerly room and you're exposed to the setting sun, our computers increase the flow of air-conditioned air.
So your temperature is always perfect.
There's no comparable building anywhere.
How about that one?
Oh, you know, that building doesn't look as tall.
Probably doesn't even have one computer.
Honestly, I love it.
It'll be like living in the top drawer of a glass box.
I'll take it.
Hello, little Cyclops.
Welcome to your new home.
Don't forget, you're supposed to take the curse off the Ionely nights.
Lonely nights and Ionely days coming your way.
Cut it out, Michaels.
Hello, L.A.
This could be the start of a meaningful relationship.
Mr. Frimkin? Hello, I'm Leigh Michaels.
Fine, thank you. And you?
Yes. I worked at WXN, New York, for five years.
Uh-huh. I was born in Carthage, New York.
I'm 29 and I'm single.
I hope that's not going to be a problem,
Mr. Frimkin.
Being single, I mean.
Yes, I did. NYU.
Yes, that's right. They have an excellent school of journalism.
Uh-huh. Now, I've heard that Potsdam had a very good school also.
What year was that?
Ought-six?
Uh-huh.
Well, that would make you in your late 80s, isn't that correct?
Because that means you won't be hitting on me, will you?
You will?
Stranger in town.
Pardon me?
Oh, of course, I have lots of ideas for new programming.
For instance, instead of the same old movie reviews, how about a Chicano who only reviews Westerns?
We could call it "Rio Taco" or "Bite the Burrito."
- Of course I can start right away...
- But what? Get me that copy fast.
I don't know your cameraman, your board, your format.
Two cameras, one kitchen set and a cook.
Whatever happened to on-the-job training?
We're a small station in a big market.
This is it.
- Your new home.
- Now wait...
I can't, you can't.
- Where am I?
- Just forget everything?
I haven't unpacked, I almost greased three boy scouts and a pimp on the way over here,
I haven't shown anyone my résumé,
I could be a janitor.
- What am I looking at?
- Your SA, your PL button.
I don't believe this is happening.
I have 45 minutes till my next interview.
- Leigh Michaels.
- Sophie.
- You got 15 seconds.
- No!
You're right, 12 seconds.
We've got a four-second station I.D., fade in to camera one, you're on your own.
Camera one, ready to fade up.
Slice each kidney into four,
and we cut up the bacon into one-inch squares
Zoom in, one.
Quarter the onions and part the pieces
Now, they take 5 or 10 minutes and if you want
Zoom in, camera one.
Okay, tighter on the food.
Now we serve with the plain rice and a green salad
Ready, two, for close-ups?
Fifteen seconds to go.
Take two.
Video, check your levels on camera two.
Camera one, swing in for end title card.
Get ready to dissolve.
Serves four people
Dissolve.
Five, four, three, two, one.
We're out.
We got a winner here.
I can feel all the new sets tuning in.
Tomorrow you do the Flaming Chef and the 3:00 News Update.
Be in my office at 4:00 this afternoon.
Does this mean I get the job? Mr. Frimkin?
Frimsin. A man of few words.
I guess you got a new director.
This is it.
No windows, no pictures, and an air-conditioner that won't stop.
Yeah, well, maybe it'll keep me from falling asleep.
- You got a place to live yet?
- Yeah, Arkham Tower.
Fancy.
The only way I could afford it is with the nice, fat bonus they gave me at my last job.
If they were so nice to you, how come you left?
- Who was he?
- Obvious, huh?
Familiar. I've seen the same look in my mirror.
Who was he?
She.
Hmm.
- Don't worry, you're not my type.
- I'm not worried.
- Yes?
Is Miss Michaels there?
Yes, she is. Just a minute.
- It's for you.
- Who knows I'm here?
- They're paging you.
- One?
Mmm-hmm.
- Hello?
Michaels?
Yes, it is.
Hello, is this Leigh Michaels?
Yes. Yes, it is.
I thought so
That's weird.
Our modern, efficient switchboard probably cut you off.
I tell you, sometimes I don't know about this place.
Hello, ladies.
What we don't have in charm, we make up for in Steve.
I want to thank you for helping out in there.
I was really winging it, and I appreciate it.
- I can be helpful in other ways.
- Not really.
I'm afraid so.
How about it, a little after-hour orientation?
No, thank you. Thanks, but, no thanks.
Shouldn't make a big mistake like this on your first day.
No, thank you.
- How about dinner tonight?
- No, thanks.
Struck out.
Okay, but...
I won't give up.
Hound dog.
That's just the beginning.
He's like a Mountie.
Well, this time he's not going to get his whatever.
I gotta go.
I have 45 minutes to put in an appearance at my next interview, and I better go by my apartment.
You know, I think this is gonna work out.
It won't be like New York.
Yeah, that's what I mean.
Hello?
Oh, Mr. Burglar, are you here?
I think it only fair to warn you that I studied with Bruce Lee before he died.
I have a black belt to prove it.
I'll loop it around your neck on the way out.
Let's see, 555-2131, good solid number.
Yes, Mr. Leone, please.
Hello, Mr. Leone,
Leigh Michaels from 4320.
Yes, I just found it. Uh-huh.
When did they put it in?
Well, because they didn't shut my door on the way out.
Oh, you were here and you locked it yourself?
Awfully early to be drinking, isn't it...
No, no, no. You remember me, big joker?
Just a minute, Mr. Leone.
Sorry to keep you waiting.
No, no, everything's fine.
You just seem to have ghosts in the building.
There is no new evidence on Elizabeth Solley,
25 years old, single, a night duty nurse at the Baxter Clinic,
who jumped through a window in her 6th Street apartment,
and plunged nine stories to her death in an apparent suicide
Police confirmed this morning that Miss Solley
had been taking large dozes of sedatives and was frequently absent from
- Hello?
- Hello, Leigh
- Hello, Steve.
- You moved in?
- Yes, I'm getting settled.
- You need any help?
- No, I don't need any help.
- I'm just asking, that's all
- Thank you, but no thanks.
- Come on, Leigh
Hey, listen a minute.
You know what no means, right?
- No, it's okay. Just no.
- Why not?
Steve, no!
Sergeant Preston of the Yukon, all right.
- Hello?
- I got a great idea
- How about dinner tomorrow night?
- No, Steve.
At the tone, the time will be
8:42 exactly.
No date, but at least you know what time it is.
Can't take it, huh? Too bad.
Hello?
The least you can do is some heavy breathing, Stevie
- Good evening, Miss Michaels.
- Hello, Eddie.
That's real class.
A doorman who says good evening.
I come home, I open the door, and the cat throws up on the floor.
Big news.
KXA in Fort Worth offered me a job.
Assistant to the executive in charge of programming.
You can't leave. I'd fall apart.
TV sets all over the city would explode.
- You're right.
- Oozing green slime.
Are you going to take that job in Fort Worth?
It's a definite possibility.
I have friends there.
- Great.
- Nice.
- Very nice.
- Thank you.
Where's the... Never mind, I see it.
It's sickening.
You have a view from every room.
- A letter from New York?
- Listen to this.
"Congratulations. You have won a free six-month vacation to Europe."
Fantastic.
"Once a year, Excursions Unlimited, chooses a recipient
"of their all-expense paid travel incentive vacation,
"designed to promote
Excursions Unlimited.
- "To qualify for your six-month vacation..."
- Oh, here it comes.
"To qualify for your six-month vacation you must identify your destination
"from the vacation presents
"that will be sent to you over the following months.
"Various presents designed for your use and enjoyment
"at a specific European location will arrive under separate cover
"If you correctly identify your vacation destination,
"the all-expense paid trip is yours.
"Yours truly, D.G. Hill."
- It's got to be a pitch.
- Yeah, but for what?
If you tell them where they're going to send you, they send you there.
- It can't be real.
- It looks real.
Just some strange garbage.
And speaking of strange garbage, let's eat.
- Well, hi, pretty lady. Buy you a drink?
- No, thank you.
Okay. Later.
Much later.
Hello.
I'm Leigh Michaels.
Paul Winkless.
Well, it's very nice to know you, Paul.
Hey, there.
Haven't we met before?
Can I buy you a drink?
We'll flip for it.
You're very lucky because I used to have this quarter that had tails on both sides.
- Heads or tails?
- Heads.
Hmm.
White wine, please.
Could I see the quarter?
Uh-uh.
Miss? White wine, please.
Just testing.
Uh-huh. What are you testing?
- I have strange fears.
- Really? What?
Being raped by dwarfs.
You could have been sitting up there on stilts. I had to check.
I understand.
- You know, you're really a little...
- Yeah?
I would say,
- fashion designer.
- You would?
Well, you would have another guess.
Okay, I don't know, cheerleader.
- Close. Proctologist.
- Wonderful.
Would you like to tell me?
I direct live TV.
Seriously?
That's my problem, all right.
Whenever I get around to finally telling the truth,
- no one believes me.
- I believe you.
Uh-huh.
You know, when I was a kid,
I used to go to my mother for problems, you know, boys, grades, stuff.
And she'd say,
"Now, Leigh, there you go being whacky again."
Whacky?
I was the only kid I know with whacky appendicitis.
What?
Well, I've known you about two hours, and I'm already telling you about my appendectomy and my mother.
Yeah, well, that's my job.
Getting to the truth, the absolute truth.
You're working for my mother?
No, actually I work for the Philosophy Department, USC.
- A philosopher?
- That's right.
- An endangered species.
- Yeah.
So how do you do it?
How do you get to the absolute truth, Professor?
I try to be as direct as possible, as in, will you come home with me? Tonight?
Not tonight.
Well, that answers the question.
A question.
I'm not sure about "the" question.
That's my car.
I had a real good time tonight. I really did.
Good.
Hey.
No jokes?
A good comedian knows when to stop.
You're sure about tonight?
I need sleep. Real sleep.
- Can I see you again?
- You're a brave man, and I'm real glad you asked.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Not bad, L.A. Not bad.
Hey!
Hey, don't forget my number.
Hey, Paul?
Paul?
Paul?
Dummy.
You meet a man and suddenly it's all toes.
It's a hell of a life, isn't it?
Hmm...
What have we here, my dear?
A new refrigerator.
Hello?
Present number one
Siberia? Uganda?
Hello?
Miss Michaels, we're checking to see if your air conditioning is still working
My air conditioning? But I...
Sorry to bother you, Miss Michaels.
That's okay, Charlie,
I was getting too clean anyway.
This was left downstairs for you.
- Who brought it?
- I don't know. They left it by my desk.
- Okay, Charlie, I'll catch you later, okay?
- Thank you.
- Hello?
Present number two
I hope it fits
Wasn't so great, was it?
No, no, it was... It was delicious.
Thanks.
- You want some more wine?
- No, thank you.
Hey, what is it? Are you all right?
Yeah, I'm just tired.
I'm tired because I'm working, and I'm working because I'm tired.
I'm just working all the time, I'm sorry.
No. You've been quiet all night.
Okay, Professor, see what you think about this.
And I've been getting some weird phone calls, too.
Nothing exciting, just weird.
When I was in New York, this guy called me and wanted me to take photographs of my underwear and send... Send them to him.
Not me, just my underwear.
Look, do you mind if I hang on to this for a couple of days?
Be my guest.
I'd like to know about it, you know.
Yeah, so would I.
Right. Well, I better go. It's late, and...
- Look...
- No, it's all right.
I just...
I'm really attracted to you, and I don't want you to think that I'm not.
It just takes me a little while, that's all.
I'm not complaining.
I guess I was.
It's just my usual paralysis when I start to like someone.
Who was he?
Well, that's a long story.
Everything about me is a long story.
Well, I've got plenty of time.
Thank you.
- Good night.
- Good night.
You are one of the world's true bozos.
- Hello?
Sweet dreams, Leigh
- Hi, how are you?
- Hi.
I have some bad news, there's no such company.
- Doesn't surprise me.
- I checked with the city.
They'd need a license to operate in Los Angeles, right?
No license, no record of Excursions Unlimited.
Listen, if... If it continues,
I think you should call the police.
What do I say?
Somebody's sending me presents and wants to take me on a six-month vacation? Make them stop?
Look, I have a class. It begins in about 20 minutes. I'll call you. I...
I want to talk to you about this.
Hey, Paul, thank you.
Yeah.
We...
We roll in 20 minutes.
We'd better check these things out.
Yeah. I'll be right there, Sophie.
This is impossible. It's the Roman revenge.
You curl this stuff up against your spoon and then watch it wriggle off.
Smoking your dinner?
Yeah, I'm afraid
I'm not very hungry tonight.
Or yesterday, or the day before.
Yeah, I guess I better watch it or I'll turn into the Thin Man, dry up and blow away.
Look, I know something's wrong.
It's none of my business, but if you want to talk about it, I'm here.
Thank you. That's real kind.
It's never really made you uncomfortable, has it?
- What?
- My preference.
It's nice to have a woman friend who isn't threatened.
Well, I'm with men all the time, and they don't threaten me.
So why should you?
- Excuse me.
- Are you getting any sleep?
Not much.
It's the phone calls, isn't it?
Yeah, letters, presents.
Maybe the creep will take one of his own trips soon.
Is there anything I can do?
What can you do that I can't?
I guess I'm just gonna have to ride it out.
Look, I've got to meet someone, but I can cancel it if you feel like talking.
- You go. It's okay.
- You sure?
Yeah. I should go home, try to get some sleep.
Okay.
- I'll take care of the check.
- Thanks.
- Late date?
- Not exactly.
I've got to decide if there's anything left to salvage here, or if I should really go to Forth Worth.
I'll be home later.
You call me if you need me.
- Yeah.
- Okay, bye-bye.
Can I have the check, please?
What's that?
Pouilly-Fumé Ladoucette. '71.
I didn't order anything.
Compliments of the gentleman at the bar.
- What did he look like?
- Just a man.
- Hello?
I'm sorry you didn't like the wine
Who are you?
Have you started to enjoy the view?
Police Department Tramer speaking
Yes, my name is Leigh Michaels.
I live at 4320 Arkham Tower.
I just received the latest in a series of crank phone calls.
He knows my name, where I live, where I'm working.
- Did he threaten you?
- No, not exactly, but...
I sympathize with you, miss, but I can't send anyone out to check on a phone call
In case he does anything, give us another call
In case he does anything?
I'm sorry, miss
Well, if he kills me, you'll be the first to know!
No!
Yes. Yes, I changed my number, and I'm still getting the calls.
Twice a day, two, day and night.
Well, if I keep a written log, how long will it take to get the authorization?
One week? But...
Yes, yes, I understand, but in the meantime...
All right.
Never mind.
Every time the phone rings
I think I'm going crazy.
Every time I go outside
I wonder if he's watching me.
It's all right. It's all right.
I'm gonna go to the police.
I already did that.
This time it's my turn.
This is not gonna go on.
It's all right. It's all right.
Don't call them now
- Please stay with me tonight
Of course
What time is it?
Hi.
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to wake you.
It's 6:30.
Why so early?
I have a class at 7:30. Aesthetics.
You believe that?
I was hoping we could get in with some little extracurricular activities.
- Tonight, all right?
- You're on.
Oh...
I'm gonna call Gary Hunt at the LAPD today.
I think we should speak with him.
- Can you see him tomorrow?
- Sooner the better.
What are you smiling at?
- You better go.
- I'll be at my office if you need me.
Okay.
Bye.
Up and at 'em.
All right, jerk.
I'm ready for you now.
Hello.
Leigh,
I like you better without the robe
Take it off
There are hundreds of windows up there.
He could be behind any one of them.
He's seeing everything.
That's why we insulate our lives.
Locks, change our phone numbers, guard our space with television cameras and guns.
He's trying to hurt you without touching you.
He's working from as far away as he can get, and still get to you.
- I think you should move.
- No!
He's not gonna chase me out.
I don't care how hard it is.
How dare he invade my life.
We don't know which window.
It's impossible to tell from here.
- Wine?
- Thanks.
I feel better already.
To be able to see in here, he's gotta be between 30 and the top.
Great. That narrows it down.
I know why he does this. It's kind of fun.
Pervert.
There's a woman on 33, cheating on her husband.
That guy can't be her husband.
He looks like Al Pacino.
How can they live this high?
They must get nosebleeds.
Where is everyone? Cooking dinner?
Rich executive in the penthouse is a connoisseur of classical music.
And moving downward, man on 47 loves horticulture.
And love is in bloom on 38.
You know, if we watched the lobby long enough, we could see this guy coming in.
If we knew who to look for.
I don't care who he is. I don't wanna know.
- Aren't you curious?
- I'm scared.
You're probably right.
Who wants to know their own rapist?
- Cut it out, Sophie.
- Well, that's what he's doing.
Rape is when a man consciously keeps a woman in fear.
We have an appointment with Hunt in an hour.
Will you stop?
Afternoon, Miss Michaels. A letter for you.
Who gave this to you?
It was on the desk when I came on duty this afternoon.
"From D.G. Hill,
President of Excursions Unlimited.
"We regret to inform you that you have not qualified
"for our travel incentive vacation."
What a shame.
"Your participation has reached final point
"and our only course of action
"is removal."
He doesn't like the drapes.
"Removal."
I'm sorry. It's just not enough.
He's scaring the hell out of me.
All right, what do we call the crime?
Peeping Tom? Attempted rape?
How about
"First degree scaring hell out of?"
You wanna know what I can do?
I can try to get you a tap, but the phone company will not install a tracer until they've completed a whole logging process.
And that's it? What else?
When he calls again, blow a whistle into the phone.
Get your phone number changed, get an unlisted number.
I've done that.
You can't do anything but give advice?
No. No, I can't.
Not until he does something.
Like what? Rape? Murder?
I don't blame you for the way you feel.
But you don't know who he is, you don't bring me anything in that he's done that wouldn't be thrown out of court.
No threats, no assault and battery, no motive.
I can't arrest a man for sending presents in the mail and dialing wrong numbers.
I'm sorry.
- That's terrible.
- Come on.
I can't believe it. My life is falling apart, so why am I laughing?
- You're drunk.
- I am not. You are.
- I am.
- I think I am.
- Oh, yeah?
- Leigh, I'm sorry about the Hunt thing.
I thought that he would...
I don't know. I don't know what I thought.
I'm going to the DA tomorrow.
That's funny?
Well, I'm going to Fort Worth.
- You're taking that job?
- Yes.
- L.A. Has lost much of its charm lately.
- No, you're not.
I'm gonna talk you out of it just as soon as I sober up a little.
- Maybe tomorrow or the next day.
- You know,
I think you should do your sobering up somewhere besides your own apartment tonight.
Why? He's not chasing me out of there.
Besides, I don't even think he's interested anymore.
- You know, he doesn't have a view, right?
- That's true.
- Let's leave them off, shall we?
- Whatever you say.
Isn't this a little soon to be coming back?
This is where I live, and he's not gonna drive me out of here.
Just... Leigh, let it ring.
It's 11:45 Out late tonight
I hope you like the drapes, because they're staying where they are.
I want to see you
Yeah, well, that's tough.
Look through the telescope
Who are you?
I'm not far away
Come, look for me
Leigh, look at this!
There's a guy outside with a telescope.
Which he's now pointing toward this building.
That's him.
That's the man from the garage.
Yeah, Inspector Hunt, please.
That place of all places.
They're there. Here we go.
I wanna see.
- Oh, she deserves to watch this.
- Sure.
Gotcha!
When did you take these?
Couple of months ago
You know, you're very photogenic, but this kind of stuff is illegal
When did you take that one?
- Never saw that one before
- But you mailed them to the lady
I had nothing to do with that one
I wanna stop looking, but I can't.
He's lives on a good-sized pension but he works part-time as an electrician.
So he knew how to rig your lights to dim.
He just spliced into the circuit with a rheostat.
He had a key to your building.
He said the laundry room had better machines.
- No
- What were you doing with the telescope?
Stargazing
Then why did you have it pointed toward Arkham Tower?
I was in the middle of setting it up
Now, look, I'm getting jacked around
I don't like this
Just open your ears and listen to me
I did not do a damn thing!
I wouldn't say that
We got nothing on him but a few dirty pictures.
But at least we got him.
Hey, what if he does the same thing in Des Moines?
I mean, what else is there to do in Des Moines?
He's gonna be tailed for 24 hours a day for the next six months.
I don't think he stands a chance.
Yeah.
But maybe I do.
I guess we can open these now.
This is why I got this place.
Isn't that beautiful? I love L.A.
You know something?
If I were you I'd leave those closed, especially when I'm around.
Aye, aye, Professor.
Mr. Edison, Mr. Telephone, Mr. Leone.
You guys can all wait. And who are you?
Hmm?
So the guy sent you one last farewell letter.
Got any more phone calls?
Leigh, there's something
I want you to understand.
Sometimes we do things that are a little irregular.
And we certainly won't get any medals for them, but as long as they get the job done we feel they're all right.
What I want you to understand is, we pressured this guy out of town.
He lost his job, he lost his pension, and I personally put him on the plane to Des Moines.
I will be getting reports every week from Des Moines.
He still lives there.
Now come on, Leigh.
You just gotta let this thing go.
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to scare you.
I gotta catch a plane at 8:30.
I came to give you these keys.
He's still there.
- What are you talking about?
- He wasn't the one.
I don't see anything. The place is dark.
Where's Hunt?
He won't be back till 11:30.
Paul's in San Francisco.
If I call the police again, they're gonna think I'm crazy.
- You watch the lobby.
- Wait a minute.
I need an edge.
Something like this.
No.
- I kind of hope I run into him.
- No, Leigh, you can't do this!
Yes, I can.
I'm at the lobby
Can you see me?
I see you. The penthouse is still dark.
I'm going up See you at the top
I made it. Absolutely no one saw me.
Couldn't have worked better.
It's still clear
I think I'll try some romantic lighting.
What are you doing?
Don't worry. I'm just getting in the mood.
Let me check the lobby.
It's still clear.
I'm in Sophie, the door was open
- Creep's got some fancy place here
- Hurry up.
Are you okay?
- So far.
Sophie, I found it.
It's a huge big telescope, and some sort of weird tape recorder that looks like it's hooked into the telephone.
That's it
Now hurry up and get out of there!
This is unbelievable.
He's got a notebook that's logged every time he's called me in here.
Every entry.
We got him
I'm gonna try focusing this thing
Leigh.
Open the drape.
I hear something
Leigh
Listen to me, the front door!
Leigh! He's in here now!
- No, no, no!
- Sophie?
- No!
- Sophie! What's...
- Leigh!
- What's... What's happening?
Sophie!
Sophie!
Sophie! Sophie!
Sophie!
Sophie!
Sophie!
Belongs to J.D. Nichols.
Bachelor, advertising executive.
Now, he's been away on assignment for the past two months.
Kind of fancy, isn't it?
Okay, let's wrap it up.
I ran a check on Sophie.
She booked a flight to Fort Worth at 8:30.
Columbia Airlines 447.
The ticket was used. She made the flight.
No! He killed her.
I saw it through that window.
She didn't leave any forwarding address, but her landlord said she was going to spend some time with friends for a couple of weeks.
So I called KXA in Fort Worth.
They said they'd look into it.
They promised she would call me as soon as she started work.
She's dead!
What does it take to get that through to you?
He set up that other guy and he killed Sophie.
Come on, Leigh. Let's go home.
I saw it.
I was here.
It happened less than an hour ago.
Nothing happened here tonight.
Nothing except the police breaking and entering in the middle of the night.
He's better than you thought.
He's still doing it and he's getting away with it.
He's controlling all of us now.
He's got his distance.
He's got you believing he doesn't exist.
Oh, he exists, all right.
In Des Moines, Iowa.
You left the shower on, Leigh
You okay?
Hey! Hey, you stopped it yourself.
You hit the stop button.
Leigh, Sophie is dead
Remember how it sounded?
Listen to me, the front door!
Leigh! He's in here now! No, no!
Leigh!
I mean, how could you tell?
It was her voice. I know her voice.
Do you still believe me?
Yes.
You're the only one who does.
Well, he had to be close, within a block, maybe in his car.
So he put somebody else on the plane in place of Sophie.
And eventually she won't show up in Fort Worth, and eventually they'll do something, but that may be weeks.
In the meantime what else is he gonna try?
You know, this guy, he's amazing.
Seems to control two high-rise apartment buildings, the elevator systems, the electrical...
I mean, who could do that?
Who could do that?
I mean, who could control all of that, and yet remain totally invisible?
I'm not so sure you want the maintenance and safety department.
The fire department might be a better bet.
No, no, we've already spoken to the fire department.
See, I'm doing a piece on buildings in L.A., and we'd just like some general information, if you could.
- All right, go ahead. I'll see if I can help.
- Good. Who...
Who's in charge of inspections of apartment buildings?
Our monitors make routine inspections on all structures.
Monitors.
A monitor is a bonded employee of this department.
He would have master keys to every building in the city.
Every building.
Yes, he's got sensor devices, light, heat, cold, whatever the lock is programmed for.
He's also got skeleton keys, he's got bolt picks, bolt repressors, all that stuff.
Could he control elevators, say?
Oh, sure, sure. He can get in anywhere.
But now, look, we do notify people before an inspection, and the sensor devices are only used in case of an emergency.
Yes, of course.
How many monitors do you have working for you?
Only one.
A very solid, responsible man who's been with us for about 10 years.
Herbert Stiles.
If you want to speak with him,
I can put you in touch in a few weeks.
Right now he's on vacation out of town.
No, I wonder if we could take a look at some of your records?
- Here.
- What?
January 16th, Stiles checked out the electrical system in Arkham Tower.
Look at this.
He inspected the air conditioning ducts last year, computer relays the preceding year.
I've got four other buildings that he's inspected in the last 12 months.
I wonder...
Yeah, how close do his tours of inspection coincide with crank phone calls,
"Excursions Unlimited" letters?
Suicide.
Yeah, I know, I could be all wrong.
Look, I'm going to the police station.
I'm gonna check their records against these dates and his vacations.
I'd be curious to know if they match.
Terrorizing women may be his idea of a perfect vacation.
I have to check in at the studio.
I haven't seen Frimsin since yesterday.
I've almost forgotten what I do for a living.
- I'll pick you up there in two hours.
- Right.
I won't be long. Please wait a few minutes.
Yes, ma'am.
- I got him.
Where are you?
Stiles' house.
I broke in a few minutes ago.
- Get out of there
- It's okay.
I took a taxi so he wouldn't recognize the car, and the driver's outside.
- Did he
- No, he didn't see me break in.
Listen, it's all here.
The telescope, tape recorder, the printing press, everything.
I also found some brochures on surveillance equipment.
This morning I saw something in my apartment on the floor.
It was a mike. He's been bugging me.
He called the first day at the studio to make sure that I wasn't gonna be there, so he could put the bug in.
He knew when we went to the police, he knew when Sophie was alone.
I want you to leave, now,
and meet me at Hunt's office
I've matched up three women, all in their 20s,
all single, living alone, who committed suicide
during the periods he was supposedly on vacation
All of them lived in buildings he inspected
Now, we'll get him, but together
Okay. I'll meet you there in an hour.
Just have something to do first.
Forget your keys?
Yes. You scared me half to death.
Okay, now look, I gotta get going.
I got another call, okay?
You know, if you want me to take you someplace...
Arkham Tower.
You're hiding, aren't you?
You're afraid of me.
You're afraid to get too close.
Come on.
Face me.
I'm still scared.
You've got a good chance.
Just like that?
I don't even get to see who you are?
Help! Murder!
You got too close.
Hey, driver, can't you put the fear of God into those mules of yours?
I'd give anything for a bath.
You just don't worry about a thing, honey.
We'll be there in a minute.
Whoa! Whoa!
You lousy dirty...!
You low-down...!
And you can't even shoot straight. I'll...
Bighorse, is that you?
No, I'm Abe Lincoln and this is a wheelbarrow, you dumb so-and-so.
(Man) It ain't safe to go into town.
A murderer escaped from jail down in Jefferson.
Seems he's hiding out around here somewheres.
The vultures already gathered.
He's got 3,000 dollars on his head.
You don't think we could get as far as the saloon, do you?
(English accent) Nobody wants to work out in the west at all.
It's all killing and drinking and playing poker.
If you'll allow me, I'll...
You better stay where you are and don't let nobody get out.
Party could start any time now.
The man said that nobody was to get out.
I'm thirsty.
Hey, you! Stop where you are and put your hands up!
I mean it, mister. You wanna get yourself killed or something?
- Hey, driver...
- Shh.
Let him go, Bill. He's just another one of them vultures.
Let him go, I said.
Gee, I thought we was meant to be stopping people.
You'd better stay under cover there now, sweetheart.
- Where are you going now?
- Take it easy, nipper, or I'll think you're out for the bounty too.
- Can't you read?
- I'm thirsty.
I've already lost an eye in a gunfight.
Then use the other one to find a thirsty man some whiskey, friend.
Why don't you get us some grub and some whiskey?
And a rinse-off for the ladies.
Better make yourselves comfortable, folks.
I know these ambushes, yes, siree.
Once in El Paso I waited three days and three nights.
Someone spread word that Jesse the Kid was holed up there.
Well, there was 10,000 in silver on old Jesse's head.
That was good dollars in those days.
Must been at least 20 of them waiting for him, a gun in every corner.
Nobody wanted to leave.
They figured that if he was there, sooner or later he'd have to show.
Yep.
Three days and three nights.
Well?
Was he?
Seems so.
Only he was sitting in the corner pretending to wait along with the rest of them.
How about a piece of that cake?
Without the filling.
Oh, I'll bring the bottle too.
Can't you settle down?
Settle down, yeah.
Son of a gun, you're shooting at me?
Philip Vermeer, we got you trapped!
Philip Vermeer...
...you're under arrest.
Yeah? Maybe you're gonna die.
You might have had a chance, but your gun's empty.
(Holk) You get on out here and you won't get hurt.
What brings you this way, Sheriff?
I didn't think
I was so important.
(Holk) All we are after is the reward!
If you come out now, we'll forget the poster says you're worth the same dead as you are on the hook.
We'll make an honest try to take you into Jefferson alive.
Sure you will.
We don't wanna kill you.
Come out with your hands up!
Well, aren't you gonna let 'em have me, eh?
Justice will be done.
By bounty hunters.
I'm the one who's doing the hunting, Sheriff.
(Holk) Ain't nobody gonna touch a hair on your head.
I'll guarantee that.
Me, Holk!
They'll kill you too, just to collect the bounty.
You got ten seconds,
Philip Vermeer.
Throw out your gun and gun belt.
Do what he says.
Five seconds.
All this for a measly... 3,000 dollars.
I'm coming out.
If I'm not mistaken, a sheriff can't collect the bounty from the bandits he kills.
I never kill for money.
Get outta the way, Sheriff.
You leave him to us!
It's a month or more we've been after his hide. He's ours!
Well, I'm sorry.
Possession is nine points of the law.
I can't take him on the stage like this.
I need two horses.
I ain't wanting to obstruct the course ofjustice...
...but I know you for what you are, mister.
Since you got off of that stage, you've been after the reward on his head like the rest of us.
Now you're turning into a bastard with a star on his chest, just so you can screw us out of 3,000 dollars.
Maybe.
I still need two horses.
It's no fun riding along with a stiff.
Besides, now the man's dead, he ain't worth much to you.
(Holk) Leave him here.
Take the news to Jefferson.
Then we'll bury him and everybody will be happy.
Be the first time a coyote wanted a body just so he could bury it.
Get under cover!
This bastard ain't worth a nickel.
Leave him to me.
You know money is the root of all evil.
Filthy goddammit!
You're letting him get away.
Get the horses!
Whoa! Whoa!
- There!
- (Boy) Hey, hey!
Hold it now, darn it!
Gila Bend, folks.
Allow me, madam.
I mean ma'am.
Thank you.
Miss...
Oh, darn it, where did he go?
(Holk) There he is! Turn back!
Turn back!
Holk, it was you saying go on up there!
- We'll get him around the next bend.
- Sure. That's what you said before!
Hold! Hold!
One of them Indian tricks.
He's under that horse or something.
Got a hidey-hole around somewhere, I'll bet you.
This here is about the only hole I see.
Take an awful small Indian to pull a trick like that.
You keep your eyes open, you hear?
The road to Silverbell ain't safe at all.
And that's why I need
5 dollars extra.
Here.
It was in Mexico, in the middle of the desert and I had one of these right under my butt.
Three days and three nights surrounded by bandits who wanted that box.
How did it end up?
Never found out.
They wanted the gold, not me.
What d'you mean? You didn't let them just take it, for God's sake?
Of course!
For a lousy 50 bucks a month
I'm supposed to sit up there and get my head shot off?
Oh! Boys, take the strongbox back to the bank!
Hey, you!
Give me back my money!
Mister, you just bought
5 dollars' worth of weak whiskey.
Here.
Belongs to one of them there bounty hunters.
I ain't never seen the likes of them around here before.
Sure hope we don't see 'em no more.
Say that again.
That's a Saxon brand.
I've seen it on their horses too.
Well, if the horses don't break a leg and if the wheels hold out and the weather stays good and we don't meet up with any bandits and if we take the main road, we'll be in Silverbell in five, seven, eight hours.
We're going across the desert.
But we'll die of thirst.
There's the horses and the women.
- It'll be night.
- I find travelling by stage very uncivil.
(Clayton) You're wasting time.
(Bighorse) Ha! Ha!
- Stop!
- (Bighorse) Whoa!
- Hey, stop!
- Whoa!
My horse died.
Can you give me a ride?
I ain't no bandit.
(Clayton) Climb aboard, kid.
Climb aboard.
Well, you heard what the Marshal said.
Move inside, sonny.
You say that was...?
Well, come on!
I wanna go to Saxon City.
Come on! Keep talking and you won't go nowhere.
Ha!
But isn't he's the one who...?
Sheriff, will you tell us who he is?
Somebody.
Why don't you make the introduction, Sheriff?
Why don't you?
Philip Vermeer, jailbird, condemned to death, wanted for murder.
The United States Government will pay 3,000 dollars to whoever... cuts my throat.
Since you are forcing us to travel with a rogue, couldn't you tie his hands?
Don't worry, ma'am.
I only kill nice people.
- Oh, Bighorse! Wie geht's?
- Whoa!
You wouldn't believe how happy I am to see you.
- I see they ain't run you down yet.
- Here, I'll give you a little kiss, just right on your... nose.
Silverbell!
Eat, sleep and toilet facilities.
We were just about to heat up a little stew.
Come on in,
I'll give you something to eat.
Three ladies, so watch your language.
Three ladies, huh?
Guten Abend, ladies!
Eins, zwei, drei...
Oh, that's a nice one there.
Er... mister, mister, could you tell me where the...?
Oh, you mean the...?
Ja, ja, it's here.
- In the stable?
- What's wrong with the stable?
Look, it's big enough for five horses.
Did you really kill a man?
What difference does it make?
You don't look like a murderer.
And you don't look like a busybody.
Ach, now I know!
You are Philip Vermeer and you are the one that killed old Patriarch Saxon and your father was a prospector and old man Saxon had him killed, like he had a lot of other people too.
Und I say it's high time that someone put an end to...
Go see to your stew, see if it's ready.
- (Continues in German)
- Go see to your stew.
Oh, the stew, ja, the stew.
I had a little money set aside so I went into business with my American cousin.
There's virtually no risk and no lack of clients either.
- What do you do?
- We opened a funeral parlor.
We charge a minimum of 20 dollars and only cater for the best people.
(Woman) Well, the higher the price, the better the goods. That's my motto.
Stick to stiffs.
That should be yours.
Pairs.
Very good. Very good.
- Oh, my God. Was ist los?
- The stew ain't bad at all.
I wonder if I'm gonna get a chance to eat another meal like this.
Keine Angst.
It was not loaded, Sheriff.
I have the sense enough,
ja, up here to empty a gun before I hang it on the wall.
Never consider a gun empty.
Ja, ja, never can consider that.
Do you wanna play cards?
You haven't got anything left to lose.
(Vermeer) Then why have you been following me?
You know why old man Saxon had my father killed?
He found silver on the other side of the mountains.
Cards.
I'll play these.
So will I.
My head's worth 3,000 dollars.
That's my stake.
Then there's no point in raising.
Three queens.
Three kings.
You lose, Sheriff, and I'm leaving.
Philip, sit down.
If you wanna go to Saxon City,
I'll take you there.
Hey, Holk.
Let's get 'em boxed in and stop 'em escaping.
We better wait until dawn.
- It's occupied.
- Fine by me.
Got you.
The other one next.
Turning into a real party, ain't it?
Procreating faster than fleas on a bitch.
3,000 bucks is good any way you look at it.
Thing I can't figure, though, if you divide 3,000 by seven, what's that each?
You disappoint me, Sheriff.
Easy as taking candy from a baby.
Shh. Do you wanna wake 'em all up?
They're tired.
We got a long way to travel tomorrow.
I'm leaving now and so are you, mister.
You're coming with me.
Do you know how old I am, Philip?
Who gives a damn?
Get up!
You think I'd be still alive if I fooled around with kids who like to play with guns?
Just get up, Clayton!
It's not loaded.
You said never consider a gun empty.
(Gasps) No!
If you move that
I'll get some target practice.
That's only good for making noise.
Take cover!
Maybe somebody else has already done the job for us.
Better go easy, though.
It could be an ambush.
Never consider a gun empty.
Here...
Put these on.
We need some sleep.
Don't open that.
I told you.
(Holk) Clayton!
Send Philip Vermeer out here.
As soon as we got him, we'll pull out!
You ain't got no right to hold him.
They took your star away when they ran you out of Jefferson.
Unemployed, eh?
Or did you change your job?
You are losing. Come on out.
Ain't no need to risk your life for a murderer and a phony sheriff.
Is any of that the truth, what he said about you?
Maybe.
Let's get outside. I'm beginning to smell a stink around here.
Come along, Anita.
Ich bin mit dir, Sheriff.
Now it's loaded, ja.
Thanks for the moral support.
Don't shoot, please don't!
We are women and children.
(Holk) Come out with your hands up!
Anita, hands up, child.
All right, over to your right and huddle in close.
Come on, move it.
You destroyed my stagecoach, you lousy buzzards!
You looking for a bullet, loud mouth?
Of course I ain't looking for no bullet.
I'll give you all of 30 seconds to step outside.
After that we start shooting!
Only gave us ten the last time.
Do I go outside like this or are you gonna take 'em off?
(Holk) Time's running out!
And we ain't gonna fall for no double-cross this time, Clayton.
Even if he's guilty you can't let them do it.
He's not guilty.
He's stubborn.
As long as I am about to die, would you like to tell me what you know and why you followed me?
There's a lot of people following you.
As a bounty hunter you sure ain't convincing.
I saw who killed old man Saxon.
Who was it?
Who?
I said I saw who did it, not that I'd tell you who he was.
You should have told that to that court in Jefferson.
And maybe testify against the son of a patriarch?
Why should I have defended you?
You wouldn't even defend yourself.
You ready, boys?
You go out that door,
I doubt if you'll ever find out.
Hold your fire, I'm coming out!
He wouldn't get away with this if I was a sheriff.
It wasn't easy to smoke you out, friend.
We're gonna take real good care of you now. Here.
Ha!
Those lousy...
Those sons of...!
Have you had enough to drink yet?
Are you ready to talk?
No, I ain't saying a word to nobody!
(Holk) Pull him up!
I needed to take me a bath.
I sure do thank you, guys.
(Holk) You like it, huh? Huh?
Yeah, catching double pneumonia ain't as bad as it sounds.
Let him go!
The Patriarch's sons will get it out of you.
Better just tell us where that silver is or I'll pull you up and leave you here!
Go to hell!
Try and get it into that thick brain of yours that what we want is the silver.
I'll guarantee you a fair share if you tell us where it is.
Tell us where it is, you dumb bastard.
You're being awful foolish, kid.
You keep hitting him in the mouth, he won't be able to talk.
Why don't you mind your own business?
You've got a strange way of saying thanks.
Thanks?
I was just questioning them.
Wait! Vermeer!
I swear to God
I'll see you both dead!
I'm gonna get to town looking like a drowned rat.
You'll be lucky to get anywhere.
I don't see why if you give me a ride on your horse.
When you want.
I'm going back to Jefferson.
Forget the ride.
I'll just take the horse.
I'm going north, to Saxon City.
Oh, that's great.
It's a nice place.
The cemetery is on the sunny side of the hill.
Yeah, and there's silver on the sunny side of the hill too.
And I've got plenty of guardian angels.
Don't push your luck too hard.
Even guardian angels get tired.
Yeah, especially if they've gotta walk 20 miles.
Be seeing you.
Meet you over at the saloon.
I gotta talk to the Marshal.
Out of the away, you old fart!
Let go of me!
Drink up, gramps!
Don't forget, you're just an old idiot without a cent.
You running-mouth old fool, tell us which wagon was yours.
Where's all the rest of the things you gambled away?
Too bad you don't have a pretty young wife.
You'd lose her too.
Hold it, Bull.
Killing him ain't gonna change a damn thing!
Somebody has gotta stop the Saxons from doing what they're doing before it's too damn late!
One day you bastard Saxons are all gonna die, you hear?
You too in there.
I spit on you, Adam Saxon.
You're the worst of the whole murdering lot but I ain't afraid of you Saxons.
I ain't afraid to tell you what I think of you, you pockmarked coyote.
Ah, there you are, the yellow-bellied murdering son of a yellow-bellied murdering patriarch.
Yeah, a whole darn family of lily-livered, infected prairie dogs!
But you'll get your comeuppance one of these days. Do you hear?
And I'll spit on your faces and bury you, like I spit on your father when they buried him.
Yeah. What do you say?
Someone is gonna...
Gonna...
Hey, what are you doing?
Are we fighting?
No, don't shoot, Mr. Saxon.
You wouldn't kill an old man like me, would you?
I ain't no gunfighter, mister.
Now, wait a minute.
You can't shoot a defenseless old man. You can't.
No, Mr. Saxon.
No! Listen, Mr. Saxon...
I ain't shot my old gun for years.
I don't even know if it works.
I'm too old to pull a gun.
I'm out of practice.
Listen, I wanna apologize for what I said.
I'm sorry, Mr. Saxon.
No!
You murdering bastard!
I ought to put a bullet in you!
Leave me alone, damn it!
Who decides now if this is murder or not?
You? Your brother, the Marshal?
Or David, that other coyote?
I won his wagon at poker.
You know the rest.
It was a clear case of self-defense.
Yeah, sure, and old John was pretty darn fast, wasn't he?
Men are all different but guns are all the same.
Ten to one pink shirt over there will be next.
(Vermeer) Adam Saxon.
Old John's blood, five bucks it won't wash out.
Philip!
Just a moment, friends.
I got something personal to take care of.
What do you want, Philip?
I want a little talk with you, Poxy.
And with your brother, Eli.
- And with David.
- Whenever you want.
My brother Eli is in his office.
Our talk won't take long.
Come on, walk!
I didn't want you to let him get away.
I only wanted you to make him talk before you killed him.
What we were trying to do.
I've got to find out who killed my father!
I've gotta know!
That ain't the question your friends were asking me.
That wasn't too smart, Marshal.
Don't you know what a good shot I am?
Hell, it was you who told a judge in Jefferson you saw me kill old man Saxon at 60 paces.
I wouldn't draw on anybody as good as that.
You or someone you paid, it's the same thing.
I was there to bury my father.
He was shot in the back.
I would have killed your old man if I'd been sure he was responsible for it, but I'm not.
I wanna revenge my father.
I don't give a damn about yours!
Who was it? Who?
Who was it?
Maybe the same man who convinced you to accuse me.
Don't give me that double talk!
You know who it was!
Not me.
Somebody else does, though.
A guaranteed income of 100 dollars a week, and with a little luck that could double.
They told me that there's an awful lot of activity here.
- Sure there's a lot of activity here.
- Yes!
But my little girl doesn't wanna get hitched.
No reason to tie up an asset when the market's closed.
Let's hope we can get as far as the saloon.
I'm bone dry.
Don't stop now.
We're late already.
Start firing the minute he walks out.
No, wait a minute.
Come on, over this way!
He's gotta be in that wagon.
Start shooting!
No! You gotta get him alive!
I'm gonna kill me a Saxon!
All you'll do is just go and get yourself killed.
And me too.
What's going on here?
Marshal, would you please tell me what's happening here?
Philip Vermeer is in that wagon.
The first duty of a marshal is the safety of his citizens.
Do your duty without killing innocent people.
Don't you try and teach me my job, David.
I've noticed that you're a bit too hasty on the trigger, Eli.
With the result that you've already killed innocent people.
Listen to the way he's sweet-talking us.
David Saxon has got more damn brains than all his brothers put together.
He only counts murder when he can make it appear legal.
You know where my father found the silver?
Bring our people there.
I said without killing innocent people!
He'll get us all one day.
Hey, you in the wagon.
Make him come out or I'll open fire!
- Get out of here!
- Hold it a minute, Marshal!
He ain't here no more.
The wagon is empty!
Quick! Go round the back. Find him!
Turn the place inside out till you get him.
We're leaving town in an hour.
Go on and get packed now.
What do you mean, you're leaving town?
Where the hell are you going?
To find us a quieter place to get buried in.
- Hey, boss...
- Marshal, you idiot!
The stagecoach has arrived.
(Bighorse) Whoa!
Jefferson-Saxon daily stagecoach arrived in Saxon City.
- Anita.
- Hey!
You only help if they're young and beautiful?
Oh, madam, never let it be said.
Thank you, my good man.
What the hell did you do with the stage?
I lost it playing poker.
You're talking to the Marshal, not one of your bastard friends.
Why don't you talk to me, Marshal?
What do you want in Saxon City, Clayton?
I like peaceful places.
Oh!
Let's you and I go inside and have a talk.
- After you.
- Why?
This isn't Jefferson.
I'm in charge here.
I'm glad to see a man who accepts his responsibilities.
You shouldn't be wearing this star anymore.
Should you?
Bartender, bring us some whiskey.
This man has come a long way to honor us with his presence.
And make a little deal.
You've gone into business?
Strange, now that I've turned to the law.
I'm after a man.
Who?
Philip Vermeer.
Dead?
Alive.
First alive, then dead.
It's the law of nature.
That'd be a mistake, a bad one.
He killed my father!
That's a lie.
You come here and start insulting me and think you can get out of here alive?
That's not an insult.
You just didn't tell the truth, on the stand either.
The bullet through the Patriarch's head did not come from behind and you know it.
Philip Vermeer was behind him, so it couldn't have been Philip.
The judge in Jefferson condemned Philip Vermeer.
That judge bought himself a nice big ranch right after the trial.
You already said that in Jefferson and it cost you your star.
Repeating it here will cost you a great deal more.
I warn you, Clayton, keep out of our business!
With people like you around who respect the law, I'm in no danger.
I'm here drinking under the protection of an honest, incorruptible sheriff.
According to the law,
I got the right to throw out of town anyone who's a public nuisance or danger.
And Clayton, I say that you are both.
It sounds pretty bad.
You've got 24 hours to get out of Saxon City.
In the right-hand corner, his back to you.
Who fired those shots?
24 hours, Marshal?
Time sure goes fast in this town.
Did you kill them?
They never noticed it.
You'll hang for this.
All of you inside there, you're all witnesses!
Murder without provocation.
Clayton?
Throw out your gun!
Just a moment, Marshal.
This man was only defending himself.
And who are you?
I came here to marry Adam Saxon.
Maybe you know him.
I wanna talk to the top man around here.
That sure as hell isn't you.
Remember, Adam, no witnesses, not even friends.
Sure... Patriarch.
I don't want to be called that and you know it!
If you like calling things by other names.
That all depends.
Different things have different uses.
Look.
A nice surprise for you.
Why doesn't Eli marry her?
She would be better off.
But women are stupid.
She chose you.
Is it really necessary?
Of course it is.
Her father was a State Supreme Court Justice.
She'll be a precious asset to us.
Sometimes you talk as if you wanted to become President.
I like to look far ahead.
This is the only one that's unoccupied.
Are they all like this?
There are others with women, there are others for card games, and this one is for shooting bullets in.
Sleep well.
Hold it!
You haven't got enough trouble?
You got to look for more, huh?
You are the one who's in trouble,
I'm just trying to get out of it.
Move over.
Now, would you like to tell me the name of the man who killed the Patriarch?
It won't do you any good.
These people condemned you to make it easier for themselves to get rid of you.
You're preaching.
Just tell me who it was.
You get a horse and don't stop until you cross the border into Mexico.
You stay here and you're dead.
All right, we'll have to take a little walk to the Saxons.
They'll know how to make you talk.
I don't talk unless I feel like it.
That's one of my rules.
Let's take that little walk.
Couldn't you think of anything better than to send those two right into the saloon against the best gun in the whole state?
The former sheriff of Jefferson.
The man who took the Patriarch to court three times.
I could have charged Clayton with murder.
Legally, just the way you like it.
Then that woman had to turn up!
Clayton knows who killed our father and I want him!
Don't get carried away with your desire for revenge!
It could have been anybody that night.
Half of the state had reasons for killing the Patriarch.
We will never know the truth.
And trying to find out will only discredit ourselves.
Everything is under control.
The murderer has been condemned.
Vermeer's friends are left without a guide.
The silver is ours, everything legal and above board.
It's Vermeer, he's back in town!
Three thousand dollars walking around the streets.
Go cash in on it!
All right, Boon, saddle three horses.
You have to go with Adam to the canyon tonight.
And now what am I supposed to do?
Put on your best manners.
We have a guest for dinner tonight.
Please excuse us for being late.
Business is for us men what chattering is for you women.
Pardon me, dear.
And Adam, it's business which makes it necessary that you leave immediately.
Brothers are the worst bosses, after wives.
Please, excuse me.
I'll be back for breakfast.
I traveled with Philip Vermeer.
He doesn't look like a murderer.
The thing is, my dear, what matters is that he kills like one.
I don't believe he killed your father.
You must understand, Elizabeth, that in a violent country he who seizes today controls tomorrow.
If you want a place in the Saxon future, you must do your share.
As a good wife and mother, no more and no less.
Unfortunately, I don't feel such blind loyalty to your family.
If you'll excuse me,
I don't feel well.
(Holk) Move aside, Sheriff, or I'll have to kill you.
Get out of the way, Clayton.
(Clayton) I wouldn't even bother with you, Holk.
But Philip has some business to do with you and he doesn't wanna leave until it's done.
Was it Holk who killed the Patriarch?
(Clayton) No, he's the one who killed your father.
Damn bastard, come on out!
Here I am, Vermeer.
Tell your friend to stand back or he's gonna get himself hurt.
Hold it.
You boys ought to do this by the rules.
Put your guns away, both of you.
You're on your own.
Why don't you come closer?
That's just the right distance for me.
Don't move.
Oh!
(Holk) You're finished too, Vermeer.
You and your rotten friends.
It's been mined.
The road to the canyon has been mined.
It'll kill all of you...
"No witnesses, Adam."
Here you are.
Here's 5 dollars I got from the redhead and 20 I got from that blond one for special services.
I ain't seen this much money since Dallas.
Hm, very good.
Now get back upstairs.
I got clients waiting.
Sorry to interrupt you, folks.
Just pretend I ain't here.
- Nothing I ain't seen before.
- Let's wait until he's gone.
Who, him? Man just said pretend he ain't there.
That's good enough for me.
Come on.
He don't worry me none now.
Let me show you something I learned from an old cow-poking friend of mine.
Here, I'll show you.
It goes like this.
Hoo-hoo!
(David) Mind if I sit down?
Would you like to play cards?
There's too many guns pointed at us.
It's always necessary to take a few precautions.
I want peace in Saxon City.
The case of the Patriarch's death is closed.
Reopen it.
I can't do anything.
You're the Patriarch now.
Why are you protecting
Philip Vermeer?
Because he's innocent.
Let's say Eli didn't see so well that night.
He's very emotional.
Our father fell right at his feet.
Let him tell that to the judge.
Eli is pig-headed.
He won't go for it.
Besides... if Philip didn't do it, we have to point the finger at someone else.
The real murderer.
Is there anyone who knows who it is?
You and me.
We are both civilized and reasonable people.
We can work a deal.
I'm only interested in seeing that an innocent man doesn't have to pay for it.
Suppose I pay you both
25,000 dollars?
You take Philip and you keep him away from here.
That's a pretty good deal, isn't it?
I'm too old to sell myself and Philip is too young.
So what?
(Vermeer) Adam Saxon!
Come on outta there!
I'm waiting for you!
Is that generous offer of yours still open?
Hold your fire!
The sheriff from Jefferson wants to talk to that man.
You can get up now, Philip.
They won't shoot.
Sure!
The Saxons are men of their word.
Now spill it or I'll blast a hole in you.
You know a lot of things, don't you?
David Saxon knows you didn't kill his father and he's gonna tell that to the judge in Jefferson.
Now, put your gun away and let's get the hell outta here.
They're not afraid anymore
I'll take the place of my father.
Do you know why?
Cos dead people don't need a leader!
Philip!
(Elizabeth) No, Philip, no!
He isn't dead.
We'll hang him tomorrow, legally.
Oh, and you better look out for Clayton.
I'm sure he's still around.
Right. Take him away.
Don't worry, you'll be able to see him tomorrow, hanging from a rope.
That is, if he doesn't die tonight.
You evil-minded...!
Really, my dear Elizabeth!
That's not a very nice way to talk to anybody, especially the man you are about to marry.
Never!
Lock her in the cellar.
Don't touch me!
Let me go! Let me go!
Now, we can turn the light up, brothers.
Tomorrow our father's murderer will be hanged.
And we remove the last obstacle in the way of the silver.
Let us make this an era of...
...peace...
...of law...
...and of order.
But according to Clayton we still won't have avenged our father's death.
We're going to do more than that, Eli.
We are going to make his dreams come true.
With the wealth that silver load will bring us we can at last tighten our grip upon the capital, enough to make us the undisputed masters of the whole state.
And one day...
...not so far in the future...
...there will be Saxons in Washington.
And who knows?
Maybe in the White House.
David.
You know who killed our father, don't you?
Never. Do you hear me?
Never ask me that question again.
Aren't you going?
You ought to lay off the bottle.
(Eli) September 13th, 1900,
Ebenezer Saxon was murdered at Jefferson train station.
In the name of the people of the United States, this man has been found guilty of murder and has been condemned to death and now his sentence will be carried out.
Ah.
You! Hangman!
Remove your rope.
That man is innocent!
Clayton, get outta here.
Don't challenge the law!
Stay out of this, or get out of town!
Philip Vermeer was accused of murder, of killing a Saxon by a court that was bought and paid for.
He's not guilty!
I know who killed the man you so lovingly call a patriarch.
He's right here in this square.
Then tell me, you bastard!
Who killed my father? Who?
Don't play his game, idiot.
Order your man to proceed.
Whoever stands in the way ofjustice does so at his own risk.
You were there that night, David.
Why don't you tell them?
What does he mean?
You're just a poor madman, Clayton, but a dangerous one.
David knows who killed his father.
But he accused Philip to get him out of the way.
- You're talking nonsense.
- To get his hands on that silver.
If he goes on talking, Eli, he'll free him.
David, I can't change what's inside me.
I have to know!
What's his name?
Tell me, whoever it is!
What do you want, Clayton?
We know who killed the Patriarch.
Him, Philip Vermeer, condemned by the court to death.
- A court that was bought.
- He killed my father.
No, it wasn't me, David Saxon,
- but you, you killed your father!
- Shut your filthy mouth.
All right.
Tell 'em.
Tell them the truth if you're stupid enough to get yourself hanged.
Give him hell, Marshal!
It was me.
Your Patriarch was a murderer.
There was no other way.
So, you bastard, you killed my father!
You murdered him!
He was executed, not murdered, Eli.
In Jefferson it was the only justice possible.
Eli...
Adam...
David...
God knows what else you've done but since that massacre you're just as guilty as your father ever was.
And you are gonna have to pay for it.
We'll have to settle with you once and forever.
I'll be waiting an hour from now by the cattle pens.
Fine with me.
Thanks.
You're cleared now.
Stay out of it.
You can't fight the Saxons on your own.
I'll get a gun and join you.
Philip, the Saxons are my business now.
You can have everything, everything I own, my dear.
You know what that means?
A secure future, a family.
Oh, what...
What does it take to have you to say... yes?
Easy. Pay with the usual price.
Just 10 dollars, like everybody else has to.
- All right, back inside, girls.
- See you.
Don't jump the gun, Eli.
Wait. In a minute.
Don't shoot till I give the signal.
If we all draw out at once, one of us is bound to plug him.
You better draw soon.
We mustn't let Clayton start this or he'll kill us.
He's faster than we are.
Did they get you?
I don't want that silver now, Clayton.
I'm gonna go across the border.
Sounds like you're running away.
Here, you can put it back on now.
(Elizabeth) Philip! Philip!
Now there's a girl who'll keep you well out of trouble.
Do you think so?
So long, Philip.
Philip!
Yoo-hoo!
Stage leaving for Jefferson,
Silverbell and Gila Bend.
All aboard.
Ha!
Ha-ha, ha!
Chapter One.
This is the story behind one of the greatest manhunts in history.
Maybe you read about it, or what they let you read about it, probably as some minor item buried on the back page.
However, what happened in that city between May 16th and May 28th of this year was so incredible that to this day the facts have been suppressed in a massive effort to save certain political careers from disaster and law enforcement officials from embarrassment.
This will be the last time I will ever discuss these events with anyone, so when you have finished this bizarre account, judge for yourself its believability, and then try to tell yourself, wherever you may be,
"It couldn't happen here."
Sunday, May 16th.
At approximately 2:30 A. M.,
Cheryl Hughes was standing at the intersection of Casino Center and Fremont Street waiting for a girlfriend to give her a lift home.
Cheryl Hughes was 23,
5 feet 51/2 inches tall,
118 pounds, blonde hair, light brown eyes, swing shift change girl at the Gold Dust Saloon.
Cheryl Hughes, tired and hungry, but just mad enough to walk the eight blocks to her small frame house off the corner of 9th and Bridger.
Cheryl Hughes.
En route to her doom.
That's odd,
No evidence of dependent lividity, either,
Peel back the chest flap, please,
This should do it,
It's incredible,
Begin the gross work on internal organs,
I'm going to phone the district attorney,
And don't talk about this, to anyone,
I came into it two days later, called back 97 miles from the first vacation
I had had in 21/2 years because the story is so big no one else can handle it, according to our lovable managing editor.
Rumor has it that the day
Anthony Albert Vincenzo was born, his father left town.
The story may be apocryphal, but I believe it.
The only point I wonder about is why his mother didn't leave, too.
Good morning, slaves,
- We are not amused,
- Kolchak, you are on it,
A two-day old, third-rate murder...
- You are on it,
- What about them?
They have other assignments,
You're beautiful when you're angry,
Out,
First stop, County General, to see one of my most reliable spies... at least, he used to be reliable.
Hello, Carl,
I thought you were disbarred for malpractice,
I thought we were rid of you for two weeks,
So did I,
Well, about this
Cheryl Hughes thing... why does it say "officially undetermined" under "cause of death"?
- Why don't you ask the coroner?
- Come on, you're my spy here,
Haven't I kept quiet about all those illegal operations you've been performing in closets?
Tell me true, was there anything unusual about the autopsy?
- No, She lost a lot of blood,
- Some spy,
I'm just a poor doctor that occasionally takes pity on an aging reporter,
Dr, O'Brien,
Any messages for me?
Sounds like a Pulitzer Prize story to me,
Second stop, the Gold Dust Saloon and a chat with Gail Foster, one of Cheryl Hughes' fellow workers and a rather close friend of mine.
Poor Cheryl,
I feel just terrible about it,
If you don't want to talk about it, you don't have to,
No, I want to help if I can,
You said that she never had any boyfriends,
No, none that I ever heard of,
She dated once in a while, but never the same man twice,
I don't think she liked men,
- Yeah?
- Yeah,
She even took karate lessons in case one got fresh with her,
You mean that she knew karate?
Yeah, Brown belt,
Oh, I see him,
I've got to go, Bye-bye,
In any town the size of Las Vegas, the murder of one young woman hardly causes a ripple.
But then the ripples started.
Thursday, May 20th,
7:02 A. m.
Over there,
I didn't go down, I couldn't,
Okay, okay,
Don, take his statement,
What took you so long, Kolchak?
I got a flat tire,
Not a footprint in sight,
- Is that physically possible?
- If it happened, it's possible,
- It sure looks like it happened,
- Well, come on,
Bonnie Reynolds, 27, divorced, cocktail waitress at the Harem Room Casino.
Look at her throat!
She must have lost an awful lot of blood,
Cheryl Hughes lost a lot of blood, too,
You read that in the newspapers?
No, I didn't read that in the newspapers,
This girl lost a lot of blood, Sheriff, but she didn't lose it here,
Anything?
We found a purse,
There's signs of a struggle up here,
But nothing in between,
Only our footprints,
What did he do, throw her?
Who said Bonnie Reynolds was thrown
22 feet into that culvert? The coroner?
I haven't heard about it,
Who said this new killing is connected with the Cheryl Hughes murder?
The police?
Not to me, they haven't,
Who said Cheryl Hughes died of massive blood loss?
The coroner again?
He hasn't even turned in his report yet,
And who, may I ask, said that a super-powerful madman is running loose in Las Vegas?
You hearing voices, Kolchak?
I did not make up the facts on this story,
I know you're bored,
Big-time reporter like you, condemned to the sticks with us journalistic rubes,
I know you'd like a big, fat byline on a big, fat story so you can pay your way back to a big, fat city job, but Kolchak,
I expect you to report, not to come up with fairy tales,
And, Kolchak...
Quit bugging the P.D.
If something turns up, they'll let us know,
Meanwhile, use your head and lay off,
Whatever they're up to, they don't want any help from amateur bloodhounds like you,
Friday, May 21st, 8:06 A. m.
Apartment of Carol Hanocheck, swing shift cocktail waitress in the Bird of Paradise
Show Lounge.
She'd gotten home around 2: 15 A. M., poured herself a glass of milk, opened the back door of the kitchen for reasons unknown, and died like the others... suddenly, quietly, without disturbing her sleeping roommate only a few feet away.
Something of a pattern had started to form, and it was ugly.
It was then that people stopped talking.
Does that surprise you?
Look, you're not the only one that likes to play detective,
The police, the Sheriff boys, they all think they're pretty good,
And they don't need you,
You know, you really make me feel wanted,
We've had three murders in town, Bernie,
We have one tremendously strong guy, maybe more, who goes around killing young girls, and they all lost a lot of blood,
You aren't supposed to know about that,
I'm not supposed to know about that, And I know it,
What about your people down at the Bureau?
No, this is nothing for the Bureau to mess with at this stage,
You could make some unofficial inquiries for me,
Like?
You could check around the country and check all the hospitals and see if any of them have had corpses recently like ours, all with a big loss of blood,
You could check all the insane asylums across the country, see if they released recently a nut who thinks he's Count Dracula, even if he hasn't done anything to prove it,
Do you believe in vampires, little boy?
That's funny, That's very funny,
That's very funny, Bernie,
Are you gonna do it, or sit there like a cheap goniff guzzling my beer?
I'll think about it, okay?
Meanwhile, I hope it doesn't disillusion you to know that the local law enforcement people go along with your views... somewhat,
At this moment, they're waiting for a special report from the coroner and two pathology experts who were flown up from L.A.P.D. along with a small truckload of equipment,
Oh, hi, Marilyn, how are you?
- I like your luncheon place,
- Yeah,
If you want to hear that special report, meet me at the sheriff's office,
Starts at 6:30,
- Hey, thanks,
- Don't thank me, Just be there,
Where are you going?
Mr. Kolchak, telephone please.
Mr. Kolchak.
Carl Kolchak, telephone, please.
Carl Kolchak.
Kolchak,
Hi, Carl,
I heard the Parkway Hospital was knocked over,
Knocked over for what?
Cash, drugs, equipment, what?
Blood?
That's right,
Every container in the place,
Their entire stock,
What about blood type?
Seems blood type and Rh factor didn't much matter,
- Can't stop now, See you,
- Yeah, but...
6:30 p. M.,
Clark County Courthouse.
Present in addition to myself and two incompetents who called themselves reporters were Warren Butcher of the Sheriff's Office,
Thomas Paine of the District Attorney's Office,
Captain Edward Masterson of the Las Vegas Police Department, and old buddy Bernie Jenks.
Holding forth with his inimitable cool,
Dr. Robert Makurji, boy coroner.
We found that death in each case was extremely swift, coming in something less than a minute,
After the initial wounds were inflicted, the blood was drained very quickly, some kind of suction device being used,
This would explain why no blood was found anywhere in the victims or in the areas they were discovered,
Doctor, Kolchak, Daily News.
Do you have any idea what could have made these wounds?
They're not unlike the bite of a medium-sized dog,
What do you mean, dog?
What are you telling us, a dog did these murders?
I didn't mean to indicate the wounds were actually inflicted by a dog, only that they're similar to those which might be caused by a dog,
A rather interesting point is that we found another substance mixed in with the traces of blood in the throat wounds, namely saliva,
What do you mean, saliva?
I mean saliva, Sheriff Butcher,
Human saliva,
If Makurji had suggested that the murders were committed by a giant butterfly, he couldn't have made more sparks.
Now... what do you mean, human?
Are you suggesting that each of these women was bitten in the throat by a man?
At present, the evidence points that way,
However, I couldn't and wouldn't hazard a guess as to motivation,
I can only be sure they each died from shock induced by massive loss of blood,
Dr, Makurji, is it possible that he killed these women by biting them in the throat for the express purpose of drinking their blood?
Kolchak, you're here by the mutual suffrage of us all,
- Sufferance,
- What?
It's "sufferance," Sheriff,
Well, whatever it is, just shut up!
I'll answer that,
There have been cases of people who, through some mental derangement, have come to believe they were vampires,
In Germany in the 1920s, there was one fellow who did use his teeth to rip out his victims' throats,
We are not going to jump to any conclusions about who or what killed these women,
It is possible, you know, to type a person's blood from his saliva,
If I were you gentlemen,
I'd look for a very anemic fellow, possibly with some rare blood disease,
I don't care what kind of a nut killed these women,
But I'll tell you this... he's out there, and I'll bet he's high on pot or the hard stuff, and he's going to kill again unless he's stopped,
What have your people got on this Parkway blood theft?
Well, the latest is the nurse said she saw something funny out there last night or early this morning,
Seems that a tall, skinny guy dressed as an orderly was nosing around the refrigerated storage area,
That's where they keep the blood and the plasma,
She didn't think much of it then, but later when she spoke about the guy to the floor super, she was told that there was no such tall, skinny guy on duty there,
Description as follows... white male adult...
6- feet-2 to 6-feet-4, thin, about 175 pounds with pale complexion,
Dark hair,
So we start looking for a man, local resident or, worse yet, some outsider who may not even still be in the area,
We'll check the airport, the bus terminal, railroad station, blockade the highways, and if we're lucky, we'll get him, if he's stupid enough to still be hanging around after three crimes,
You got any other suggestions?
Just do it,
All right, let's break this up,
Thank you, Doctor MA...
MA...
Thank you, doctor,
Mr. Paine, I shouldn't be too inclined to reject Mr. Kolchak's theory out of hand if I were you,
It is at best highly speculative, but not altogether unwarranted,
You can throw away that cassette,
Now, this "vampire" stuff is to stay right in this room,
Until we have the assailant in custody, we say nothing about these women being drained of blood,
There will be no rumors, no reports in the paper,
The official opinion at this time is that the cause of death is undetermined,
We don't want to cause a panic,
It's bad for police operations,
It's bad for the people,
And it's bad for business,
Thank you for your cooperation,
Kolchak, I want to have a talk with you,
Boys, there's no reason to bother the doctor anymore,
I have a prepared statement in my office,
You can go back to the lab,
You're becoming a real pest,
I'll have to have a word or two with Vincenzo about you,
Maybe one of the other boys at the office should handle this from here on,
Keep your nose clean, son,
Stay out of other people's business,
It's healthier that way,
Will you watch what you're saying?
You know these guys,
You could find yourself out of a job and 86'd all over town,
That go for you, too?
Who can talk to you when you get like this?
Listen, I'll nose around unofficially for you on anything you bring me, just between the two of us, but do me a favor and stay away from me for a few days, just for friendship's sake,
Did I say it was a vampire?
What does your suggested headline say?
The story makes it clear,
"Vampire Killer in Las Vegas," question mark, Do I misread?
The story makes it clear,
Do I misread, or did you use the word "vampire"?
Some screwball who imagines he's a vampire is loose in Las Vegas, and people ought to be told,
If there's a screwball loose in Las Vegas, his last name begins with a "K,"
I've heard about the little scene you had with the boys downtown,
No vampire stories, clear?
How about a special featurette with a border of roses... an interview with the two girl victims in heaven, with a celestial choir in the background,
Out!
I'm sorry,
I guess I fell asleep,
Yes,
What were you saying?
You do great things for my masculine ego, you know?
Yeah,
Actually, I was saying that
I think that Vincenzo has the news sense of a tree stump,
It's got to be one man,
It's got to be,
Big, strong, psychotic,
You're certainly making me very glad that I work nights,
Well, I told you to quit working nights, didn't I?
I am forever in your debt, love,
What was that?
The killer's done it again,
Oh, no,
Only this time, he was seen,
I saw him standing over there,
I thought he was kissing her,
Then he turned, and she fell down over there by the car,
He must have followed her home,
I'm sorry, I can't,
Victim number four.
Mary Branden, showgirl, 25, five feet eight inches tall,
125 luscious pounds... less the weight of
12 pints of blood, of course.
Looks like Bela Lugosi struck again,
Knock it off,
That's her daughter,
Oops,
I'm all right now,
Now, the car he drove away in... was it new?
No,
It was a few years old, I think,
It was a maroon coupe,
I'll call it in,
Barney, may I, uh...?
Yeah, but take it easy,
I'm sorry, ma'am,
Kolchak, the Daily News.
That was your daughter?
My best contact in Las Vegas has always been Helen O'Brien, chief switchboard operator at the county courthouse.
Hello, adorable,
You're a sadist,
Oh, I could take it back,
Over my dead, plump body,
Listen, you magnificent morsel, the DMV is checking on the suspect's car,
You couldn't help me in that area, could you?
Of course not,
Bribed again,
What?
How'd you like to see the killer's face?
Sherman Duffy of the Chicago Globe once described a reporter as follows... socially, he fits in somewhere between a hooker and a bartender.
Spiritually, he stands beside Galileo, because he knows the world is round.
Not that it does much good when his editor knows it's flat.
Shelley Forbes has got to be his fifth victim,
Look at the way her dog was killed,
- You never give up, do you?
- What do you mean?
I mean this is unacceptable,
I'm very close to firing you, even though the owner of this paper has a soft spot in his head for has-been big city reporters,
I am tired of your pressure,
I am tired of the owner's pressure,
I'm tired of the pressure all around me to blow this story up on the one hand and keep it under wraps on the other,
I am tired of being the middleman,
Do you understand that?
Can you understand that?
What do you want, Vincenzo?
A testimonial from Count Dracula?
Out! Get out!
What is this "Out! Out!
Get out!" game we play?
This nut thinks he is a vampire,
He has killed four, maybe five women,
He has drained every drop of blood from every one of them,
Now, that is news, News!
And we are a newspaper!
We are supposed to print news, not suppress it!
You know darn well why we're soft-pedaling this thing,
No! Tell me why!
Could it be because we have been told to?
You are an idiot,
Worse, You're irresponsible,
All these murders mean to you is a byline,
What difference does it matter what it means to me?
The point is that we are suppressing news, we are withholding information,
Everybody in town knows what's going on... the police, the D.A... the coroner's office,
Every reporter on every newspaper in Las Vegas knows what's going on,
The only people who don't know are the people,
At last you got the point,
The people in Las Vegas don't know, because the people would come unglued if they did know, even more than they're coming unglued already, Capisce?
Tuesday, May 25th,
7:30 p.m.
Helen O'Brien had told me that the DMV had come up with 16 possibles.
All but one had been eliminated.
The car owner's name,
Martin Lubin, address on Spring Mountain Road, name and address both phony.
Name of salesman who sold car, Fred Hurley.
So I sets him a price,
He don't say nothing, just stands there looking at me,
How'd you find out about this?
A fat little bird told me about it,
- Just keep your mouth shut,
- Yes, sir,
Okay,
Well, like I said, he just stands there looking at me,
Then he tells me the price is too high...
$300 too high,
He keeps staring, as if daring me to tell him the price is $1200,
Is this the fellow?
Stop doing our job for us,
That's already been established,
You see, I told them only he had a mustache,
Mustache, Did you sell him the car?
Well, I started to say no, but something inside tells me,
"Don't mess with this guy,"
I mean, he's a creep, with them red eyes and that voice,
He's enough to keep a guy from working nights,
All my life I've waited for a story like this, All my life!
When it finally comes,
I can't get it printed,
Do you know the holes in Mary Branden's neck were airbrushed out before they printed the photographs?
If you keep going on like this, you're going to get fired again,
Let's see... how many times has it been?
Twice in Washington, three times in New York, twice in Chicago, and once... or was it twice? In Boston,
Oh,
I'm becoming extinct in my own lifetime,
Homo Newshawkus.
Natural habitat, a pool of sour mash bourbon,
You know, I really ought to light a candle to Ben Hecht,
Here,
You ought to quit your job, you know,
And you'll support me?
Well, I...
Come on, honey, I'm serious,
That weirdo's hit five girls, and they were all night workers,
Five?
Yeah, five,
A girl named Shelley Forbes is missing, and I'll bet my bottom dollar she's victim number five,
You know, you iron a shirt pretty good there,
I've been doing some thinking,
What do you know about vampires?
Only that they wear dinner suits and talk with marbles in their mouth,
Will you please be serious?
Watch my natural habitat there,
Open it,
"Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Vampires.
But Were Afraid to Ask."
No, you're going to look at it,
Come on, Why?
- What if the killer's a real vampire?
- I've had a very long week,
He's done everything that's in this book,
You're going to read it,
Yes, all right,
I'm going to read it,
Oh, now, come on, you're a big, tough reporter,
You can take it, You might even get a good feature article out of it,
That's it,
"Since the beginning of man's existence,
"there have been creatures of the night,
"crazed monsters that track their bloody prints
"through the pages of fact and fiction,
"Of them all, the vampire seems to have accumulated the largest body of documentation,".
"By night, the vampire is virtually indestructible,
"fearing only the sign of the cross,
"Before daybreak, he must return to his coffin,
"otherwise he will be destroyed by the purifying rays of the sun,
"It is then, while he lies dormant,
"he can be destroyed by hammering a wooden stake through his heart,".
According to the legend, the victim of the vampire will ultimately rise again as the living dead, and must be destroyed in a similar manner.
From any source available, the vampire must have blood.
Help! Help!
Someone help!
He's in there,
I was doing double duty as night editor when the P.D. squawk box went crazy about a wild brawl at the Old Town Hospital.
Thursday, May 27th,
8: 20 A. M., and things were rolling.
Our morning edition hit the streets recapping all the action at the hospital.
The TV people, as usual, had missed out completely, and the radio stations were literally reading our copy on the air.
But now the whole lid was really blown off.
The maniac had been identified.
Sorry I'm late, I just got these out of the soup,
Now, here's a rundown on the Scotland Yard and the Interpol findings,
Subject... Janos Skorzeny,
Born in Craesti, Romania, 1899,
Now, wait just a minute,
You trying to tell me this guy is over 70 years old?
Come on, Bernie, your boys have come up with the wrong man,
Like hell we have!
These facts have been triple-checked and confirmed,
I've been up all night, and I'm pretty tired,
Do you want it or don't you?
Just take it easy,
Let's hear it,
All right,
Skorzeny's father died in 1923,
He left somewhere between
$75 and $100 million,
At this time he began to travel, and he became known throughout Eastern Europe as a big lover of nightlife,
We don't have a lot more on him before World War II,
Scotland Yard reports he showed up in England just in time for the German blitz,
I'm sure Mr. Kolchak will find the following facts of interest,
Such formality from a man who always guzzles my beer.
While in England, he passed himself off as Dr, Paul Belasco, specialist in hematology research,
His work involved freshly killed air raid victims from various
London emergency rooms,
As a matter of fact, at his residence in Shafto Court, he installed several kinds of sumps, tubs, and an extremely large commercial meat freezer,
In 1948, he turned up in Canada, still as Dr, Belasco,
Further checking made his presence known in almost every place along the US-Canadian border where rioting and violence and a number of dead bodies were found,
We believe he left Canada for Vegas April 19th under the name of
Detective Constable Alan Hensley,
Now, because of his British citizenship, he is an international fugitive, so my people are very interested in him,
This is no longer just a local matter,
Now, gentlemen, the one constant that has shown up in all of our reports is that Skorzeny's travels have always been accompanied by a number of unexplained killings, many of which have one thing in common...
A massive loss of blood,
So, if Skorzeny is not the vampire of Mr. Kolchak's theories, he is certainly the suspect of multiple homicides extending back some 30 years,
Mr. Jenks, you seem to be running this show,
Could I have a minute to say something?
- You have the floor,
- You keep it short,
I was at the hospital yesterday, and a lot of things were happening that you just simply cannot explain away,
Sheriff, your own men shot at him, some at point-blank range,
How come it didn't even slow him down?
How come a man over 70 years old can outrun a police car?
How come this same man, slugged in the head, doesn't even bleed?
I saw those gashes in his head, and whatever it was that was trickling from those wounds was clear. It was not blood!
This guy's got a motor mouth,
Can't we shut him up?
No, let him hang himself,
Then we'll finally be rid of him,
So far he has killed four, probably five women,
The coroner said that those bite marks on the throat were made by human teeth,
He practically confirmed the fact that he actually drank their blood,
Now, wait, Whatever this Skorzeny may be, he seems to be functioning as if he were a vampire,
You can go on operating as if he were an ordinary man,
That's up to you,
But I know that the only way you're going to get him is if you proceed under the assumption that he's a real-life vampire!
Now, the research that I've been able to find...
Wait a minute,
Have you lost your mind?
Can you imagine the total blind panic this town would be in if the public were told we were actually looking for a vampire?
Not to mention the irreparable damage it would do to the image of law enforcement in Vegas,
That's what it's all about, isn't it? That's it,
Boy, I really can't believe that you guys are so afraid of appearing stupid that you'll ignore the only possible way of nailing him!
You listen, and you listen good,
We'll handle this by ourselves, and without undue public observation,
No undue public observation?
You've blown it already!
Look what's appeared in my paper today,
People are going to be calling for a grand jury investigation,
You can't stop the rumors!
Sit down!
I don't care what's been printed in the newspapers,
This man is still classified as an ordinary maniac, and he'll be settled by standard police procedures,
And you'd better start cooperating with that fact, or you're going to get your pushy tushy kicked out of town,
You dig?
Yes, sir, I dig,
But just remember the next time you blow it who's got the answers... sir,
All right, Ed,
Let's get on with it,
What have you got?
Our two departments combined have 650 men on full-time duty,
All leaves are canceled, and everyone's working a 16-hour day,
Our chopper is going from dusk to dawn,
We've got unmarked cars patrolling the Casino Center and the Strip,
All roads are blocked, and we're receiving complete cooperation from the Highway Patrol and the Jeep Posse,
- You got it?
- Got it,
Repeat,
What did I say?
Show every real estate agent in town the picture of this guy's puss, and ask 'em if they sold a house to anybody that looks like him,
Good boy, You got it,
Now get going,
Now, wait a minute,
Wait till I lose this last dollar,
Mickey, has the idea of winning ever occurred to you?
Winning?
Oh, boy, oh, boy,
You spoke,
You know, I have a very strange, unhappy feeling that the police are never going to catch this murderer,
I also have another very unhappy feeling,
Which is?
This case may be even bigger than I thought it was,
Bigger?
Stranger, then,
I've seen a lot of weird things in my life, love,
I have never, ever seen anything like this,
You don't tell me that you're finally going to believe...
I don't even want to think about it,
Car 14, check out the report on the two ladies downtown on Casino Drive.
Code 10-33, code 10-33.
All units, all units.
Janos Skorzeny spotted in 1969 green, unpaneled station wagon, intersection Oakey and Houssels.
I.D. confirmed.
Positive visual contact made.
Units 7 and 8, seal off
Rexford and Houssels at Oakey.
Repeat, Units 7 and 8.
Unit 3, close off Park Paseo at Las Vegas Boulevard.
Units 4, 6, move north to face
Unit 3 at Park Paseo and 5th.
Unit 5, move up Bracken to 5th Place.
All units...
Hold it!
Get up, slowly,
Somebody find a light switch!
He's holding Chambers down!
Friday, May 28th, 3: 17 A. m.
Despite the helicopters, the Highway Patrol, the Jeep Posse, despite the blocking of every major road and highway, despite the mass coverage of Las Vegas by every available man in both police and sheriff departments,
Janos Skorzeny was still at large.
The courthouse conference room had been a scene of chaos for more than three hours now.
Messages were still flooding in from every outside unit.
Every available man who had taken place in the capture attempt was being debriefed.
At the hospital, two officers had died and a third was hovering on the edge.
Reports on them were still coming in as the greatest manhunt in the history of Las Vegas continued in vain.
Oh, thanks, Bernie, Yeah,
Well, what are we gonna do?
Now are you willing to listen to my insane ideas?
Get out of here!
Hold it, hold it,
You were there, weren't you?
Yes,
Every man we've questioned insists not only that Skorzeny was possessed of incredible strength, but that he was shot more than once during the capture attempt,
I'd say 30, 40 times,
I'm sorry, I'm not buying that,
Captain, you have two choices,
Either he was shot, or your entire police department is blind,
Ed, let's admit it,
We had the man, had him cornered, and we couldn't hold him,
Let Kolchak have his say,
Before I do, is it agreed that in return for my help you will grant me the exclusive rights to the entire story?
Let's say it's agreeable if we decide to follow your suggestions regarding the suspect,
Fine, because if you don't follow my suggestions, you're going to be chasing your suspect till doomsday!
Just get on with it,
Of course,
Each man in the field is to be issued one of these... to be carried in his pocket,
- This, gentlemen...
- Where'd you get that?
I have a friend who's got a furniture repair store,
I woke him up and had him make it,
Each man in the field is to be issued one of these and one of these,
Are you suggesting that we pound one of these into Skorzeny's chest?
No, into his heart,
There's a legal phrase for that,
You might have run into it once or twice in your broad experience,
It's called premeditated murder,
It's the only way you're going to stop him,
You heard your own men,
Can they all be wrong?
You can stop your nighttime chases from now on, too, gentlemen,
The only hope you have is to spot Skorzeny and then track him back to where he lives and wait until sunrise before finishing him off,
He's only vulnerable during the day,
At night he's much too strong,
Yes, gentlemen,
I hate to say this... but it looks as if we have a real, live vampire on our hands,
- Ed,
- Yes, sir,
- Warren,
- Yeah,
Tom, I'd like to be in on this, too,
Okay, you've got yourself a deal,
- Conditional,
- What's that?
Butcher here will issue the crosses, the mallets, the stakes,
The one thing he won't do is depart from established police procedures,
If feasible, Skorzeny is to be taken alive and held for trial,
Trial?!
That's right, trial, Trial,
All right, In return for what?
You'll get the exclusive rights to the story... when the blackout is lifted,
Any other conditions?
- One more,
- What's that?
If it turns out you're wrong, you're to be out of town in 12 hours,
Take it or leave it,
All right, I'll take it,
Because I know I'm right,
And you know I'm right,
Right,
Ciao.
I'll take Manhattan, the Bronx, and Staten Island, too,
Watch out, you great big wonderful Big Apple,
Kolchak's coming back,
Yeah!
Kolchak! It's me, Crawford!
What are you doing driving off with me in the backseat?
What are you doing in my backseat?
I wanted to talk to you,
I saw your car parked here, so I got in to wait for you and I got sleepy,
You got sleepy!
Hey!
I think I found the house,
I told Crawford to give me 30 minutes before telling Jenks where I was.
That way I could get to see the house alone for a while, and also keep the police from arriving before dawn, which I knew they'd do if they got the chance, no matter what I told them.
Shelley Forbes?
I'll get us out,
His own private blood bank. Wow.
Hold still, It won't stick,
You think they'll print it?
I know they will,
We've got an agreement,
You look kind of tired,
You want me to drive you to the office?
Go on, hush-a-bye, will ya?
I want to finish this in time for the special edition,
Why don't you stop working nights...
Oh, Carl, not that again, and marry me?
What?
Well, you're a good cooker and a good kisser,
Why not?
Oh, baby, you're gonna love
New York City,
Honey, after this story hits the news services with my byline...
- Us, married?
- Yes! Us, married!
Don't look now, baby, but Kolchak's coming back, in style!
There you are, Vincenzo, and if I do say so myself, it's sensational,
I'm sure it is, Carl,
You're going to put it in the special edition? With pictures?
And the news services?
Okay, fine,
What's got into you?
You sick or something?
Nothing,
This is all fine, Carl, fine,
Jenks has been trying to reach you,
Yeah? What'd he want?
He wants to see you at the D.A.'s office,
Why don't you run over there now?
Yeah,
You're one hell of a reporter,
Thank you, sir,
And a bright
"good morning" to all of you,
Bernie, what did you...?
Is your name Carl Kolchak, and do you reside in the city of Las Vegas?
You know my name's Carl Kolchak,
What's going on?
You're under arrest on the charge of murder,
The state requires that you be informed that you have the right to remain silent,
No, Oh, no,
No chance, You're not going to pull that one on me,
You are under arrest,
All right, Paine, just what kind of a dirty deal is this?
You have a very short memory,
A few hours ago,
Sheriff Butcher himself saw you actually pound a wooden stake through a man's heart with this mallet,
A man wanted for questioning... questioning, mind you,
He hadn't been arrested,
He hadn't even been charged,
You broke up our stakeout, and after we were kind enough to invite you to go along,
You just charged in there in front of us and killed Janos Skorzeny before we had a chance to do anything,
Why, you were even ranting and raving about this Skorzeny being some kind of a vampire, and you had to save the world,
And that, Mr. Kolchak, is murder one,
If you plead insanity, you might get lucky, but I promise you this, you'll be committed to an asylum for the rest of your life,
I pull your fat out of the fire, and you do this,
Will you just sit down a minute and listen to them?
You were there!
Just listen,
Now, this is your story, Kolchak,
It's already being printed,
"This morning shortly before sunrise,
"Las Vegas Sheriff's deputies
"under the command of Sheriff Warren A, Butcher, 45,
"surrounded the home of Janos Skorzeny,
"a fugitive from a federal warrant, and, in a pitched gun battle, were forced to kill him,".
Never, You'll never get away with it,
- What's to stop me...?
- You're going to stop yourself,
Because if you open your mouth, we'll find you, bring you back, use this warrant, and put you away forever,
Pick 'em up, Kolchak,
Pick 'em up and get out of town, Now,
We'll take care of your back rent,
I want to call Gail,
She's not there, Carl,
What have you done with her?
Nothing,
We just asked the young lady if she'd be good enough to leave town,
She's an undesirable element,
Kolchak, and we don't want undesirable elements in Las Vegas,
There's nothing I can do,
You let me know where you end up, huh?
Yeah, sure, I'll keep in touch,
So all the loose ends have been gathered together and tied into a pretty knot, right around the neck of guess who.
After I left town, I began putting notices in the personal columns of newspapers from San Francisco to St. Louis.
Until I ran out of money, that is.
So far, I've received no answers, but I'll keep trying even though I don't think
I'll ever find Gail Foster again.
Maybe it's just as well.
So that's it.
The book's finished.
And now you'll have to judge for yourself.
I must warn you, however, if you try to verify this account, you will find it quite impossible.
Item... in Washington, D. C., there is no longer a file listing the suspect under his true name or any of his alleged aliases.
Item... in Las Vegas, all of those who were involved have either left town, aren't talking, or are dead.
I haven't had a decent night's sleep since all this happened, and now you might find it difficult, too, because there is still one fact that cannot be buried.
After the death of Janos Skorzeny, he and all of his victims were immediately cremated.
Why?
Remember the legend?
All those who die from the bite of the vampire will return as a vampire unless destroyed first.
So think about it, and try to tell yourself, wherever you may be, in the quiet of your home, in the safety of your bed, try to tell yourself,
"It couldn't happen here."
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# When you're laying so close to me
# There's no place I'd rather you be
than with me here
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# Do it to me again and again
# You put me in such an awful spin
In a spin
# Oh
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# I love to love you, baby
# Lay your head down real close to me... #
- All right?
- Fine.
- You're late.
- Sorry?
- I said, "You're late".
- Sorry about that. Unavoidable.
- What happened?
- Some clients were late.
Laurence, don't leave your bag there, please.
I'll move it in a minute.
- Did you eat?
- No.
No? I had to throw your pizza away. I'm sorry.
# Oh, love to love you, baby
# When you're laying so close to me
# There's no place I'd rather you be
than with me here
# Oh, love to love you, baby... #
I've got to make a couple of phone calls.
Do you want me to make a sandwich?
Not at the moment.
I must get these out the way.
Laurence, you want to have your bath.
They'll be here soon.
- Come on!
- Laurence, you'll get heartburn!
Mr O'Haligan? Mr Moss here, Wibbly Webb.
Where's that key to 15 Clittingham Avenue?
You were supposed to have it back before lunch.
That's no good, I need it now.
Will you be in in the morning?
Tonight? Where?
Belfast? What time's your plane?
All right, train, then.
What? A party?
I thought you said you were going to Belfast?
All right, what time are you going to Kilburn?
What time are you having your bath?
I'm not asking you to bath in cold water!
I just want the key to 15 Clittingham Avenue.
Yes!
What? All right, I WILL come and get it.
- Now.
- Laurence, no!
Yes, I do know how to get there.
OK, I'll see you shortly. Goodbye.
...That stupid man!
- Oh, Christ, Laurence!
- What?
- How long's this going to take, please?
- I'm sorry.
It won't take long.
Did you get those lagers?
Er, no, I didn't have time.
Laurence!
Get them when you go out, and don't forget, please.
Hello, Mrs Cushing?
Laurence Moss here, Wibbly Webb.
Yes, we've finally run him to ground.
You'll be happy to know
I'm in the throes of retrieving the key.
Not at all, not at all. All part of the service!
Yeah, surely. When would be best for you?
No, no. I'll fall in with you, Mrs Cushing.
- What about tomorrow morning?
- Laurence!
My pleasure, Mrs Cushing.
What time suits you best?
No, I am at your service, Mrs Cushing.
He who pays the piper calls the tune.
You name the hour, I shall appear.
No, really, I insist. Now, what time?
- Eight o'clock?
- Laurence!
Early? No, not at all, no.
Up with the lark, you know!
Yes.
Don't mention it, Mrs Cushing. My privilege.
See you tomorrow morning, then.
Yes... Bye now!
- You'll kill yourself, you know, Laurence.
- Yes. It can't be helped.
Ridiculous.
- It's not a nine to five job, you know, Beverly.
- You can say that again!
- Gonna get changed?
- Oh, yes.
I'll drink this, I'll get changed, and then I'll go out.
And don't forget those lagers.
- Beverly, where are the olives?
- In the kitchen, Laurence.
Laurence, if you want olives, would you put them out?
- Oh, no, they're early!
- No, they're not. And you're not changed.
Yes, I know that.
Beverly, get the olives.
- Hello, you must be Laurence.
- That's right.
- I'm Angie.
- Do go in, won't you?
Thanks. This is my husband, Tony.
- How do you do?
- Hello.
- Hi, Ange!
- Hello, Beverly.
- Oh, what a lovely dress!
- Thanks.
- Were we meant to wear long?
- No, no, it's just informal.
This is my husband, Tony.
- How do you do? Pleased to meet you.
- How do you do?
He's got a firm handshake, hasn't he? Fantastic.
- Like to come through?
- Mmm.
Angela... Tony.
This is the suite I was telling you about.
- It's nice, isn't it?
- Lovely.
- Drink?
- Yes, please.
- Laurence, would you take Angela's coat?
- Surely.
- Thanks.
- Pleasure.
It's funny, he's a lot bigger than I thought he was.
I've seen him across the road and thought he was the same size as Laurence, but he's a lot bigger.
- Like a drink?
- Yes, please.
- What would you like?
- Bacardi, please.
- Ice and lemon?
- Please.
- Angela?
- Gin?
- Gin and tonic?
- Please.
- Ice and lemon?
- Yes, please.
Laurence, would you get the drinks?
Tony would like Bacardi with ice and lemon.
Angela would like gin and tonic, ice and lemon and I'd like a fill up. OK?
- Fine.
- Thanks.
- Like lager, Tony?
- I'm OK with Bacardi, thanks.
No, as a chaser, a bit later.
Laurence is going to get some.
- OK, thank you.
- Or a light ale. Which do you prefer?
- Light ale.
- Light ale? Laurence, get some light ales too.
Yes.
Ange, it's going to be really nice tonight.
I've invited Sue from Number 9.
- Oh, lovely.
- I thought it would be nice for you to meet her.
Her daughter's having a party. So I said,
"Pop down and spend the evening with us."
That'll be really nice,
'cause I want to meet all the neighbours.
Just say hello, Ange, and break the ice.
That was what was so nice when you came over,
'cause it really made me feel at home.
Yeah, it's funny Ange, as soon as we met
I knew we were gonna get on.
Mmm. Well, we're alike, aren't we?
- Thanks.
- Thanks.
- Ta.
- Cheers, everyone.
- Cheers.
- Cheers, Tone.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
- Darling, are you staying or going?
- I'll stay for a while.
Laurence has to pop out on business,
I'm afraid, so...
Who'd like a cigarette?
Laurence, would you, please? Angela?
- No, thanks.
- Tony, would you like one?
- No, thank you.
- We've just given up.
Oh, yes. Sorry.
- Who'd like some olives?
- Not for me. Ange?
- No, thanks.
- Tony, do you like olives?
- No, I don't.
- Horrible, aren't they?
- Told you nobody would like olives.
- Not "nobody", Beverly.
I like olives.
And that's 25% of the assembled company.
- We've met you before, haven't we?
- Really?
- He IS the one you remember, isn't he?
- Yeah.
Do you remember us?
We came looking for a house.
No, I can't say I do.
Of course, we see a lot of clients.
- We saw a lot of estate agents.
- Yes, we went to all the ones in the area.
We got the house from Spencer's in the end.
- Anthony Spencer.
- Anthony Spencer, yeah.
- He's very nice. Do you know him?
- Yes, I know him.
We were very lucky because we got the price of the house down
- from 22,000 to 21,000.
- Really, Ange?
Oh, that is fantastic, isn't it? That's really great.
- Is it your first house?
- Yes. We were in a furnished flat before.
- That's a bit grim, isn't it, Ange, furnished flats?
- Yeah.
- Your bed arrived yet, Ange?
- Oh, don't talk about that!
- It's a sore point.
- Is it?
Well, it's funny, really.
I came home today and saw this big parcel in the hall.
- Yes?
- Then I saw his face and he looked furious!
I thought, "Ooh, what's happened?"
And you know what?
The bed head had arrived and no bed!
No, Ange! Oh, that's disgraceful, isn't it?
- You've been sleeping on the floor, haven't you?
- Yes.
We've got a mattress from Tony's mum's, but it's not the same.
No.
Well, let's face it, Tone.
You can't do much with a bed head, can you?
- What line of business are you in?
- He's in computers.
- That's funny, my brother's in computers.
- (ANGE) Is he?
- Yes, he's a programs?
- Analyst.
Oh, yes. Tony's just an operator.
Oh. I know it's a fantastic job, though, Tone.
'Cause my brother, Ange, he had to go to college and get exams.
- And he studied for years, didn't he?
- Yes.
Did you have to do that, Tone, go to college and all?
- You didn't really, did you?
- No.
- No.
- Hmm.
- These are lovely.
- They are, aren't they? Nice and dainty.
- Nine to five, is it?
- No, there's a lot of variation.
Shift work.
It's a two-weekly system.
One week I work from 8am to 4pm, then I work from four till midnight, every other Saturday off.
- Were you off today, Tone?
- Yes, I was.
It's lucky, 'cause if I'm working on a Saturday, and he's off, he can do the shopping.
Oh. Don't you find shopping boring, Ange?
- Mmm.
- I do. I hate it.
He takes me down in the car, I get my wheelie,
Tone, I whiz in and grab anything I can see, bung it in my wheelie, he writes me a cheque, we bung it in the car,
- and then it's done for the week.
- Beverly's not very organised.
She doesn't believe in making shopping lists.
- You have a car, do you?
- Yes, an Escort.
- A yellow one?
- Yes.
- I've seen it.
- Yes, it's beautiful.
- Beverly was saying you only like Minis.
- No, no, not at all, no.
I don't only like Minis. No, I like lots of other cars.
But I find the Mini economic, efficient and reliable.
And the most suited for my purposes.
Of course, I change my car every year.
Yeah, but what I say, Ange, is this.
What's the point in changing your car just to change the colour?
That's not all you change, Beverly!
The design does alter!
- You're not a motorist. You don't understand.
- OK, Laurence!
- I know I failed my test three times...
- Three times!
Plus, Ange, I'm his wife. A wife should have a little say in choosing the car.
When you've passed your test, you can have a little say.
Until then, Beverly, please leave it to me.
Let me put it this way, Ange.
When we chose the furniture, we chose it together.
When we chose the house, we chose it together.
- But when it comes to...
- Beverly, that is a ridiculous argument.
Buying a house is one of the most important decisions you ever make in your life.
- Don't you agree?
- Yes.
- Isn't it, Tony?
- Definitely.
'Cause it was so worrying with the mortgage and everything.
- 'Cause I never thought I'd live in a house.
- Didn't you, Ange?
- No.
- Excuse me, I'm afraid I really must be off.
- Don't be all night, please, Laurence.
- No.
I do apologise. I shan't be long.
- Don't forget the light ales!
- No. And the lagers.
- Are you going to take your test again?
- I'll have another try, Ange.
Don't get me wrong, Tone. It's not that
I can't drive. In fact, I'm a good driver.
But let me put it to you this way.
When I get to my test, my nerves fail me.
D'you know what I mean?
It was my nerves that failed me last time, Ange.
Because I set off, Tone, behind this bloke who was taking his test - a Chinese bloke, actually.
Right, so we were going along. Now...
My examiner had told me to turn left, right?
So we came to the first "Give way".
Now, the bloke in front, he slams his brakes on.
Now, I'm going behind him, I suppose a bit too quick with my nerves, you know.
Right, so I slam my brakes on and I went slap in the back of him.
Now, I reckon that prejudiced my examiner against me.
- See what I mean?
- Oh, what a shame.
It was, actually. Can you drive, Ange?
No, I'd like to learn, but Tony won't let me.
He doesn't think I'd be any good.
It's a shame 'cause it's so awkward for me to get to work since we've moved.
- Yeah.
- I could use the car when he wasn't working.
That would make you completely independent of Tone.
- Hmm.
- Yeah.
- Did you pass your test first time, Tony?
- Yeah.
Yeah, I thought so, actually.
He looks the type, doesn't he? Yeah.
- Who's for another drink? Ange?
- Yes, please.
- Thanks.
- Tony? Another drink?
- Ta.
- Thanks.
- What's the matter?
- Nothing.
Er, Tony, could you give me a hand, please?
Won't the car start?
No.
- Go on, Tony!
- All right!
You mind you don't get dirt on your suit, Tone, OK?
- Ange.
- Thanks.
- Cheers!
- Cheers!
Ange...
Can you take a little bit of criticism?
Please don't be offended when I say this,
Ange, but I can see what you've done.
OK, you've sat in front of your mirror and put your lipstick on.
Next time, will you try this for me?
This is something, Ange, I always used to tell my customers, and it always works.
Now, next time, sit down in front of your mirror and just look at yourself and relax.
And just say, "I've got very beautiful lips."
Then take your lipstick and apply it.
And Ange, you'll see the difference, because then you will be applying that lipstick to every single corner of your mouth.
- Know what I mean?
- Mmm.
- Will you try it for me?
- Yes.
Just sit in front of your mirror, look at yourself, relax, and just say?
"I've got very beautiful lips."
Yeah. I promise, Ange, you'll see the difference! OK?
Mmm. Thanks.
Would you excuse me, Ange, for one minute?
- That'll be Sue.
- Oh.
- Hi, Sue.
- Hello, Beverly.
- Come in.
- Thank you.
- All right, Sue?
- Yes, thank you.
Come through.
- I'm sorry I'm a bit late.
- Don't worry, Sue.
Would you like to slip your little jacket off?
- Everything all right, Sue?
- Yes, I think so. I hope so!
- That's it. Thanks.
- Thank you.
Like to come through and say hello?
- Ange, this is Sue. Sue, this is Ange.
- Hello.
- How do you do?
- Sue's at Number 9.
- We've just moved into Number 16.
- Really?
- You know the MacDonalds' house?
- Yes.
Sit down, Sue. I won't be a second,
I'll just pop your coat away.
- Make yourself at home!
- Thank you.
- We've only been here a fortnight.
- Oh, really?
- Did you bring that, Sue?
- Yes.
- Is it for us?
- Yes.
- Oh, thank you, Sue.
- It's nothing special, I'm afraid.
- Isn't that kind, Ange?
- Yes.
- Not at all.
- Lovely. Laurence likes a drop of wine.
Fantastic, it's Beaujolais. Lovely.
Won't be a sec. I'll just pop it in the fridge.
I'm so pleased to meet you.
- I want to meet all the neighbours.
- Yes.
Now then, Sue. What would you like to drink?
I'll have a glass of sherry, please.
- A sherry? Are you sure?
- Yes, thanks.
'Cause we've got everything. Gin, whisky, brandy, vodka, whatever you like.
Would you like a gin and tonic, Sue?
Me and Ange are drinking gin and tonic.
- Oh, all right.
- Ice and lemon?
- Er, yes, please.
- Great.
- It's a nice drink, gin and tonic, isn't it?
- Yes, it is.
Refreshing.
Sometimes, I drink lager and lime.
Say I'm in a pub with my husband, I'll drink that.
But I prefer this!
- Can I wash my hands, please?
- One second, Tone, while I make Sue's drink.
- Ooh, sorry. Sue, this is Tony.
- My husband.
(BOTH) How do you do?
- Did you push it all right?
- Yeah.
Battery was flat.
- Sue.
- Thank you.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
Now, Tony, hands. Come through.
This is our downstairs toilet. OK?
Ta.
- Do you work?
- No, no, I don't.
- I'm a nurse.
- Oh.
- At St Mary's in Walthamstow.
- Oh, yes.
- Beverly says your daughter's having a party.
- That's right, yes.
- Has it started yet?
- Yes, it has.
- All right, Tone?
- Yes, thank you.
Come through.
- Drink's on there. Like to sit down?
- Ta.
Now, then, Sue. Let's see.
- Would you like a cigarette, Sue?
- No, thank you.
- Sure?
- Yes, thanks.
Perhaps you'll have one later on. OK?
And I know Angela doesn't want one.
- Everybody OK?
- (ALL) Yes, thank you.
Great!
(MUSIC STARTS)
Aye aye! It's started, Sue!
- Yes, they've got the record player going.
- Yes.
- They're going to have fun, aren't they?
- Sounds like it!
- I hope so.
- How old is your daughter?
- What's she look like? I might have seen her.
Oh, well, she's quite tall and she's got fair hair, quite long fair hair.
She hasn't got a pink streak in her hair, has she?
Yes.
Yeah, that's Abigail, Ange.
And she wears those jeans with the patches on and safety pins going down the side of a scruffy bottom.
- And plumbers' overalls.
- Plumbers' overalls. She makes me die!
I saw her, she was standing outside your gate with a friend.
And you've seen her as well, getting off that motorbike.
Yeah.
- How many are coming to the party?
- About 15, isn't it, Sue?
Well, it was 15, then it went up to 20, and last night I gathered it was 25.
- It's creeping up, Sue.
- I've told her that's the limit.
- Well, I think that's enough. Don't you?
- Definitely, Sue.
But this is it with teenagers.
OK, they tell you 25, but a friend invites a friend.
That friend invites another friend, until you end up with about 70 or 80.
Now this is it. This is the danger.
I saw a couple of people arriving.
Yes, it was nice of them to help you with the car.
Not them. Two coloured chaps and a girl roared up in a Capri.
Oh, really.
There were only half a dozen there when I left - when I was asked to leave!
This is it, they don't want Mum sitting there, do they?
No, not when they get to 15!
When I was 15, I really wanted a party of my own.
And my dad, he'd never let me.
You see, he was worried about people pinching things and things getting broken.
- Have you locked your silver away, Sue?
- No, I haven't got any. Well, not much.
But I have put a few things upstairs, in case of accidents.
Yes, it's better to, isn't it?
'Cause it can easily happen.
Don't get me wrong, Sue. I wasn't meaning that any of Abigail's friends are thieves.
Please don't think that.
But you don't know who you get at a party.
- Let's face it, people are light-fingered.
- Yes.
- Did you leave your carpets down, Sue?
- Yes.
- Have you got fitted carpets?
- Yes.
Yes, we've got fitted carpets.
The MacDonalds left them all.
They were inclusive in the price of the house.
- Oh.
- And we were very lucky,
'cause we got the price of the house down from 22,000
- to 21,000.
- Oh, really?
I don't know what we'll do about our carpets when we have a party.
- We're having a party soon, aren't we?
- House warming.
- Yes. You'll have to come.
- Thank you.
With fitted carpets you don't know what to do for the best, particularly with teenagers, because, let's face it, they're not as careful as we would be.
Know what I mean? They don't think.
A drink in one hand, a cigarette in the other.
They're dancing and the next thing, it's cigarette on your carpet and stubbed out.
- Did you get that beer, Sue?
- Yes, four of those big tins and some pomagne.
- That's nice, isn't it?
- Yes, it is.
Yes. It's funny, at that age we used to drink Bulmer's cider.
We used to say,
"A glass of cider and she's anybody's!"
I got very drunk on champagne at our wedding.
- D'you remember?
- Yeah.
- Gives you a terrible headache, champagne.
- Yes, in the morning.
Shocking.
- Did you get any spirits, Sue?
- No, I didn't.
Very wise. They're so expensive, aren't they?
Let's face it, if they want spirits they can bring their own.
Particularly the older boys,
'cause they're working, aren't they?
There will be older boys at the party, won't there?
- Oh, yes. A few, anyway.
- Yeah.
Let's face it, Ange, when you're 15, you don't want to go out with a bloke who's 15, do you?
They're babies, aren't they?
I mean, when I was 15,
I was going out with a bloke who was 21.
Hey, Sue, how's Abigail getting on with that bloke, by the way?
- I'm not sure. I daren't ask.
- Yeah.
Mind, I reckon you're better to let her go out with as many blokes as she wants to at that age rather than stick to one. Do you agree, Ange?
- Yes. How many boyfriends has she got?
- I don't know.
- I don't think she knows herself, really.
- Footloose and fancy free!
Actually, Sue, I was just thinking.
It might be a good idea if a bit later on
Laurence and Tony popped down there.
Now, I don't mean to go in Sue, no.
Just to check everything's OK and put your mind at rest. Don't you agree, Ange?
Yes, it's a good idea. You don't mind, do you?
- No.
- It's very nice of you, but not necessary.
- Your husband's away, is he?
- No, we've split up, actually.
- Are you separated or divorced?
- Divorced.
- When did you get divorced?
- Three years ago.
Oh, that's given you time to sort of get used to it, hasn't it?
We've been married nearly three years.
Three years in September, isn't it?
- We've been married three years.
- That's funny.
We were all getting married about the same time as you were getting divorced.
- What a coincidence.
- Yes!
- Where is he now? Do you know?
- Yes, he lives quite near here.
- Oh, that's nice. Do you keep in touch?
- Yes.
- He pops over to see the kids.
- Every Sunday.
- Does he?
- For lunch.
- Oh, lovely. Is he coming tomorrow?
- Yes, I expect so.
That's nice, for the kids.
Yeah.
Let's face it, Sue, whatever you say about him, he is their father.
Yes.
You all right, Tone?
Yes, thank you.
- What did your husband do?
- He's an architect.
That's a good job, isn't it?
- It's a good job, architecture.
- Well paid.
- It can be. It's quite a long training though.
- Yes.
- Has David married again, Sue?
- Yes.
Oh, well, it's a good job that he's got a... good job, then.
I mean if he's got two families to support.
- Have they got any children, Sue?
- No.
She wants some, so they're trying, but they don't seem to have had any success so far.
- Does she come over on Sundays?
- No, he comes on his own.
Oh, but I suppose, like, when your kids go over there it's nice for her
- 'cause she's got a ready-made family.
- They don't go over there.
- Well, hardly ever.
- Don't you get on with her?
No.
Well, I hardly know her.
Well, I mean, if your husband runs off with another woman...
Let's face it, Ange, you can hardly be the best of mates!
- Now, who's for another drink? Ange?
- Please.
- Thanks.
- Thanks.
- Sue? Another drink?
- I've still got some, thanks.
Come on, I'll give you a top-up. That's it. Lovely.
Tony, another drink?
- Ta.
- Thanks.
I think more and more people are getting divorced these days.
Definitely, Ange, definitely.
Mind you, I blame a lot of it on women's lib.
And on permissiveness and this wife-swapping business.
- Don't you, Tone?
- I s'pose so.
- Don't you, Sue?
- Possibly.
I mean, take Peter Sellers, for example.
- He's been married five or six times.
- Four, actually.
Is it four, Sue?
Look at Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton.
Now, to me, Ange, their relationship is ridiculous.
I think they make a mockery of marriage.
It's disgusting.
- They only do it for the publicity.
- Yeah, let's face it, with film stars,
I reckon the attraction is purely physical.
- They did it in the jungle.
- Yeah.
I mean, let's face it, getting divorced, to a film star, is like going to the lavatory...
...if you'll pardon my French!
But to us, it's a big wrench, isn't it, Sue?
- Yes, of course.
- Yes.
But I think film stars only get married because the public expects it.
- Do you?
- Yes.
I think people take divorce for granted.
I think if they stuck it out, they'd be all right, don't you?
But there are times when you could hit 'em on the head with a rolling pin and clear out!
Well, it's like Tony and me.
We've only been married nearly three years, but we're always having rows, aren't we?
Yeah.
- Does she give you a bad time, Tone?
- Ta... Shocking.
- I think it spoils things, doesn't it?
- Yes, it does.
Mind you, I reckon, sometimes a little row adds a sparkle to a relationship.
- Did you have a lot of rows with your husband?
- No, we didn't, actually.
There you go, Ange, it doesn't always follow, does it?
- No.
- No, it's funny.
- Do you think people should get married, Tony?
- Sometimes.
Ah, he's not so sure, you see, since he's been married to me!
Perhaps we should live in sin and forget the whole thing!
Did you live with Laurence before you got married?
- No, I didn't, no.
- Do you think if you had done, you'd still have married him?
No!
Don't get me wrong.
I do love Laurence... in my own way.
But, if we'd lived together, say for a year,
I don't honestly think it would have worked out.
- If you have kids you ought to get married.
- Definitely. Give 'em a name.
- Yes.
- You'll be having all this soon, Sue.
- Do you think Abigail is the marrying type?
- I hope so.
- You'll probably get married again yourself soon.
- That's not very likely.
You never know, 'cause
I never thought anyone would marry me.
And I met Tony and we were married within a year, weren't we?
- Eight months.
- Yes.
- So, you see, it can happen.
- Really?
- Have you got a boyfriend?
- No.
Would you like kids, Ange?
- Yes, I would.
- Would you?
- Would you, Tone?
- Not for a while.
- Not till we're settled in.
- Yeah, get sorted first.
- He'd make a nice dad, though.
- Yes.
Yeah, I could just see you with a little boy, taking him out and looking after him.
- It would be nice to have one of each.
- Yeah, like Sue.
Mind, it's funny, Ange. Sue's kids, Abigail and Jeremy, aren't a bit alike, are they, Sue?
- No.
- Like chalk and cheese, Ange.
Sue, how did Jeremy get on packing his overnight bag?
- He loved it.
- Did he?
You know what kids are like.
He was so excited about packing all his things.
- He'd have taken the kitchen sink.
- Where's he gone?
- Around the corner.
- How old is he?
- Eleven and a half.
- Would you like kids?
No, I don't think I would, really.
Don't get me wrong.
It's not that I don't like kids, because I do.
But let me put it to you this way.
I wouldn't like to actually have to have them.
- Did you have yours in hospital, Sue?
- Yes.
You see, to me, having to go into hospital would be like being ill, and I couldn't stand that.
I know it sounds horrible, but having to breastfeed and change nappies would actually make me heave.
- I don't think I've got that motherly instinct.
- No. You see, it would be different for me
- 'cause I'm used to looking after children.
- Mmm.
With children that are ill, you've got to watch them every minute.
- Yeah.
- Recently, we had this little girl.
She was only about two and she kept picking at her dressing.
She picked it all off and got right down into the wound.
Sorry, Ange, but would you stop?
If you carry on, I'll faint.
- Leave it out, Ange.
- It's all right, she wasn't in any pain.
- But she got the stitches out...
- Drop it!
Did you know my husband used to be a professional footballer?
- Really?
- He played for Crystal Palace, didn't you?
- Yeah.
- Oh, fantastic!
- It was before I knew him.
- For the reserves?
Oh, no. It was the first team.
- Honestly, is that true?
- For a bit, yeah.
Oh, Tony, that is fantastic!
Sue, we didn't know we had a celebrity in Richmond Road, did we?
- No, we didn't.
- Tony, that's great.
That's made my night, honestly.
Laurence!
Would you excuse me, please, one minute?
Laurence!
Nice music...
...isn't it, Tony?
- Would you like one?
- Thank you.
Ta.
I shouldn't be eating these, we had a big tea.
- Did you eat earlier?
- No, I didn't.
Oh, you must be hungry. Here...
- Have some peanuts.
- Thank you.
Thanks.
Eh, Sue, it's all happening at your place!
Ange, it's so funny!
Your bay window, Sue, at the front, it's wide open and there's this bloke, he's gotta be 20 stone, and he's wedged in your bay window.
He's got one of those purple vests on and a great big fat belly sticking out, like this!
There's this girl, Sue, standing in your front garden, she is as thin as he's fat, right, and she's like this, Ange, draped around him, and they're snogging away.
- You've never seen anything so funny in your life!
- Oh, dear.
Don't worry, Sue, they're only having a bit of fun.
They're only teenagers.
I wonder if I dare pop down for a minute.
- Shall I go and have a look?
- No.
- It's no problem.
- No, thank you. Better not.
Sue's right. It's best not to pop down.
They're only having a bit of fun. Let's face it, when Laurence gets back, we can discuss it.
OK?
Now, who's for another drink? Come on, Ange!
- Sue, another drink?
- No, thanks.
I'll just give you a little top-up. That's it. Lovely.
Just to settle your nerves, Sue.
Tony, another drink?
Ta.
- Cheers, Ange.
- Cheers.
- Where is Laurence, anyway?
- I don't know, Tony. I wish I did know.
What a lovely table!
This is what I'd really love.
- What's that, Ange?
- The candelabra? It's brilliant, isn't it?
- Is it real silver?
- Yeah. Silver plate, yeah.
Oh, it looks so lovely.
And with the light.
- Sue.
- Thank you.
- Are you all right, Sue?
- Fine, thank you.
Yes.
Sue, you must think I'm dreadful.
I'm sorry, I do apologise.
I haven't offered you anything to eat.
Have some nuts.
Thank you.
Take some crisps as well.
- That's it. Lovely.
- Thank you.
Now then, Sue, let's see.
A little cheesy pineapple one?
Thank you.
- Tone, a little cheesy pineapple one?
- Ta.
- Take another, Sue. Save me coming back.
- Thank you.
That's it. Lovely.
Now then, Sue.
Would you like a little cigarette, Sue?
- No, thank you. Not at the moment.
- Sorry, Sue. This is what I'll do.
I'll pop it on here for you. You can light that when you've finished those, OK?
- Tony, come and see this beautiful kitchen.
- It's lovely, isn't it?
Oh, these tiles are gorgeous.
- Were they here when you came?
- Yeah, we were lucky.
You were, 'cause our kitchen's nothing like this.
- Tony, come and have a look.
- Have a look, Tone. They're beautiful.
Tony!
- He's nice, isn't he?
- Yes.
He's fantastic.
- Actually, they're a very nice couple.
- Yes.
Oh, and you've got one of these!
What's that, Ange?
- Oh, the rotisserie. Yeah.
- Do you do chickens and things on it?
Well, you can do. To be honest, I'm not much of a cook, so I haven't used it yet. But you can.
- Laurence, where have you been?
- To the off-licence!
- Hello, Sue. All right?
- Fine, thank you.
Those want to go in the fridge, Laurence, to chill.
- All right, Ange?
- Yes.
Come through, Tone.
- Like to sit down, Tone?
- Ta.
Now, then, Sue. How about a little cigarette?
- There we are, Sue. OK?
- Thank you.
Lovely.
- Now, everybody OK?
- (ALL) Yes, thank you.
- Now, who's for a drink? Tony, light ale?
- Not just yet, thank you.
Go on, Tone. He got them specially for you.
If he doesn't want one, Beverly, he doesn't have to have one.
- Sue?
- No, thank you.
- Angela?
- No, I'm all right, thanks.
- Beverly?
- I'm fine, thanks.
Laurence? ...Yes, please!
Thanks very much.
- Well, the party's hotting up at your place, Sue.
- So Beverly said.
Yes, Laurence, we were saying it might be a good idea if a bit later on you and Tony popped down.
- What for?
- To check everything's all right for Sue.
Put Sue's mind at rest, because she's a bit worried.
- It'll be all right.
- There won't be any problems.
Laurence, I'm not saying there'll be problems,
I'm saying would you check for Sue.
I've just been past and everything seems OK.
- Did you see what was happening in the garden?
- Well, yes.
The couple snogging through the window.
- Through the window?
- With the dirty vest.
No, no. I saw a couple down the side of the house.
And there were a few in the porch.
But I didn't see anybody in the window.
- Want to sit here, Laurence?
- No, stay where you are.
- Sit here. There's plenty of room.
- Thank you.
- Anyway, Sue, these things happen at parties.
- Yes, of course.
- I'm sure it's nothing to worry about.
- No.
Actually, Laurence, you're being very unfair to Sue.
- Not at all.
- No, don't make excuses for him.
Apart from anything else,
Tony has already agreed to go.
- Have you?
- Yeah.
Yes, well, I didn't say I wouldn't go. If Sue wants us to go, of course we'll go down there.
- I don't know that I do.
- Fine.
- Tony doesn't mind going on his own.
- No, I don't.
- I didn't say I wouldn't go.
- Fine, Laurence, are you going?
- Yes.
- Thank you.
That's quite all right.
I'm not saying there'll be any trouble, but teenagers have a drink and get over-excited.
Yes, well, it starts with one kiss...
This is it. Then they find their way to the bedroom.
- Sue, do you like olives?
- Yes.
Fine!
- I'll get you some.
- Thank you.
- You've got a friend for life, Sue.
- Oh?
- None of us like olives.
- Oh, I see.
I can't stand them.
Those stuffed olives, the little red bit that sticks out.
It reminds me of a little...
I'm not saying what it reminds me of!
- But it puts me off. I can't eat them!
- Not everyone can like everything.
It's like Tony. He doesn't like curry and I love it.
- So we never go in Indian restaurants, do we?
- No.
And he won't even eat curry at home, which is a shame, 'cause I enjoy making it.
- Have you ever tried pilchard curry?
- No...
That's a very economical dish.
You just get one of those big tins of pilchards in tomato sauce and mix it with onions and curry powder and it's really tasty.
But Tony won't touch it.
- Darling, have you got heartburn?
- No.
I haven't got heartburn, just slight indigestion, that's all.
I thought so!
This is it, Ange.
He came in late and was all upset.
He's very highly strung, Sue.
It gives him heartburn.
Ah, he must be careful, because when I was working in intensive care, the people who'd had a cardiac arrest, they were nearly all businessmen and those who were worrying about their work.
- I hope you're listening to this, Laurence.
- Yes, I'm listening.
- Cigar?
- No, thanks, I've given up.
- Sure?
- Go on, Tone, take a little cigar.
- Enjoy yourself. Go on, take one.
- Take one.
- Ta.
- Tony!
Well, that counts, doesn't it?
- If he's having a cigar...
- Come on, Ange.
- Sue, would you like one?
- No, thank you.
- Some women do like them.
- So I understand. But I've got a cigarette.
Oh.
- Light?
- Ta.
- Laurence, would you put a record on?
- Yeah, surely. What would we like to hear?
- Demis Roussos.
- Oh, no, Beverly.
We don't want that fat Greek caterwauling all night!
- Darling, not classical.
- Light classical, just as a background.
- Sue, do you know James Galway?
- Yes, I've heard him.
He's an up-and-coming young flautist. Do you like him?
- Yes, he's very good.
- I'll put it on for you.
Laurence, we don't want to listen to classical music at the moment.
- Well, what DO we want to listen to, Beverly?
- Demis Roussos.
Well, if everybody else wants to listen to Demis Roussos, we'll put him on.
- Tone? Do you like Demis Roussos?
- Yeah, he's all right.
Fantastic, isn't he? Sue?
- I don't know him, I'm afraid.
- You'll like him, he's lovely.
- Sue, he's great. Would you like to hear him?
- Yes.
Yes? Laurence, Angela likes
Demis Roussos, Tony likes Demis Roussos,
I like Demis Roussos and Sue would like to hear Demis Roussos.
So do you think we could have Demis Roussos on?
- Yes.
- Thank you.
How are you enjoying your cigar?
Very nice, thank you.
- How's your cigarette?
- Oh, it's lovely.
Mind you don't choke on it.
You see, he's not used to smoking a cigar.
He doesn't know what to do with it!
He'll be all right.
Tone!
- Another drink?
- Ta.
- Ange? Another drink?
- Please. Thanks.
- Sue, another drink?
- No, thank you.
Come on, Sue, I'll just give you a top-up. Lovely.
- Like to help yourself, Tone?
- Ta.
- Fantastic drink, Bacardi.
- Yeah.
It's a knock-out.
- I started drinking it in Majorca.
- Have you been to Majorca?
- Yeah.
- Whereabouts?
- Palma.
- Not Palma Nova?
- That's right.
- Oh, Tony, isn't it beautiful?
- Yeah.
- Yes.
They drink it very long there with ice and Coke and lemon and that.
It's my dream to lie on a beach sipping Bacardi and Coke.
- Have you always had a moustache?
- What do you mean?
- Have you had it for a few years?
- Yes.
- Never thought of having a beard?
- No.
Laurence wouldn't suit a beard.
His face is too small.
Actually, I think a beard can look very scruffy.
(ANGE) Yes...
...but I think a man with a moustache
AND a beard, they look more masculine.
- Sexier, isn't it?
- Has your husband got a beard?
No. No, he used to have, a long time ago, when I first knew him.
- Why did he shave it off?
- Well, he grew out of it.
- Do you play any instruments, Sue?
- No.
I used to play the piano when I was a child.
- The piano?
- Just a bit.
I once went for guitar lessons but I never kept them up.
- That's a pity.
- Yes, I've often regretted it.
You know, I think that musicians and artists are very lucky people.
They're born with one great advantage in life.
Do you know what that is?
Their talent.
They've got something to cling to.
I often wish I'd been born with that sort of talent.
Most people, they just drift through life without any real aims.
They're weak.
It's no good just sitting there whining.
You've got to get up and do something about it.
Not that it isn't a fight. Of course it is.
Life is a fight.
People, er...
...they always seem to be against you.
Not that I've done badly.
No, no. I've done all right.
But, er...
...certainly an uphill battle.
I once went to a party and they said, "Can anyone play the piano?"
I said, "Ooh, yes. I can."
And I can't play the piano.
I'd just learnt this one tune from a friend.
It was, # Buy a broom, buy a broom
# Buy a broom and sweep the room #
And that's all I knew.
You see, they wanted me to play for musical chairs.
So I started, # Buy a broom, buy a broom #
I played it a few times,
- then thought, "I must do something different."
- Yes.
So I started, you know...
- Vamping, type of thing?
- Yes.
But as I can't play, oh, it sounded terrible.
- I felt such a fool.
- Yes.
I thought, "Why did I say I'd play?"
- When was this, Ange?
- It was only when I was eight.
- Oh, I see.
- Yes.
- I still felt a fool, though.
- Yeah.
Would anybody mind if I turn this next track up?
It's my favourite. It's "Forever and Ever".
I'd like us all to hear it. Anybody mind?
(ALL EXCEPT LAURENCE) No.
#... Forever and ever you'll be the one
# That shines on me like the morning... #
- Isn't he great?
- Yes. I know this one.
# Forever and ever you'll be my spring
# My rainbow's end and the song... #
- D'you think he's sexy, Ange?
- Yes.
It's a pity he's so fat.
Yeah, but he doesn't sound it, though, when you hear him.
It's funny. He's still fantastic, though, isn't he?
#... come true, my consolation... #
- Do you like him, Tone?
- Yeah.
#... and ever... #
Knockout, isn't he?
#... dream
# My symphony
# My own lovers' theme
# Ever and ever, forever and ever
# My destiny
# Will follow you eternally #
Ange...
Imagine making love to this!
You all right, Laurence?
- (STOPS MUSIC)
- Ready, Tony?
- Thank you, Laurence!
- Don't mention it! Ready?
- What for?
- Sue wants us to go and inspect the party.
- Fine. Would you go now, please?
- Really, it's all right.
- Are you coming, Tony?
- I think so.
Well, come on, then!
- I think it would be better if you didn't.
- It's all right. Just walk past your house.
Put your mind at rest.
Don't worry, Sue. Tony will handle it.
Won't be long.
Take care.
- I'm sorry about that.
- That's all right.
- Shall I put the record on again?
- Don't bother, Ange. He's spoiled it now.
- Forget it.
- And you were enjoying yourself.
Yeah. We were all enjoying ourselves, weren't we?
To be honest, he's a boring little bugger at times.
Anyway, sod 'im, let's all have another drink. Come on, Ange.
- Sue?
- No, really.
A little top-up. That's it, lovely.
Tell you what, listen. We'll all get pissed!
- Yeah?
- Yes, we can enjoy ourselves.
- That's it, Ange.
- Cheers.
- Here we are, Sue.
- Thank you.
- Cheers.
- Cheers.
Tell you what, Ange.
- Have a cigarette while he's gone. Sod him.
- While he's out.
Here we are. That's it. Lovely.
- I think I'm going to be sick.
- Are you?
Come along, then. That's it.
- Where's the toilet?
- We've got a downstairs one in the hall.
- Hold on a minute.
- Take deep breaths, Sue!
- (SUE COUGHS)
- That's the way.
(ANGE) Bring it all up.
That's it.
- Are you all right, Sue?
- Yes, thank you.
- She still looks a bit pale, doesn't she?
- Yes. I'll take that.
Come and sit down.
That's it. You sit down here.
And your soda water's there. All right?
- Just lean forward a minute. Lean forward.
- That's it. Lean forward, Sue.
- Make you comfy.
- Angela knows.
- Lovely.
- Now, look, Sue,
I've made you a black coffee.
I've made it nice and strong. I haven't put any milk in it in case that makes you sick again.
Now, will you try and sip that for me, Sue?
It will help to revive you a little bit.
OK?
- Sorry about that.
- There's no need to be sorry.
Sue, don't worry.
Let's face it, it could happen to any of us.
Yes, and it's better to happen while those two are away.
Mmm, definitely, Ange, definitely.
- Vomiting in front of blokes is embarrassing.
- Yes.
- And they're not usually sympathetic.
- No.
Well, I know Tony isn't.
'Cause if I've got a headache or my period pains, he doesn't wanna know.
In fact, it annoys him.
This is it, you see, Ange.
I reckon a woman, she needs love and affection from a bloke.
OK, sex is important, but it's not everything.
No. You see, if Tony comes home and he's in a bad mood, I can't do anything right.
- They pick on you, don't they?
- Is he like that?
- Yes, he's very quick-tempered.
- Mmm.
- I think it's because of his red hair.
- Yeah.
Funny, though, isn't it, Sue?
- Sitting there, he looks so quiet and gentle.
- Yes, he does.
- Is he very violent?
- No, he's not violent.
He's just a bit nasty.
Like the other day, he said to me he'd like to sellotape my mouth.
No, Ange!
- That's not very nice, is it?
- It certainly isn't, Ange. It certainly isn't.
- Was your husband violent?
- Oh, no, not at all.
She's one of the lucky ones, isn't she?
Definitely, Sue, yeah, definitely.
- Mind you, if Tony wasn't around, I'd miss him.
- Would you?
- Mmm.
- Yeah.
Funny, isn't it?
I suppose I would miss Laurence, inasmuch as I need a bloke.
Let's face it, we all need a bloke, don't we?
OK, credit where it's due, he's very good with money.
I mean if I want a new dress, make-up, have my hair done, whatever, the money is there.
But apart from that, it's just boring.
Know what I mean?
- I think that comes from being married, though.
- Do you?
- The fun wears off.
- Yeah.
- (ANGE) Everything all right down there?
- I think so.
- How many's at the party, then?
- I didn't stop to count them!
This is my glass.
- It's all right, is it?
- Yes!
Oh, I'm sorry, Sue. Yes.
Yes, I went in and had a few words with them.
Everything seems to be all right.
Where's Tony got to?
You'd better ask him when he gets back.
- Did you see Abigail?
- I certainly did.
- Is she all right?
- I think so.
- Where is he?
- I don't know. I'm not his keeper!
- Did you talk to her?
- I asked her to turn the music down, yes.
- He's stayed at the party!
- Was she upset?
I don't think so.
He's probably being raped, Ange, by a load of 15-year-old schoolgirls!
- Lucky them!
- Listen, I'll tell you something, at least they had a bit of taste - they didn't pick him!
I hope he's being a bit more enthusiastic than when I leap on him!
- Is he one of those?
- Yes, he turns over!
- I've met those before!
- That's enough, Beverly!
- Christ, Laurence, as soon as I enjoy myself...
- Can't you see you're embarrassing Sue?
- I'm sorry, Sue. I didn't mean to embarrass you.
- That's all right.
Sue, it was only a little joke.
- Sue's not been feeling too good, anyway.
- What's the problem, Sue?
- She's been vomiting!
- Thank you, Beverly! Sue can speak for herself.
She's had a few too many gin and tonics, and you've not had any tea, have you?
- No.
- Hasn't she, Ange?
- No.
- Like one of these?
Laurence, she doesn't want that on an empty stomach!
- A sandwich, would you like a sandwich?
- She doesn't want a sandwich!
Well, I want a sandwich!
- Do you want a sandwich, yes or no?
- No! Thank you.
OK, fine!
I hope it chokes you!
What did you say, Beverly?
- Oh, my God! I'm gonna get stabbed!
- Don't tempt me!
Well, go on, then, do it!
Laurence, would you please go back in the kitchen and finish making your little sandwich, all right?
- Sure you don't want a sandwich, Sue?
- Yes, thank you.
Fine.
- Everything all right?
- What do you mean?
- I wondered where you'd got to.
- I wondered where YOU'D got to.
Come in.
What's that for?
I'm making a sandwich. Go in.
- Where have you been?
- Southend.
- Did you enjoy yourself?
- Wonderful.
Where have you been?
Laurence has been back ages.
- It's OK. Nothing to worry about.
- Good. Not too rowdy?
- No.
- Thank you.
- Like a drink?
- Please.
- What would you like?
- Light ale, please.
- A little Bacardi to go with it?
- No, thanks.
- Are you sure?
- Yeah.
- Are you all right?
- Yeah.
Great.
- Was Abigail all right?
- I think so.
- You saw her?
- I didn't see her, but I think she's OK.
- Tone?
- Ta.
- Your shirt's wet.
- What is it?
- Nothing.
- It's soaking wet.
- What were you doing?
- Nothing! Get off!
Bumped into somebody accidentally.
Nothing to worry about.
- Want to sit down, Tone?
- Ta.
Laurence didn't come back with his shirt all wet, did he?
I don't think you two have been to the same party!
'Course we have! What are you talking about?
- Lay off her, Tone. She's only having a joke.
- See what I mean?
- What?
- Are you all right, Sue?
- Yes, but I think I should see Abigail myself.
- No. Sue, please don't go down there.
Listen to me, Sue. You know what Abigail's like.
She'll only shout at you and make you upset.
Please, Sue, sit down.
Sue, Tony has only just come back.
- It was all right, wasn't it?
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
- Nothing to worry about.
- Are you sure?
- Yeah.
Yeah.
Now, come on, Sue. Sit down.
That's it!
Tell you what I'll do.
I'll put a little record on for us all, eh?
Then we can all have a listen to that.
Now, let's see what we've got.
Ooh, I'll tell you what, Sue.
Do you like Tom Jones?
- He's all right.
- He's great, isn't he? Do you like him, Ange?
- Yes.
- Yeah, he's fabulous!
Now, we'll put this on for Sue.
Is Abigail always having parties?
- No.
- Oh.
- Ready, Ange?
- Mmm.
Oh, isn't he great?
I won't be a sec, I'm just going to the toilet.
#... to be loved by anyone
# It's not unusual to have fun with anyone
# But when I see you hanging about with anyone
# It's not unusual to see me cry
# I wanna die
# It's not unusual to go out at any time
# But when I see you out and about
it's such a... #
- That's better. Now we can hear ourselves think.
- Do you want to sit here?
- No, thanks.
- Come on!
- No, thanks.
- Steady!
Seen a few changes since you've been here, Sue?
Not really, no.
Come on, Sue.
Surely you must have seen some changes.
New houses on the other side of Raven's Way.
Yes, the houses. But what about people?
What about them?
The class of people.
Don't you think that's changed?
- Not really, no.
- The tone of the area, don't you feel it's altered?
- Not particularly.
- You don't think it's gone down?
No.
And you, Tony, come on!
- What do you think, eh?
- I wouldn't know, would I?
Oh, no, of course not.
- You've just moved in, haven't you?
- Yes.
- Yeah.
- Yeah.
- A drink?
- No, thank you.
- Angela?
- Mmm, please!
- It's more mixed, that's all.
- Mixed?
Yes, I suppose you could say it was mixed.
- More cosmopolitan.
- Nothing wrong with that.
- Oh, you don't think so?
- No.
Well, that's a matter of opinion.
- Would you like another drink?
- I'm on soda water.
- Fine. Would you like more soda water?
- Thank you.
We like to keep our guests happy.
- Do you read, Tony?
- Sometimes.
- Sue?
- Thank you.
- And just what do you read?
- All sorts.
"All sorts."
- You know Shakespeare?
- Not personally.
- I read it at school.
- At school.
- Well, I have the complete works here.
- They're a lovely set, aren't they?
Yes, they are very well bound.
- They're embossed in gold.
- Mmm, really nice.
Sue...
Very nice.
Part of our heritage.
'Course, they're not something you can actually read.
- Your house is a lot older than ours.
- Yes.
- Sue, 1936, yes?
- I'm not sure. I know it was built before the war.
- I thought so.
- (ANGE) There's nothing wrong with an old house.
There's some quite nice ones.
I like old and I like new.
I like the Tudor houses...
- All right, Sue?
- Fine, thanks.
- You don't feel sick again?
- No.
- No?
- It's settling.
- (LAURENCE AND ANGE CONVERSE)
- All right, Tone?
Yes, thank you.
- Great.
- Do you know the Belvedere Hotel?
- Yes, I do.
- Originally on that site stood a Tudor mansion.
- Did there?
- The official residence...
- Another drink?
- Ta.
...They owned...
- Angela, another drink?
I've seen to the drinks, thank you, Beverly.
Sorry, it's just that I can't hear through two brick walls.
Yes, it was all part of the Belvedere Estate.
Laurence, would you turn that record UP, please?
How can we hold a conversation with that racket blaring out?
We're not here to hold conversations, we're here to enjoy ourselves.
Beverly, we are enjoying ourselves.
We're enjoying this conversation.
#... to take to dinner
# Well, she always knows her place
She's got style, she's got grace
# She's a... #
All right, Laurence, all right.
- Sorry about that.
- That's all right.
We're all getting a little bit merry, aren't we?
It's nice for us to have a bit of a break.
Since the move, we've hardly been out.
- Where are you going, Sue?
- I was going to the toilet.
- Not feeling sick again?
- No, I'm fine.
- Shall I come with you?
- No, thank you.
You see, Sue's been vomiting up her gin.
While you were away,
I had to take her to the lavatory.
- Ange, shall we have a little dance?
- Yeah, it would be nice!
- Tone, do you fancy a dance?
- Yeah, I don't mind.
There's no room to dance in here, Beverly.
Laurence, if I wanted somebody to put a damper on the idea, I'd have asked you first.
OK?
Ange, give us a hand to move the couch.
(LAURENCE) I'll sort that.
(TONY) I'll do that.
- I'll take this corner.
- You just sit down.
Cheers, Tone.
- Got it, Laurence?
- Yes.
- For Christ's sake!
- Don't interfere, Beverly!
- Ready?
- Where do you want it?
Where do you want it?
For God's sake, just move it back there, please.
Just back?
Got this fantastic record I'll play, Ange.
Hang on a sec.
Now, this record, Ange, it turns my husband on.
And when he hears it, he cannot resist my charms.
- They're still enjoying themselves down there.
- Yeah.
What were they getting up to?
- Nothing much.
- Ready, Ange?
- Isn't it great?
- Mmm.
- Fancy a dance, Tone?
- Dance with Beverly.
Perhaps Laurence would like a dance.
No, I don't think he would, actually.
Come on, Tone. Have a dance.
- All right, Sue?
- Fine, thanks.
Yeah.
- You don't mind me mauling your husband?
- No, go ahead!
- Dance with Laurence.
- No, I can't.
'Course you can. Get up and dance!
Don't worry, Ange, you're quite safe with Laurence. He won't rape you.
- Do you wanna dance?
- Surely, if you'd like to.
- I'm not very good at these slow dances.
- No.
I'm better at this sort.
- D'you wanna dance with us?
- No, thank you.
- We can all three dance together.
- I'm fine, really.
- Thank you.
- Thanks.
- Laurence was shaking my hand.
- Oh, was he?
Christ, he'll be shaking mine next!
Now, who's for another drink?
- Ange?
- Please.
- Never say no?
- Thanks.
- Tony, another drink?
- No, thanks. I'm all right.
- How about you, Sue?
- No, thank you.
- Are you sure?
- Yes, thanks.
- He's a good dancer, isn't he?
- Fantastic.
I never knew you could dance so well.
- We don't usually dance like that, do we?
- No.
- Ange.
- Thanks.
- Cheers, everyone.
- (ALL) Cheers.
Cheers.
Darling, why don't you dance with Sue?
I don't think Sue wants to dance, thanks, "Darling".
Then why don't you ask her, Laurence?
- Sue, would you like to dance?
- No, thank you.
- Sue doesn't want to dance!
- Of course she does!
Go on, Sue. Have a dance with Laurence.
Enjoy yourself, go on.
- Would you like to, Sue?
- All right.
- I'll take the glass for you.
- Thank you.
Come on, Tone.
Ange, do you wanna dance with Tone?
No, you're all right.
Are you going on holiday this year, Sue?
- I hope so.
- Expensive business, holidays.
Yes.
- Do you know Paris?
- A little.
Do you?
No.
Thank you.
- Tone, come and sit down.
- Ta.
- Ange, would you throw us some fags, please?
- Mmm.
Cheers, Tone.
- Mind your head!
- It's too big!
- What?
- It's too big!
- What is?
- Your head!
Give it a rest!
- Are you feeling better?
- Much, thank you.
- Ange, like a cigarette?
- Oh, I would.
- Can I have a cigarette?
- Do you want one?
- I'd love one.
- Have one, then.
- Ange, give us a light, would you, please?
- Mmm.
Cheers.
Once you've had one cigarette, you want to keep on smoking.
This is it, yeah.
- What sort of work do you do?
- I'm in computers.
He's an operator.
- Still play football, Tone?
- No...
He gave it up when he was 20.
He plays for the firm's team, though.
- But he's much better than the others.
- I've only played twice.
He looks so funny in his shorts!
- Why did you give it up?
- Things didn't work out.
- You've got footballer's legs, though.
- Has he?
Have you? Let's have a little look.
Ooh, yes, so he has!
I like footballers' legs.
Nice and muscly, aren't they?
I can't stand blokes with skinny legs, Ange. Can you?
Puts you off, doesn't it?
- Talking of Paris, Sue, do you like art?
- Yes.
So do I, but Beverly doesn't.
You know that Paris is the centre of the art world.
- Do you like Van Gogh?
- Yes.
- This is a Van Gogh.
- Yes.
They called him a Post Impressionist, but to my mind he was more of a Symbolist.
- Do you like the Impressionists?
- Yes.
Oh, you do. That's good. That's fine.
Fine.
- You all right, Tone?
- Yeah.
Of course, you know Van Gogh, he was a very unstable man.
Not only did he cut his ear off and leave it in a brothel, he also ate paint and he shot himself.
Thank you, Laurence, we don't want all the gory details.
I am talking to Sue!
And Sue is interested in these things!
Now, this is a picture of his chair in the corner of his room at Arles.
It wasn't actually yellow, no. He painted it yellow because yellow symbolised so much for him.
- Shall we liven things up?
- (TONY AND ANGE) Yeah.
- Do you like art?
- Yes.
This is a Lowry.
Did you know his father was an estate agent?
For Christ's sake, Laurence, give it a rest!
- Give what a rest?
- Nobody is interested.
Oh, yes, they are!
- Oh, no, they're not!
- Do you know something, Beverly?
- You're ignorant!
- Oh, I'm ignorant now, am I?
Now? You always have been!
It's not a question of ignorance,
Laurence, it's a question of taste.
Taste? What would YOU know about taste?
The trouble with you is if somebody doesn't like what YOU like, you say they've got no taste.
- That's rubbish!
- Oh, is it rubbish?
- Yes!
- Then what about my picture in the bedroom?
That is cheap, pornographic trash!
Laurence, just because a picture happens to be erotic, it doesn't mean it's pornographic!
Shut up, Beverly!
I've got this fabulous picture, right?
It's really beautiful.
I brought it home and he wouldn't let me put it up in here.
- I had to hang it in the bedroom.
- If I had my way, it would be in the dustbin!
- Well, you're dead from the waist down, anyway!
- Can I see it?
- Do you wanna see it?
- Yes!
Angela's got work in the morning.
We ought to be going.
- I should go.
- See it another time.
- We don't have to go early, just 'cause of me.
- Sure?
- I'll be fine.
- She's gotta get up!
- Oh, shut up, Laurence!
- Don't tell me to shut up!
- Angela, coat!
- It's all right!
- I really think I ought to be going.
- Don't be silly, we haven't had a coffee yet!
Sit down.
- Beverly!
- We're going soon, anyway.
- Beverly, don't bring that picture down.
- Sod off, Laurence!
- Beverly!
- Drop dead!
You just can't keep your big mouth shut!
GET UP!
Sit down! ...Please.
Laurence!
- Laurence!
- What's the matter?
(ANGE) Just a minute!
- Ange, what's wrong with him?
- I don't know yet!
Tony, help me get him on the floor!
Get me something for his head.
Get his feet up higher!
- Here you are.
- That's too big.
- Here you are.
- What's going on?
What's the matter with him? Laurence.
- What's happened? Has he passed out?
- Tony, could you lift his feet?
Tony, do you mind?
Sue, get him a glass of water, please.
- Laurence, come on.
- No, leave him.
- Leave him!
- Leave him!
- Angela, he happens to be my husband, OK?
- We've got to let him breathe.
- He is breathing, for Christ's sake!
- Get an ambulance, don't sit there!
- Ambulance?
- Yes!
OK, Angela, what is the matter with him?
- I think it's a heart attack!
- Where's the phone?
- Heart attack?
- Where's your phone?
Under the bar, Tony.
Oh, Christ, Ange, are you sure?
- He hasn't got false teeth, has he?
- Of course he hasn't got false teeth!
- Ange, his lips are going blue!
- Don't worry.
- Ange, his hands are going freezing!
- Get him something to keep him warm.
- A blanket?
- Yes.
(BEVERLY) Laurence!
- Can he hear me, do you think?
- Yes.
- Laurence, come on!
- Leave him, he's got to lie still!
- Christ, Ange.
- Have you got through yet?
I'm trying to get a bloody line!
- Ange, Ange, his face is going all blue!
- Ambulance!
- Tell them it's urgent.
- Turn that bleedin' record off!
What? ...5- 0-3-9-0-4-1.
- (MUSIC STOPS)
- (TONY) That's right, yeah.
- Ange, listen to that noise he's making!
- An ambulance, please!
- Ange...
- What's the house number? What's the number?
- 13 Richmond Road.
Yeah.
- Angela.
- A heart attack.
- Angela, I told him this would happen.
I said, "Laurence, you're gonna have a heart attack."
But he wouldn't listen to me, Ange.
But I never thought it would happen at this age.
I thought it would be when he was 50 or 60.
- (LABOURED BREATHING)
- Oh, Christ!
- Sue, listen to that noise he's making.
- Is there anything we can do?
We must just wait for the ambulance.
What happens when they get him to the hospital?
Will they give him oxygen to revive him?
- They've got everything in the ambulance.
- Yeah? Great.
- Sue, drop of brandy?
- No, thank you.
- Tone?
- No, thanks.
- Angela, do you want a drop...
- No.
Now, listen to me, Ange.
Ange...
Would it be a good idea if I put a dab of brandy on his lips?
- No!
- I don't mean for him to drink...
- How about a dab of water?
- No, he must just lie still.
- Or shall I get a cold flannel and lay it across...
- He'll be OK if he lies still!
- The thing is, Ange, I'm very fond of him, I am.
- Keep that cigarette out of his face!
- All right, Tony, lay off me, please!
- You're flicking ash all over him!
- That'll do from you as well!
- Calm down!
It's all right for you.
Your husband isn't lying here with a heart attack!
- Angela, is there nothing we can do?
- No, just sit down.
- It's my fault, isn't it?
- No.
I know it is.
But I didn't mean to upset him tonight, Sue.
I wouldn't do that.
But he is argumentative with me, Sue.
When he starts shouting at me,
I can't help but shout back.
But I didn't mean to upset him tonight.
You see, the thing is, Ange, when he started going on about his pictures,
I should have kept quiet, but I couldn't.
I shouldn't have brought that picture down,
'cause he hates it.
Christ, this is ridiculous!
Tony, where's that ambulance?
- Ange, shall we give them a ring again?
- Beverly, we've only just phoned them!
I know we've only just phoned them, Sue, but you don't know what goes on in these places.
They could have taken the address down wrong.
Or they could have got the wrong road.
- Tony, just phone and check what's going on.
- Shall I ring again, Ange?
Never mind her.
I know she's a nurse but I'm his bloody wife!
- All right!
- Get on that phone!
- How is he?
- He's all right.
Mind you, Sue... he's brought this on himself.
I'm sorry, Sue, but he has.
Sue, if you knew the number of times I have pleaded with him to take a day off and rest, and he wouldn't listen to me, Sue, he wouldn't take any notice of me.
And do you know why? Because basically he is stubborn and pig-headed.
Ambulance!
- Er, 5-0-3-9-0-4-1.
- 13 Richmond Road, tell 'em, Tony.
- It's off Raven's Way, make sure they know.
- That's right, yeah.
- Hello. We phoned for an ambulance earlier...
- Tony!
- We've waited 10 minutes and there's a man...
- SHUT UP!
- BE QUIET!
- I beg your pardon, Sue?
- Will you shut up for a minute?
- Look, I'm telling you now.
- It's my house and if you don't like it, piss off!
- Shut up, please!
Sorry. 13 Richmond Road.
That's right, yeah.
Ta.
Thank you.
- What did they say?
- It's on its way.
For Christ's sake, Sue, would you go and tell Abigail?
- It's not my fault they're making a row!
- I know, but she's your daughter.
- I can't help that. Can I use the phone?
- Yes.
(ANGE) No, you're all right. Just lie still.
- Is he coming round a bit?
- Yes. Keep still.
Laurence!
Laurence...
It's Beverly speaking.
Now, listen to me, Laurence. Look...
Laurence, I'm just putting my cigarette down.
We don't wanna blow smoke in your face.
Now, Laurence, listen to me.
Laurence...
You're not well, but we're taking you to hospital. Listen to me, Laurence...
Laurence, I promise I'm not gonna leave you.
I'm gonna stay with you all the time.
Listen to me, Laurence.
Angela is looking after you.
You'll be all right. There's no need to worry.
Ange...
- Ange, what are you doing?
- Can I speak to Abigail?
Abigail! ...Abigail Lawson.
- Tony, can you hold my hair out of my face?
- Eh?
Tony!
Oh, Tony!
Oh, Tony!
- Tony! Tony!
- What's the matter?
You haven't got cramp again? Come here.
Give us your leg.
Stretch it! STRETCH IT!
Abigail, it's Mummy here.
Abigail?
Abigail!
